Chapter 101.
Without saying a word, Giselle stared fixedly at the fireplace, but the shameless man, who utterly disregarded her wishes, kept talking without pause. He was so brazen that the words tumbling out of his mouth were enough to make anyone drop their jaw in disbelief.

 "I'm going to make you open your legs of your own free will."  "Why would I do that?"  "Out of fear."  "Can't you see I'm holding them shut because I'm afraid?"

Giselle shot him a defiant look, pointing at her firmly squeezed knees.

 "It's like this now, but soon you'll open them on your own and move like crazy, just like last time. I'd even bet Edwin Eccleston's third leg on it. See, I’ve made a very big bet."

The moment she recalled what he meant by "last time," her heart plunged. She was so ashamed she wanted to disappear. Giselle hugged her knees and buried her face between them.

 "Why? You liked it."  "I don't like it anymore."  "Why not?"

The man moved closer and sat facing her, his face appearing between her knees. His warm, relaxed smile made Giselle’s heart sink again. It was Edwin's smile, so familiar it was practically his signature.

 "Look at me closely. I am Edwin you love, am I not?"

Giselle squeezed her eyes shut and shook her head.

 "It's because you are my Lord that I don't like it."

If Edwin knew she had been involved in something like this, he would suffer.

 "Wow... Edwin, did you hear that? Now Giselle says she doesn't love you anymore."

Was Edwin seeing this entire scene? Giselle's eyes flew open in shock. Edwin's gentle smile had vanished, replaced by a twisted demonic grin that disfigured the face of the man she loved.

 "It’s a joke. Your Lord is fast asleep, utterly unaware that the girl he raised so carefully is about to be devoured by his enemy. Now it's just the two of us."

Relieved, Giselle flinched when the man reached out his hand. He pushed aside her hair, which fell like a curtain, and tucked it behind her ear, but she shook her head hard, hiding her face again.

 "Sweetheart, do you feel so guilty about your Lord that you can't be with me? Too bad, but I don't have a body of my own. Although, if I did, you would never have ended up in this situation with me."

The man let out a scornful laugh.

 "I don't want to do this with this damned human's body either. But I'm trapped here, so I have no choice but to live as I am."

Then why don't you die?

 "Besides, your Lord will never know what we do tonight. It will be a memory only ours."  "Why would I want to have memories with you? Don't try to make me your accomplice."

You're a monster. She bit back the last part, closing her mouth when she saw the man's cold expression.

Though the cold had gone, Giselle's skin remained prickled. The man was stroking her shamelessly, and she couldn't bring herself to push him away, holding her breath instead. Finally, she asked cautiously:

 "Do you love me?"  "Yes, pathetically."

The man admitted it without flinching. Giselle had hoped he would deny it, that he would say it was a mistake made in a fit of passion, but he didn't.

Of course, Giselle denied it. How could this be called love? But if even a false love could be a lifeline, she had to cling to it.

 "If you treat the woman you love like this, you will only make her hate you more. Do you want me to hate you? Don't you want to be loved?"

The man’s face twisted. It was a strange smile, as if he were on the verge of tears.

 "Then, will you love me if I do everything you want?"  "Who wouldn't love a handsome man with good manners?"  "And if you could overcome this crisis, would you be able to tell any lie?"  "It's not a lie"  "Let's say it's the truth. What good is it for us to love each other if Edwin Eccleston doesn't love you?"

The cruel truth pierced her heart like a knife. Giselle felt that if she opened her mouth, red blood would gush out, so she bit down on her lips.

 "You will cling to a man you can never have, and you will die for it. So what am I? I refuse to be more miserable than I already am."  "..."  "The end of this twisted love can only be death."  "Are you going to kill me?"  "Ah, is that why you wanted to leave? Were you afraid I would kill you in this desolate place? I don't kill people. At least, not with my own hands."

The caveat was so strange that his words offered no comfort.

 "Understood? Can we relax and do something nice now?"  "I am not relaxed. And I already told you I won't do it."

She squeezed her knees even tighter, which he gently nudged for her to open. She couldn't understand why he insisted on not forcing her if he had gone this far, but the man didn't try to force her legs apart. Instead, he stroked her, laughing as if her resistance were adorable.

 "Giselle, don't you wonder how I came to exist?"

Edwin had only told her that this personality had surfaced while he was in a prison camp, but he hadn't given her details.

 "Actually, I am your Lord's repressed desire that has manifested as a personality."

It was exactly what she had read in an article. Naturally, she was intrigued.

 "What kind of desire?"  "Immoral sexual desires toward the girl he raised."

It was exactly what Giselle wanted to hear. Her heart hammered in her chest.

 "Do you understand what that means?"  "That my Lord actually wants to sleep with me?"  "You're smart, as expected of the top student. And I suppose you also understand that he can't admit it due to his position as a Duke."  "...Is that all?"  "Yes. Didn't you want to help your Lord?"  "Yes."  "Before he represses his sexual desires so much that they explode again in this way..."

The man pointed to himself when he said "in this way."

 "If you release them, I won't appear. Then your Lord won't have to live trapped."  "You're right."  "So open your legs"  "But there's something..."  "Yes?"  "I only listen to my Lord."

When did you start trying to trick me? Do I look naive? You may have fooled me before, but now that I know, I won't fall into your trap.

The man, who had been nodding obediently and responding to everything, stared at Giselle with eyes of surprise, as if a seemingly docile rabbit had just ripped a piece of his flesh. Yet, she still maintained an innocent look.

 "I am your Lord too. Sexual desires. It's an instinct ingrained in the Eccleston blood."

The man tried to seduce her again, insulting Edwin by calling him an Eccleston stud.

 "You are not my Lord. You are a parasite clinging to him."

This time, the man looked like someone a rabbit had bitten his finger off. He made a terrifying grimace and clenched his teeth. Giselle held her breath, fearing he would strike her, but the man only moved his tongue.

 "Miss Leech, is that your introduction?"

More painful than a blow.

Giselle's eyes, fixed on the demon, reddened and instantly filled with veins. Red rage surged up her throat. She tried to contain it, but...

 "You are a leech who knows neither decorum nor gratitude, who coveted the place of the wife of the man who raised her and was discarded."

When he hit her most painful spot, she lost all control.

 "You should know your place. You aren't even a leech. You don't have a body. Hey, are you alive? Or do you even exist?"

Giselle threw back the words the man had once told her in a fit of madness. She sharpened them enough to stab him deeply.

 "At least a leech or a parasite can be touched. But you, what are you?"  "..."  "An urgent mental illness to treat? No. You are not even a disease. As you said, you are only a sequela of torture."

Giselle bared her teeth, as if ready to bite the demon who was coldly staring at her, and spat out each word with force.

 "A symptom."  "..."  "Like an itch that disappears when you scratch it. You are just an insignificant state that will be forgotten forever."

As Giselle struck him with her words, the man's face remained taut, moistening his dry lips with his tongue before beginning to laugh. She thought it was a mocking laugh, but the man suddenly revealed that the attack had worked.

 "Ugh..."

Finally, touching her.

With one hand, he grabbed both of Giselle's cheeks and turned her head toward him. Their faces were so close she could feel his ragged breath. The man looked at her with dominant eyes, his oppressive gaze instantly crushing her.

 "You're right. I am not your Lord."

Giselle's challenging eyes began to tremble. The man had suddenly started speaking fluently and consistently.

 "Do you know who I am?"

The peculiar accent made the language, already harsh, sound even more violent as it passed through the demon's tongue.
Chapter 102.
 "...Who are you?"

Giselle, swept up in the confusion, also asked in earnest.

 "Lorenz von Eisenhardt."

The man pronounced his name with an air of superiority, and Giselle found herself unable to mock him. It was an impressive name, regardless of who heard it.

The man's face superimposed with that of an enemy officer she had once seen in the newspaper. Giselle, with wide eyes, couldn't look away from him and only blinked repeatedly. The man looked at her with disdain and twisted his lips.

 "You've heard of my infamy too."

If you hadn't heard of it, you wouldn't be from Mercia.

The Steel Griffin or the Pale Raven. An enemy hero who shot down a hundred of our army's planes in a month and took countless lives. A name that makes any citizen of Mercia tremble with fear and hatred, a name that is the object of admiration among boys who have only hormones instead of brains in their empty heads.

Lorenz von Eisenhardt.

This guy is him?

 "Don't you believe it?"

Giselle nodded her head, stunned, and mumbled:

 "I heard you had died..."  "Do you know how I died?"  "I heard our army assassinated you..."  "And who do you think led that assassination operation?"

It can't be.

 "...You?"  "As expected of the top student."

Is this man The Executioner?

If Constanza has the Steel Griffin, Mercia has The Executioner. The commander of a unit of assassins with no face or name who became a legend during the last war.

 "That's right, I am the soul of a soldier your Lord killed. If I had fallen on the battlefield, I would have accepted my defeat like a man, but to die by a dirty trick? Edwin Eccleston, that cowardly rat, I won't rest until I show him what I'm capable of. Do you understand now why an enemy's soul has clung to your Lord?"

Far from understanding, Giselle hadn't even processed all that. The man sneered at her confusion.

 "Your Lord never told you that? You are an obedient, stupid little dog who only listens to Edwin, aren't you? Right now, in that mean, tiny little head of yours, you must be thinking this."

It was true that amidst the sea of jumbled words in her mind, there was a phrase like that.

 "Why wouldn't he have told you? Giselle, I paid the price for the lives I took with your body. He couldn't tell you just like that."

Giselle's rounded eyes turned fierce.

 "If you already got your revenge, why don't you disappear?"  "Because it's not over yet. Aren't you curious about how my revenge will end?"  "...What else are you going to do?"  "Something obvious. In the end, I will return to my country. For me, it will be a homecoming, but for the great Major Eccleston of Mercia, it will be a betrayal."

Giselle's face instantly paled, and the corner of the demon's lips curved even deeper.

 "Ah, it's still too soon for you to be scared. There is something even more terrifying. If that happens, you won't see your Lord again."

No.

 "Until he dies. Never again."

Absolutely not.

 "Don't you like it?"

Giselle nodded her head, stunned.

 "Then, don't let him go. Hold your Lord tight in your damned house. Understood?"

This time, she shook her head, bewildered. His forehead, which previously showed arrogant confidence, was now deeply furrowed. It was time to turn the situation around.

 "Do you know how to fly a plane?"

In a case study on multiple personality disorder, one of the patients claimed to be a distinguished mathematician, but couldn't correctly perform three-digit division. The patient had never attended school.

Your Lord never learned to fly a plane. I'm sure it's because of Giselle.

If this guy knows how to fly a plane, then I'll believe that Lorenz von Eisenhardt really possessed him. But if he doesn't know, then he is nothing more than the sad bragging of a strange chemical reaction in his brain.

 "Is this a test? Gladly. I'll show you as soon as it stops raining. But I won't come back."  "No, no. You don't have to show me. Just tell me one thing and I'll believe you, I'll even sleep with you."

"I'll sleep with you." As if the condescending expression didn't appeal to him, the man frowned, but then nodded his head, looking at Giselle as if granting her an opportunity.

 "Ask whatever you want."  "Then, tell me why Constanza's Stahlschmidt Model 209, which broke the world speed record at the time, was not deployed in the Schwanhof Incident."

The answer is that, although it was developed as a fighter, the engine's cooling system occupied almost all the space in the wings, making it impossible to install machine guns or cannons.

Men are incredibly talkative. At the slightest opportunity, they can't help but boast about their knowledge and compete with each other. So, what must it have been like on a military base full of men? Except during sleep, my ears were always ringing.

From how to select the most effective position to bury landmines to how to make turpentine from a pine tree. Finally, one of those useless, scattered pieces of knowledge I gathered during my time living on the military base with my Lord found its use.

My Lord, a Mercian army officer, probably doesn't know the embarrassing history of failures in the development of enemy private company fighter planes. But a Constanzan air force ace, who must have been on duty then and is from the same generation as my Lord, would definitely know.

It seems he really doesn't know.

 "..."

Seeing that he didn't know.

The longer the silence lasted, the more evident his defeat became. Giselle, facing that expression, sent a belated mental thank you to an air force pilot whose name she couldn't even recall, who used to talk in the field hospital bed.

 "Then, you're not Baron Lorenz von Eisenhardt, are you, Mister Scammer?"

Giselle tilted her head as far as the hands gripping her tightly allowed and blinked exaggeratedly with wide eyes. She knew she would look irritating, but she did it with innocent gestures.

Blinked.

Blinked.

Blinked.

Even after slowly closing and opening her eyes for the third time, the man didn't react. He just stared at her with a cold look.

Her lips felt dry. She couldn't swallow. She was nervous. If she showed signs of tension, she would lose the psychological battle. Giselle focused all her strength on keeping her eyes, which wanted to dart away, fixed on the man's penetrating gaze.

Click.

It is an unwritten rule of fights that the first one to look away is the loser. The man let out a scornful laugh and moved his eyes as if annoyed by how ridiculous the whole thing seemed. He licked his dry lower lip and bit it hard, letting out several chuckles.

That was the loser's entire reaction.

When Giselle insulted him by saying he couldn't even be a parasite, the only thing he did was grab her face tightly. After that, he only tried to discourage her with words.

She had the strange feeling that he wouldn't turn more violent than that, and it turned out she was right. Perhaps she was also right to intuit that, although he was frustrated at not being able to break Giselle, he somehow enjoyed this argument. Once she felt secure about her safety, Giselle was no longer afraid.

 "Hey, Mister Scammer. Is there anything you can do on your own without relying on my Lord's skills? No, right?"

The smile began to fade from the man's face, but Giselle didn't stop talking.

 "No matter how much you use your intelligence, that is my Lord's head. Even the body that tries to sleep with me is my Lord's. You have nothing of your own. You are a stowaway who uses everyone else's things without permission, you're not even grateful, huh..."

The hands that had momentarily relaxed tightened hard on Giselle's cheeks. Between the teeth exposed by the man's forced smile, words in Mercian, chewed with rage, came out.

 "I have a skill of my own that your Lord doesn't have."  "What is it?"  "The ability to kill with my tongue."

It wasn't for nothing that the clarification that he didn't kill with his own hands sounded so significant.

 "It doesn't matter if you're the Steel Griffin or a pile of scrap metal. Anyone can kill if they have a weapon."

The man said he had driven two people to suicide with just his words. A prison camp guard and a professor.

 "The professor, you know him too."  "...Professor Fletcher?"

And it wasn't just that. If the people who died in the shootout he incited at the prison camp were included, so far seven lives had disappeared because of his tongue.

Now, facing Giselle, that red tongue licked his lower lip. The gaze that transformed into a predator's crushed her. A chilling shiver ran through her body.

 "Giselle Bishop, do you want to commit suicide too?"  "...What?"

Giselle looked at the man, who seemed completely serious, then let out a little laugh.

 "Where is someone who commits suicide just because of a few words? Your lies are getting less convincing every time. This is the least plausible one you've invented so far. F. Fail. Rewrite the story."
Chapter 103.
At this point, Giselle began to suspect that the personality currently using Edwin’s body, despite claiming to be an adult, was nothing more than an adolescent. His arrogant words were typical of a boy in the throes of puberty, which made him seem that age.

 "The day you commit suicide, I hope you remember this moment and recognize your stupidity."  "Shouldn't you be begging to forget your burning arrogance of today on the day you mature? If that day ever comes."

The man's eyes narrowed and began to fixate on Giselle. It was a stare as if he were seeing a wall, not a person. Based on her experience arguing with all types of boys at the boarding school, the man was now at a point where he didn't know what to say.

Giselle, as she always did in these cases, stared him down with an expression that dared him to continue. The man let out a scornful laugh and said:

 "What sort of performance is this?"

He dropped Giselle’s face as if throwing it away.

Had he given up on opening my legs?

He got up and walked away. The man slumped onto the sofa, which sighed under his weight. He rested his forehead on his fingertips and closed his eyes, as if his head ached.

He clearly looked like a loser.

Had she really won?

 "Enough. Go up to the room and go to sleep."

She had won. She thought there would be no way to defeat that demon, but apparently, words could do it.

Even though it was only her tongue and not her fists, the fact that she had beaten the man until he lost the will to fight was incredibly exhilarating. Although she was still far from making him pay for everything he had done to her, just this was enough to feel a refreshing relief, like taking a sip of cool air with a mint candy in her mouth.

 "This?"

The moment Giselle quickly stood up, the man opened his eyes and, as if to prove a point, tapped his erection, which was still firm and high.

 "You don't have to let me go."

The ecstasy of victory ended there. With a single word from the demon, the roles of winner and loser were reversed.

The man pulled a note from the paper bag on the table and picked up the receiver. Without hesitation, he dialed a number without even looking at Giselle. It was obvious it was the number of a prostitute.

She didn't want to be manipulated by that demon, but she hated the idea of another woman doing it even more.

Losing all reason, Giselle didn't have time to stand and crawled on her knees toward the man. In the process, the towel wrapped around her body came undone, leaving her naked, but she didn't cover herself. After all, she was already in a position where she was going to be naked anyway.

Giselle desperately grabbed the hand dialing the number and hurriedly brought it to her chest, surrendering herself to the demon's claws.

 "Let go of me."

Finally, the man's wordsthat she herself would open her legs out of fearcame true. Swallowing the self-hatred that burned in her eyes, she pleaded with a trembling voice:

 "But keep it a secret from my Lord."  "As long as you do what I say."

As soon as she nodded, the first order came.

 "Open them."

His face, which had been mocking all along, transformed into a sad grimace. As she sat down at his feet and began to open her expensive legs, his face flushed a darker color than the skin between her thighs. While her lower body trembled at the exciting scene, the feeling of disgust in several aspects was not exactly pleasant.

He didn't have time to beat around the bush, but he couldn't understand why he was spending precious time flattering, comforting, and threatening her. He found his own actions displeasing.

 "But keep it a secret from my Lord."

After hearing this, he felt he had wasted his time like a fool, but making her an accomplice was more fun than simply forcing and raping her.

However, that method was boring to the point of being disgusting. A woman whose weak point was her "Lord" and whose envy was the catalyst. By stimulating those two aspects, she became the easiest woman in the world.

A true explorer, after blazing one trail, always seeks a new one. Because there is no challenging spirit on a path you have already trod.

It meant that, although he knew how to make this woman open her legs without hesitation, he wanted to find a more original way. But since nothing worked, he finally resorted to a disgusting method, and even though he had won, he felt as if he had lost.

But playing with that body might be different.

The man licked his lips as his gaze swept over the pink membrane between the woman's pale thighs. Unable to bear the intense gaze that seemed to rip her flesh, the woman turned her head. She, carelessly exposing her intimacy, expected the man to come and rape her.

It won't be that easy.

 "Masturbate."

The woman frowned and glared at him furiously, as if she wanted to devour him.

 "If you do it once, I'll let you sleep with your beloved Lord."

Although he offered the carrot first, the woman's hands did not move. She even tried to avoid the difficult task by asking if she couldn't be the one to move her hips from above. It was time to use the whip.

 "Should I call someone more experienced to give you a demonstration?"

When he lifted the receiver again, her hands finally moved between her legs. She hesitated, sighed deeply, and after repeating her sad plea, began to move.

 "Don't show it to my Lord."

The woman, with an expression that looked like she was about to burst into tears if touched, reluctantly parted her golden pubic hair and began to grope for something. The moment her hand touched something, she froze, so much so that even the man noticed. She had found an erogenous zone, a small mound smaller than a pomegranate, densely packed with sensitive points.

Her fingers moved hesitantly, but with determination. She pushed aside the soft flesh around it and rubbed the clitoris through the folds of skin.

 "You're doing it well, just as I taught you. As expected of the top student."

She frowned and clenched her teeth, as if finding it horrible to hear. Her face showed she wanted to kill or die. The moment the man mocked her, her hand slowed, but it didn't stop. Just once more, and this insult would end. She knew the faster she finished, the better it would be for her.

The woman began to rub the mound faster and faster, covering her face, which was redder than her vulva, with her hand. Her desperate attitude was like an ostrich burying its head in the sand while leaving its body exposed to predators, which made him laugh.

The man stood up. He sat on the floor in front of her, and the woman looked at him with wide eyes between her fingers, watching him.

 "Is it true that if a woman has a pretty face, she also has a pretty place here? Like you."

Hearing the vulgar compliment while the man she hated looked at her intimate part with the eyes of the man she loved, the woman again put on a sad face and squeezed her eyes shut. Her hand moved faster.

Although she was doing it reluctantly, she seemed to be feeling something, as her nipples, which hadn't even been touched, were erect. Their color was ripe and delicious. Their shape was perfect for sucking. He wanted to take them into his mouth immediately, but he held back and looked away.

When he looked down, the two swollen, blood-filled lips welcomed him. The entrance of her vagina tightened and loosened to the rhythm of the clitoris friction, as if asking him to penetrate it.

I want to do it too.

The head of his penis, which knew very well how exciting it was to feel himself being squeezed and bitten, drooled annoyedly inside the condom.

Why is it taking so long?

Just when he started to think it had been a bad idea to ask her because she was too slow...

 "Ah"

The woman tilted her head back and tensed her body. The tips of her feet, which were resting on the rug, curled. Was she finally coming?

'Ha, this bitch.'

It was just a fake.

Nothing ruins a performance like a spectator suddenly interfering. The man slid his middle finger inside the woman's vagina. She, who was "coming," opened her eyes wide and pulled her hips back.

The man grabbed one of the woman's ankles, which was trying to escape, and placed it on his shoulder. She couldn't break free or close her legs.

 "Ah, no! What are you doing?"  "From the outside, it's hard to distinguish if you're really coming or just pretending."  "I already came. I'm done, I'm serious."  "No, you didn't come. You just faked it."

The walls of her vagina squeezed his finger, but they weren't trembling. It seemed she would only admit the deception if the evidence was right in front of her eyes. He pushed aside the hand that was covering the mound and parted the lips to expose the clitoris. The small protruding bump wasn't pulsing either, as he expected.

 "You can squeeze the hole with your will, but it seems this part can't. Miss Bishop, you failed the physiology of sex. Go back to masturbating."

The woman looked at him with eyes full of resentment, then abruptly pulled her hand away and began to rub the ungrateful part of her body that had not cooperated with the performance again. This time, with one of the man's fingers deep inside her.

Slide.

 "Hmm..."

Two fingers.

 "No, don't move."  "I'm just helping you. You want to come fast, don't you?"

She couldn't say no anymore and bit her lip hard. When her teeth separated, the color returned to her pale lips, which made him salivate again.

 "Sssh..."

With one hand, he grabbed her small chin and covered her mouth. Her soft, fleshy lower lip was crushed against the tip of his tongue.

 "Ah!"

He released her chin and pulled the ankle over his shoulder. As the woman was dragged, she lost her balance and fell backward. Finding herself lying on the rug, the woman, seeing him incline his head between her thighs, gave up and covered her face with the hand that had been resting on the floor.
Chapter 104.
The man watched the obscene collaboration between the woman’s slender fingers, tracing ceaseless circles, and his own thicker fingers moving at the same rhythm underneath. He brought his lips close to the increasingly moist pink mucous membrane between both sets of fingers, as if kissing it. The woman shuddered, losing her rhythm.

 "Now, seeing your lips without lipstick, the lips between your legs come to mind, and the blood concentrates in my lower waist. They are the same color. Though the sensation is much better here."  "Ah..."

He licked one of the lipsone of the labia minoraresembling the petals of a fully open pink rose. Unlike her smooth, elastic lips, the soft, tender flesh gently wrinkled.

The woman’s face contorted. When he sucked her inner lips as if they were actual lips, she winced. Although she looked disgusted externally, internally she trembled as if she were insane with pleasure every time he moved his tongue.

Suddenly, an idea occurred to himsomething they hadn't done yet. With this, the woman would cry profusely while, at the same time, being mad with pleasure and spilling vaginal fluids.

The man quickly moved the finger that was inserted into the center of her vulva, enough for the vaginal fluid to splatter outwards. He rubbed the tight flesh inside the little pussy abruptly with his fingertips; the woman covered her mouth with the hand she had previously used to cover her face. She couldn't contain her moans.

 "Ah, ah..."

Just as he brought her to the brink, to the point of losing control and focus in her eyes, the man withdrew his hand. Before the open little pussy could close, something else was inserted in its place.

As soon as the finger was withdrawn, the woman's body, which had been flaccid, tensed.

Her eyes, which had been cloudy, regained their focus as she looked down.

 "Wait. What... what are you..."

As soon as the woman saw with her own eyes that what was being inserted into her pussy was a thick, fleshy masshis tongueshe turned pale and began to scream.

 "I don't want to. I don't want it! Don't do it!"

No matter how tightly she closed her legs, she couldn't do anything about the head that was between them. Or did she forget that to reach orgasm, she needed to stimulate her body? She even used her hands, which should have been used for self-stimulation, to try to push the man’s head away, though it was useless.

 "Ah..."

As if trying to escape, she tried to sit up, but the man grabbed her to keep her from moving and pulled her toward him. His mouth glued to her pussy. The man introduced his tongue deep into the woman's vulva, as if passionately kissing her, and savagely agitated the tender flesh.

 "Ah, uh, ah..."

The coarser and stronger the sound of the soft flesh being rubbed, the more explicit the woman's moans became. He even rubbed the clitoris, which the woman had left helpless, and the moans were abruptly cut off until only gasps remained.

The vaginal walls enveloping his tongue contracted. The exposed vulva also pulsed like a heart. It was time.

Her two legs, which had been rubbing uselessly against the rug, loosened. The woman took a deep breath and lifted her waist. She tried to receive the approaching orgasm with her whole body.

He spread the vaginal fluid, which had already completely soaked the vulva, over the clitoris and vigorously rubbed the tip of his thumb until it foamed. At the same time, the man pressed the tip of his tongue inside to scrape the roof of the little pussy sharply.

 "Ah..."

A meow like a cat in heat prolonged finely and then cut off abruptly. In that instant, the woman trembled with her whole body. It was the orgasm.

 "Uh..."

The woman, after that, breathed with difficulty, crying and releasing more vaginal fluid. And finally, she climaxed.

Pshhh.

A small jet of urine shot out of the urethral opening like a thin stream of water, splashing the man's face. The woman proved that the rumor among men that women also ejaculate when excited is not a myth.

 "Ah, ah..."

The man looked up over the mountains of golden pubic hair soaked with vaginal fluid. He saw the face, rapt in pleasure, between the breasts that heaved from her gasps. The woman seemed to be in a trance, unaware that she had just done something dirty on the man's face.

 "I have a lot of work with the milk today."

The woman, unfortunately, was very observant. As soon as she made eye contact with the man who was standing up, she turned pale. She realized where the liquid dripping from the man's face came from.

He licked the liquid that was dripping down to the corner of his lips, mockingly. The woman, horrified, got up. She picked up a towel from the floor and cleaned the face of the manher beloved manwith a look full of remorse, behaving like a child trying to hide a mistake for fear of being discovered. It's an act that is anything but cute, but somehow...

 "Ah..."

He covered her lips with his, took the towel from her, and threw it away. Hugging her tightly, as if he was about to break her, he laid her down on the towel, which was now spread out.

Before their lips separated, the woman tried to turn over to lie on her stomach. The man, however, forcefully flipped her so they faced each other, parted her legs, and introduced his cock into her vagina.

The cock slid easily into the moist hole, which was so wet it would drip if opened.

Chap. Chap.

Every time he pushed it inside, as if drilling a narrow hole, the sound of water was explicit.

 "Look closely. I'm entering you."

The woman let out a sob, closed her eyes tightly, and covered her ears. A useless gesture. She couldn't stop feeling the brutal stake of flesh forcing its way through her vaginal walls and sinking into her belly. As if to make her feel it well, the man, who had been slowly inserting his cock while mockingly watching her, stopped.

 "Ah..."

The corner of his lips, twisted in mockery, opened, letting out a groan of admiration. A chilling shiver ran down his back, raising his skin from the pressure he felt, as if his cock were being sucked.

 "That's how you do it well."

Because she had just reached orgasm, her entire vulva trembled and pulsed. With his cock still inside. It was as if she was putting a soft, rough bag of flesh over his cock and savagely shaking it. It seemed he was about to come again.

 "Uh, I don't want to..."

Inside, she writhed to expel the cum, while outside she refused with disgust. How interesting. The disparity between her innocent face and her mature body was supremely stimulating.

The man took her two round breasts. The soft flesh stuck to his palms. As he squeezed, they softened docilely and slipped between his fingers. He had never kneaded dough, but would it be like this? As he kneaded, twisted, and squeezed that whitish mass, her nipples began to prick his palms.

 "Ah... no, don't do it."

When he twisted the prominent, pink nipples, the woman desperately tried to remove his hands. Meanwhile, she herself squeezed and twisted the man's cock against her vulva.

She seemed determined to squeeze all the cum out of him.

Although the penetration had stopped, he was about to come. It was a pity, but he had to remove her hands from her chest.

 "To think that he wasn't going to take advantage of such an exciting woman... Edwin Eccleston is a very lucky guy, don't you think?"  "Sniff, Lord... I'm sorry..."

The woman covered her face and chest with her arms and sobbed.

 "Why are you sorry? It should be your guardian who apologizes to you."

That is, the one with a bad guardian who has fallen into the hands of a strange monster is the one who should receive apologies. Although a dog so loyal as to be blind couldn't think that way.

 "Hey, what do you think?"

He asked, pretending to talk to the head, and the woman's eyes widened, staring at him over her arms.

 "Edwin says it feels good. So you must enjoy it too."

When the woman's face turned snow-white, he twisted his lips.

 "It's a joke."

But it's not a lie.

 "Should I tell you a secret?"

The man brought his lips close to the woman's ear, where her hands couldn't reach to cover, and whispered sweet poison.

 "Did you think it was me who came inside you while you moved in your bed on the Magnolia terrace that day?"

The woman's tightly closed eyes flew open. She had taken the bait.

 "It was your guardian. You turned away halfway through the act, but he didn't stop. He said he didn't know sex could be so good."

He moved his waist as if to recreate that moment.

 "Ah, ah, ah..."  "He rubbed his dick inside you until the end, he came inside without pulling out. He says he enjoyed you very much."  "...Did Edwin really do that?"

He lies as easily as he breathes, but this is true. Although he omitted the part about not knowing it was Giselle.

 "But, not seeing you as a woman? That's a blatant lie."

The pupils in the shadow were agitated. He didn't know if the woman was truly doubting his words, or if she was pretending to mock him again.
Chapter 105.
In any case, he had used poison.

Whether she succumbed to the poison or managed to shake it off without issuethat was up to her.

 "Do you think the Duke will recognize you as a woman?"  "...How?"  "If someone (it doesn't matter who) wildly thrusts their hips until, upon opening his eyes, he realizes that woman is you... after repeating it a few times, he will have no choice but to admit that you excite him."  "No. Don't do it. You promised me Edwin wouldn't find out."

She turned pale again, frightened. It was amusing.

 "It's okay. It will be our secret."  "Ah!"

As she covered her eyes, leaving her lips defenseless, I kissed them hard and shoved her hips upwards abruptly. At the same time that the cock, which was only halfway in, was swallowed completely, a clack! sound echoed across the high cabin ceiling.

Her breasts, crushed against her slender arms, shook violently. With just one thrust, one of her nipples slipped out and was left exposed, dangling. She didn't even notice it, gasping for breath. It was understandable. From the first assault, I had struck directly at the sensitive spot in front of her cervix.

Only when He pulled the cock out halfway and began to move with shallow strokes did she notice and try to cover her exposed nipple. Perhaps she was now conscious enough to understand what he was saying.

 "Don't you want to have sex with me? Then make me finish quickly."

Given the contradiction in his words ("If you don't want it, move your hips yourself"), she frowned at first, but soon seemed to realize he was right and began to move her hips shyly, clenching her abdomen to contract her interior around the penis. That alone was enough to make me dizzy.

 "Mmm, yes, like that... you're doing well."

She didn't react to the compliment laced with mockery. She didn't seem to have time for that. She wasn't on a soft mattress, but on a hard rug, and she already seemed exhausted just from moving her hips.

 "Do you need help?"

I extended my hands, offering support for her to hold onto.

 "It's not necessary."

Although she understood, she flatly refused and continued struggling in an uncomfortable posture, hugging her own legs and chest. Somehow, I felt dirty.

 "Don't stop. If you do, I'll show it to Edwin."

As soon as I threatened her, she accelerated the movement of her hips like someone being chased. It was funny. Although the feeling of disgust still lingered.

 "You want to keep it a secret, right?"

I whispered with a repulsive sweetness, synchronizing my movements with hers. What were previously only slight frictions became brutal.

Schllrp

Ripping her internal walls upon withdrawal, only to pierce them forcefully upon re-entry. My vision blurred. And when I violently struck the bottom with a paf!, every nerve in my body screamed in agony.

No. No. No. I hate it.

 "Ah, hng, mmh, haaah!"

Splash, splash, splash, splash.

 "Ugh... ah..."

The cabin, which only held peaceful memories with Edwin, now echoed with the sounds of two beasts mating. The more this impure act continued, the more those innocent moments faded.

I hate it.

Edwin's pure body and soul were also being defiled. By Giselle's body.

I hate it.

I had to end this. I clenched my teeth. The tension returned to my abdomen; the moment I tightly squeezed the cock invading my inside, that beast between my legs shuddered...

 "Ugh, damn it..."

The man cursed and stopped moving. Was he finished? Giselle slightly opened her eyes, which she had kept closed until now.

The man's body, erect over her like a giant, entered her vision. The lamplight licked his naked figure, marked by deep shadows, leaving traces of sweat.

 "Haaah..."

He pushed back the black hair that fell over his sharp nose and looked at her with burning eyes. As if he loved her.

Giselle. As if Edwin loved her.

I like it.

Then, he arched an eyebrow, confused, before imitating Giselle's smile. Edwin's lips, curved into a smile, met hers.

I like it.

 "Sweetheart, why are you smiling? Did you think I was finished?"

It's not Edwin.

I hate it.

Edwin is deeply asleep, violated by a woman he doesn't love and a demon he despises.

Hate. Hate. Hate. I like it. Hate. I like it. Hate.

The man started moving again, taking her once more between hell and paradise, but at one point, as if everything before had been just a prelude, he began to slam directly against the bottom over and over again. Without giving her time to react, he attacked her most sensitive spot with ferocity. Was there any way to resist?

Splash, splash, splash, splash.

I like it. I like it. I like it. I like it. I like it. I like it. I like it. I like it. I like it. I like it. I like it. I like it.

The instant a lightning-like pleasure shot through her body, a clap of thunder rumbled outside the window, reprimanding her. Her mind suddenly cleared.

...I like it?

Drunk on pleasure, Giselle trembled with disgust and wept.

She couldn't help it. While her body was impaled again and again by the cock of a man she didn't desire, shouting "I like it" like a lunatic, self-hatred consumed her.

Giselle knew it. For Edwin, it would have been better to sleep with a prostitute than to violate her. Therefore, offering her body instead of another woman's was the worst answer for him... but the only correct answer for her. In the end, she had made a selfish and ungrateful decision, just to save herself. And the worst part: she had ended up enjoying it. Now she was nothing more than the demon's accomplice.

 "I hate it. You hate me."  "Ah, no! Snff"

That woman... she kept moving her hips, enjoying it, but she was crying and screaming that she didn't want to. At first, it excited me to think that even though her mind rejected it, her body found sex with me so overwhelmingly pleasurable that she couldn't resist. But, for some reason, I felt dirtier and dirtier.

 "Lord... snff... I'm sorry..."

Ah, that's why.

I had never seriously thought about what it would feel like to rape a woman who was crying for another man. I assumed that, after all, it was sex, so it would be exciting. But reality taught me a lesson: even while fucking her, I could feel like shit.

Who the hell learns lessons while fucking?

He was only seeking solace in that woman's body. Since Edwin Eccleston started having suicidal tendencies, he hadn't been able to rest for a second, even when lending him his body. Every moment was lived in tension. Exhausting days.

And today, to top it all off, he had fallen into a rain-swollen river. The current dragged him several meters, but he managed to swim to the shore by holding onto a float. Perhaps he should be grateful that the duke had good physical condition and knew how to swim. Ironic: the same one who threw him in the water "saved" him.

He wasn't grateful, of course. And now, as a sort of revenge, he was using the body that man cared for like a daughter to do something so wicked.

But, in reality, he was the one who suffered.

 "Hey, do you know who you are sleeping with?"

With Edwin Eccleston? It's his body, after all.

What fucking crap. He wanted to maintain a refined language, as befitted an intellectual, but some situations could only be described with vulgar words. This was a shitty world where it was difficult to maintain dignity.

 "I should have fucked her to the end when she only saw 'me'."

Too late to regret not having pushed her against the wall of his house and blasted her right there.

 "How do I make her recognize me?"

The face was Edwin's. The voice, Edwin's. Everything she could see, hear, and feel was him. There was no escape.

But the feelings...

 "'Itch that disappears when you scratch it'? Who is scratching now?"

The provocation worked. Her lamentations suddenly ceased. Her eyes, previously glazed over, regained focus and fixed on him. Now she only saw him.

If Edwin Eccleston had monopolized her senses, he would steal her reason. He would throw back the words she had only directed at him. That way, she would have no choice but to accept that the one with her was not the man she loved.

 "Fly a plane? No, I don't know. And you?"

He barely slid his thumb over her clitoris, and she arched her hips, squeezing and sucking him with her inside.

 "You're good."  "Hah... Don't... do that..."  "Why didn't the Stahlschmidt fighters make it to the front? I don't know. Your sensitive spots? I'm the one who knows them best in the world."  "Ahhk!"  "I also know very well why, even though you beat me with your upper mouth, you ended up surrendering the lower one to me."

She looked at him with eyes flooded with tears.

 "Yes, hate me. Hate 'me'."
Chapter 106.
 "How does it feel to be beneath a nobody like me? Ah, I see... your bottom mouth will answer for you."

Slap, slosh.

With rough thrusts of his hips, the wet sounds of skin rubbing became obscene, and the woman, teeth clenched, spat out a vulgarity:

 "Shut up."  "What did you say? I couldn't hear you... your hole is too noisy."

Her eyes were bloodshot, as if she wanted to kill him right then.

Perfect. I like that. Don't forget that the one you're rolling around with now is not the man you love.

Concentrated again on the pleasure burning up from his waist, the woman, who until then had only swallowed her rage and gasped, suddenly spoke unexpected words:

 "Hold my hand."

After refusing earlier, now, when he least expected itand at the worst momentshe asked for help. Had she finally decided to endure until the end, even if it meant intertwining her fingers with the man she wished to kill?

 "With pleasure."

He grabbed her extended hand, intertwined their fingers, and crushed it against the floor beside her head. The man's body completely covered hers. Pressed, trapped, impaled... even in that humiliating position, where she had been mercilessly conquered, the woman looked at him defiantly and began to move her hips.

Smack, smack, smack.

The man responded to her clumsy attempts with more brutal thrusts.

 "Ah!"

The instant their bodies collided, the woman closed her eyes and crumpled her face, finally losing her fierce gaze. Unable to bear the pleasure invading her, she shuddered, yet without fear, she charged into him as if she wanted to pierce him with her sex deep inside.

 "Hngh ah ah there yes..."

Incredible. Before she resisted and lied, but now she was being honest. Her movements also gave her away.

Her body, without shame, revealed how much she was enjoying the act. Her abdomen, glistening with sweat, tensed every time he plunged into her; her breasts, with erect nipples, shook to the rhythm of his thrusts.

 "Ah!"

A moan escaped her red lips as she arched her back.

 "Mmm..."

The sensation of her tight inside enveloping him, plus the sight of her half-closed eyes and her tongue tracing her lower lip... the man understood why so many warriors throughout history had fallen for a fragile beauty.

She has something that bewitches men. And if it was her intention to seduce him... she had already succeeded.

 "Yes... there... don't stop..."  "Damn it..."

Although his mind was scattered, unable to concentrate on the pleasure, orgasm hit him suddenly.

 "Ah... ah... ah!"

The moment she sucked him into the abyss, he surrendered without resistance.

He forgot all the exhaustion and worries, submerged in extreme happiness. The pleasure he felt with her was comparable, yet distinct, from the ecstasy of humiliating her arrogant Lord.

With Edwin Eccleston, the pleasure was cold as steel or hot as hell. Extreme, sharp as a double-edged sword. But with Giselle Bishop... it was warm, almost tender, harmless.

Really harmless?

 "Haah..."

In that moment of intense vitality, when death seemed more terrifying than ever, the man, invaded by a primal fear, embraced the fragile woman as if she were his only support.

I was born to find you...

It was in these moments of vulnerabilitywhen his head and heart falteredthat she had deceived him before. And that's why it was also when she was most dangerous.

He brought his cheek to hers, sharing a tender kiss, before asking:

 "Did you like it?"

She, still submerged in ecstasy, looked at him with sleepy eyes and nodded.

How cute...

I cannot die before you.

When he was about to seal their lips again, she wrapped her arms around him and pulled him into a deep kiss. Separating, she buried her face in his neck.

 "Hey... if you want to do it again, you can come see me in secret. But without other women. And this... must remain our secret."  "Of course. With pleasure."

Had she finally given in?

But as soon as they resumed their game, he knew he had been tricked. Only when she sprung her trapjust as she saw the clockdid he understand it was all a ruse.

 "Take me home before it's too late. That way no one will know."

It was her strategy: feign surrender, distract him, and escape. She had calculated that, in his moment of greatest satisfaction and weakness, it would work.

Cunning fox.

Now he understood why she had said, "your embrace is so warm that I almost forget my revenge." She must have guessed when he was most vulnerable... and used it to her advantage.

Should I thank her for preventing me from falling into my stupid illusion tonight?

 "Ha..."

The man let out a scornful laugh. Take her home? Giselle's lips, previously soaked with his saliva, were now dry.

What the hell are you planning by bringing me here?

He must have a reason for seeking her out.

The condom and the lit fireplace had been prepared by the caretaker. That is, the man had contacted him before coming.

Did he want to bring me here from the beginning?

Does he really plan to lock me up forever? But he said that wasn't his intention...

If it were only for sexual desire, there was no need to take her this far.

Giselle felt a sinister premonition: that he had brought her for a reason she couldn't even imagine. She tried to dissuade him, offering herself in exchange, but it didn't work.

 "Thank you for tonight."

Because locking her up had nothing to do with lust... nor with revenge.

 "Let's rest here."  "Here?"

He dressed her only in a damp robe and dragged her to the basement. She resisted more fiercely than when he violated her, but she couldn't overpower him.

Bang!

The door slammed shut. Giselle pulled on it and screamed:

 "If I don't go back, you will be a kidnapper! If you are going to commit that crime anyway, why should I obey you?! I won't stay put!"  "Escape? Go ahead. I never said you couldn't."

Click!

The sound of the bolt mocked her hope.

 "Why are you doing this? Do you think killing me this way gives you revenge?"  "Killing you, what an exaggeration... I need you to be alive. So be careful, okay?"  "You don't need to lock me up! I'll give you whatever you want!"  "You're wrong. It's not for revenge... nor for my desire."  "Then?"  "Survival."  "Survival?"  "Do you remember I asked you how you cut your wrist? I'm sorry, I lied. It's a suicide wound. From your beloved Lord."

Suicide? The man noticed her confusion and, on the other side of the door, spoke clearly:

 "Giselle, your Lord tried to commit suicide. Over and over again. If I hadn't saved him, the one who would be underground... would be me. Isn't that a relief?"

It was true... The premonition that he might kill himself suffocated her. She gasped:

 "Why... would he want to do that? Because of... me?"

The man's scornful laughter pierced the door:

 "No, because of me, obviously. For wanting to kill me. Well, you helped. 'A parasite that kills its host is a failed parasite.' That phrase gave me an idea."

My God... Giselle covered her mouth too late.

 "I can't die yet. You would want my death, but not his, would you? Then stay here."

The real reason for the kidnapping was...

 "As long as he doesn't know where I've hidden you, the Duke won't be able to die."

...To prevent his suicide.
Chapter 107.
 "Escape? Try it. Then I can commit suicide in peace."

The hand that was pounding on the door slid slowly down, powerless. Behind the door, the man laughed as if he had seen the whole scene with his own eyes.

 "Good. Now we are on the same side."

There was no other choice.

 "Well then, see you later, beautiful."

When Edwin opened his eyes in his bedroom, illuminated by the dawn, the first thing he felt was a profound sense of powerlessness at the fact that he was still alive.

Damned bastard.

It was inevitable that rage would cloud any other feeling towards the person who had kept him alive.

If that wretch takes my body, I need a death from which he won't even have a chance to escape.

He had to wait for the moment when he was exhausted. Immediately upon waking, Edwin looked for a number he never thought he would resort to and made a call.

 "I'll get straight to the point. I want to get rid of someone."

On the other end of the line was a troublesome soldier from the unit Edwin had commanded in his captain days. Being the son of a mafia boss, he undoubtedly understood what those words meant. And yet, he asked. Perhaps because he couldn't believe something like that would come from the mouth of a commander known for his strict rectitude.

 "Yes, I need a hitman."

One who will kill me.

The man on the other side began to talk about how the price varied depending on the target. Edwin was about to ask him how much assisted suicide would cost for someone of his status, a duke, when...

Knock, knock.

 "Your Excellency, there is an urgent report."

From the other side of the bedroom door, his assistant's urgent voice was heard.

 "I'll call you back later."

Edwin hung up the phone and placed it on the table.

 "Come in."

The assistant entered with a gloomy face. Lately, he always had that worried expression. Whether he was dealing with someone obsessed with suicide or murder, in the end, he was always dealing with a lunatic. Edwin thought that would be the reason once again... but this time it was different.

 "We received a call from one of the maids at Magnolia Terrace."

At this hour?

 "Did something happen to Miss Bishop?"  "She has disappeared."  "When? Tell me everything in detail."

The assistant accurately conveyed the maid's words: upon waking this morning, she discovered that Giselle was not home. From the circumstances, it seemed unlikely that she had left of her own accord. Furthermore, the signs were clear.

A kidnapping?

The news struck like lightning on a clear sky, leaving him stunned. But it was no time to be in shock.

 "Call the police immediately and have a car ready."

As he stood up and headed to the dressing room to get dressed, Edwin passed by the chess table and suddenly stopped dead.

A piece was missing.

The white bishop was not in its place. Bishop had disappeared.

Where is your bishop?

In the empty space where the piece should be, someone had scribbled a message in handwriting that was too familiar:

You surely understood it already, but let me explain it anyway.

If you die, I won't be the only one.

She will die too.

Giselle's kidnapper... was none other than himself.

The same feet with which he was now hastily getting out of the car were the ones that walked last night under the torrential rain through a dark neighborhood until reaching the last house.

The same hands that were now clenching with frustration were the ones that dragged her through that open window.

The scarf hanging, waving like a ripped flag on the windowsill, the crushed and broken bushes under the window evidenced that there had been a struggle.

Giselle would never have been able to overcome his strength. Therefore, she was kidnapped.

...But where to? How?

Everything he knew about the kidnapping, he was deducing from the crime scene. He remembered absolutely nothing. Asking himself where he had taken her was useless: he had no answers.

Impotence turned into anger with himself. It was at that moment that a red-haired woman, who looked to be around twenty-six, ran towards him.

 "I'm sorry, Major."

It was Rita Dawson, Giselle's bodyguard.

 "It's not your fault. The culprit is me."  "What...?"

It was natural that she didn't understand what she had just heard, as she didn't have the context. She merely blinked with a perplexed expression, which gave her an even more naive air than usual. Edwin now remembered that face perfectly. He also remembered that she was someone he could trust.

 "Dawson, have you heard of Dissociative Identity Disorder?"  "Yes... I've read about it in novels, I think."  "Well, this time you'll see it in real life."

Edwin quickly summarized the essentials: that he had dissociative identity disorder and that his other personality was responsible for Giselle's kidnapping. It was information Dawson needed to know.

When he finished explaining, she still looked utterly bewildered.

 "With all due respect... is this a joke?"  "Do I look like I'm in the mood to joke?"  "Of course not."  "Question the neighbors. Find out if anyone heard any noise between midnight and five in the morning."

Edwin remembered that, before throwing himself into the river, the tower clock hands were about to strike midnight. According to his butler, he had returned home after five in the morning. The kidnapping must have occurred in that time frame.

 "Don't let the slightest sound escape you. Any witness would be a great help."

Although her appearance might make her seem clueless, Dawson was meticulous in her work. In the military, she excelled at everything from reconnaissance missions to espionage. She was much more reliable than an unknown police officer.

 "Do it before the neighbors leave for work or the children go to school. If necessary, use the assistants I brought with me too."  "Understood. I... but, there is something else."  "Speak."

Dawson looked at him cautiously before asking:

 "You don't remember anything?"  "If I remembered anything, do you think I would be here?"  "Understood! I'm sorry!"

As he watched Dawson's silhouette running towards the neighboring houses, Edwin let out a sigh full of frustration. But Dawson was not the target of his anger.

He knew her question, although it sounded stupid, was inevitable. If Edwin remembered what happened, they wouldn't need to question anyone. No, this anger was not against her. It was against himself.

Why can't I see that bastard's memories?

The impotence at the limits of his own mind filled him with repulsion.

But he can see all of mine.

Right now, in every instant that Edwin searched for Giselle, that other one, his alter ego, would be comfortably installed in his mind, observing his every move.

It was like playing poker with someone who already knew all his cards. How could one win a game like that?

He needed someone to hold the cards for him.

Someone who had been close to that sinister personality longer than anyone. Someone with enough power to act on his behalf and use all the private resources he had available as a duke.

 "Call Loise."

Loise arrived immediately. After hearing the full account, his first question was the one Edwin least wanted to answer.

 "Why would he kidnap Miss Bishop?"

Loise didn't know what Edwin had been obsessed with lately. He had given strict orders that no one discuss the matter. But if he was going to find out eventually, perhaps it was better to do so directly from his mouth.

 "To prevent me from committing suicide."

Loise instantly paled.

 "My God, Your Excellency..."  "I'm sorry, Loise. You haven't recovered from the shock of last time, have you?"  "Your Excellency..."  "You don't have to look like that. I'm not going to die anymore. Better use that time to find Giselle."

But Loise didn't respond immediately. He seemed to hesitate.

 "What's wrong?"  "Of course we must find her, but... as long as we don't know where she is, at least that will prevent you from doing something terrible. I can't help but wonder if we should really find her so quickly."  "If I promise you that I will never try to commit suicide again, will you look for her without objections?"

Loise looked at him seriously before replying:

 "That promise has to be kept, Your Excellency. If you break it... I will follow you to hell itself."

Seeing Loise finally relieved, swearing to find Giselle in his place, Edwin had a sudden thought.

Perhaps the kidnapper also expected a promise like that.

'Promise me that if I return Giselle to you, you will never try to commit suicide again or torment me with those ideas.'

The demon in his mind reacted immediately.

'Tsk.'

A mocking laugh.

You disgusting rodent.

So that's what it was about. He wanted to take it all the way. Bet everything on Giselle's safety.

An enemy who could read all his thoughts... And now, the most valuable thing to him was at stake. This would be the most difficult and dangerous battle Edwin had ever faced in his life.

 "We've finished questioning the neighbors, Major."

Just as his conversation with Loise ended, Dawson returned with her report.

 "A woman from the house next door says she heard a man's and a woman's voices last night. It was between midnight and one in the morning. She looked at the clock and, since everything calmed down, she went back to sleep. But shortly after, she woke up hearing the man's voice again. She doesn't remember what he said. Then, she heard the sound of a car door closing, followed by total silence."  "A car?"
Chapter 108.
Giselle's car is in the garage.

 "He called a taxi."

It was logical to assume that it was Giselle who requested it. He wouldn't have called a taxi without first ensuring he could get her out of the house. Perhaps he arrived by taxi from the beginning, but no kidnapper would drag a woman through the window in front of a strange driver.

 "Check Giselle's notepad or call every taxi company in the phone book. Find out which taxi arrived at Magnolia Terrace at that time."  "Yes, I will."

As soon as Dawson answered and turned to go up to Giselle's bedroom, Edwin stopped her with a look. He couldn't forget the most crucial instruction.

 "And don't report to me. From now on, assume the kidnapper is always listening."  "Ah... Understood."  "Confide everything to Loise. Do not trust me."

He dismissed her with a final warning: if Edwin gave an illogical order, it was a sign that the demon was speaking through him. Now it was Loise's turn.

 "Mobilize all possible resources. If you need the police, you can file a report."

But they wouldn't yet. Filing a report meant mentioning the kidnapper... or not mentioning him. The police wouldn't understand that the perpetrator was also the one alerting them. If they feigned ignorance, they would search for the culprit first, not Giselle, which would only be a hindrance.

Although that was his analysis. He gave Loise the freedom to decide, but the latter shook his head.

 "We will keep the police out of it until there is no other option."  "Why as a last resort? My reputation doesn't matter as much as her safety."

Loise believed both were equally important, but he chose words that would resonate with the Duke:

 "But Miss Bishop also has a reputation to protect."

A kidnapped woman. A guardian as the perpetrator. Duke Eccleston. The press would swoop down like vultures, twisting the facts into a sordid scandal.

Seeing Edwin rub his brow, he knew he shared that concern.

 "After all, he won't either..."

Loise swallowed as he thought of those shadowy eyes: perhaps the demon was watching them right now.

 "He won't hurt Miss Bishop. We will proceed cautiously to avoid mistakes."

The Duke nodded, still pressing his temples.

 "You are in charge. Bring her back safe and sound."  "Of course, Your Excellency."

After delegating everything to Loise, Edwin returned to the Eccleston Residence. He had never felt so useless. He would do anything to find Giselle, but that meant doing nothing. The impotence of having power and not being able to use it.

There was only one task that only he could do: take sleeping pills before the lunatic used his body again. But he discarded the idea upon considering the consequences.

If the demon died, Giselle died. And if he only slept? Who would look after her?

The well-being of an angel depended on the claws of a demon.

Edwin narrowed his eyes, noticing something on his hands: small curved cuts, like eyelashes, between his knuckles.

When did they appear?

He never inspected this body destined to rot, but he was sure they weren't there yesterday.

They were peculiar: thin scabs in identical patterns on both hands.

Suddenly, his face froze.

He brought his nail close to the largest wound. It didn't match in size, but it did in shape.

They were nail marks.

Giselle's.

They weren't from a struggle: their location and shape didn't fit. Only one situation explained those wounds on both hands simultaneously, and that idea clung to his mind like a claw.

Sexual act.

Last night. With Giselle. In this body.

A deep anger turned into blasphemies between his teeth... until disgust choked him. Loise's voice echoed like a broken record:

'He won't hurt Miss Bishop...'

Wrong.

That demon... I... I already hurt her.

He found no other wounds. Giselle had not resisted.

That submission shattered him. She, obediently, holding his hands while he...

He clenched his fists until his nails pierced his skin. It wasn't enough. Tearing this filthy body would only alleviate a fraction of his guilt.

But he couldn't.

To live without being able to die.

Nothing better described Edwin's hell.

They found the taxi company that sent a vehicle to Magnolia Terrace last night on the first try. Thanks to Miss Bishop calling the first option in the phone book.

Discovering where he dropped off the passenger was surprisingly easy. Dawson went to the company and said her "sister" had disappeared after taking that taxi. The employee checked the log without asking questions.

Oxley Central Station.

 "Is there any place nearby that His Excellency frequents?"

Dawson and Loise assumed that the Duke's alter ego wouldn't have had time to prepare a completely new hiding spot. He must have locked her up in some family property.

 "Oxley..."

They checked the Duke's personal and ducal property records, but there was nothing near the station.

 "So he went to a hotel?"  "Nothing is more insecure for holding a hostage. Cleaning staff coming in, reception with master keys... If she screams, everyone will hear her."  "He could demand privacy and gag her..."

Loise remembered that some suffocated with prolonged gags. He sent agents to Oxley immediately.

But after hours of searching, there were no results.

Loise was desperate. Dawson was not.

 "Won't he go to Miss Bishop today?"

The kidnapper himself was the best clue. By following him, they would find her.

 "Of course we will keep watch... but I doubt it will be useful."

Loise knew that demon was not easy to follow.

 "Haven't you found Bishop yet?"

Past midnight, the "Duke"no, the demonasked. The Duke never called her that.

 "Why?"

He seemed genuinely perplexed that they hadn't solved it.

 "Finding the taxi driver shouldn't be difficult. How strange."

Loise remained silent. He wouldn't give clues to the enemy. The demon shrugged and went to the dressing room. He put on a trench coat. He was preparing to leave.
Chapter 109.
“Bring me a new mint.”

While taking out personal items like his wallet from the drawer to put them in his pockets, the man tossed the tin of mints into the trash. In a tone of authority that not even the Duke himself would use, he gave the order to Loise.

“Before that, call that woman’s maid and tell her that if her mistress doesn't want to live with just a nightgown, to bring clothes immediately. Shoes too. I didn't have time yesterday, and I carried her barefoot. Ah, is there any food in the kitchen? Load it into the car; poor Miss Bishop surely hasn't tasted anything warm all day.”

Assisting in a kidnapping and confinement? Loise felt indignation stiffen his neck as he listened to those brazen commands. But, far from refusing, he had no choice but to obey.

If he wants to go with Giselle, let him. If he asks for something, you decide whether to give it to him or not.

It was an order from Edwin. Although, for a moment, Loise doubted if it was actually the devil posing as him. But, upon reflection, these were words the Duke himself would have said. After all, that devil was the only one who could look after Miss Bishop now.

“Oh, right. Have a car prepared. No need to clarify that I don’t want a chauffeur, right?” “Understood.”

And only if you let him go, will you be able to track him.

“I don’t need escorts either. What, are they going to follow me? Then I won't go. I'm quite shy, you know.”

If the tracking even works...

Of course, Loise considered ignoring the warning and sending discreet surveillance. But, on these empty streets at dawn, would they truly go unnoticed? And if they kept too much distance, they would lose sight of him, making the tracking useless.

When Loise quickly prepared the car with clothes and food for Miss Bishop, the man let out a mocking laugh. Seeing the white sedan, easily visible even at night, he seemed to realize Loise's intention to track him. Still, he didn't ask to change the vehicle and simply got into the driver’s seat.

“Any message for Bishop?” 

Loise, increasingly stunned by his boundless insolence, stared at him fixedly, as if that familiar face now seemed like a stranger. How had someone as upright as Edwin ended up possessed by such a lunatic?

“I’ll see her tomorrow, so there’s no need for messages.”

Provocation with provocation. Faced with Loise's firm response, the man laughed disdainfully again before starting the engine. Loise, from the street, watched the car drive away and prayed:

May the other plan, prepared for this situation, succeed, please.

“Creak.”

The door that seemed sealed forever finally opened. Seeing her hopeful face, his brilliant blue eyes clouded over again upon hearing his unfriendly tone.

“Why didn't you eat? You barely drank anything. Is this a hunger strike?”

The man clicked his tongue, seeing the fruit basket and water jug he had left intact. As if he cared whether Giselle ate or not.

“Ah, is it that in this miserable place you can't perform your refined necessities?”

Only upon noticing that the bucket he left for her as a “bathroom” was empty did he understand why Giselle hadn’t eaten or drunk, and he let out a sarcastic comment:

“The Duke raised you like a princess, and now you’ve forgotten your peasant days, eh? Hey, little Duke, you should have followed your aunt's advice: raise someone who knows their place.”

Giselle, huddled in a corner without reacting, now pretended that he was talking to Edwin.

Do you think I’ll fall for it again?

Unlike the day before, she didn't even look at him until the man extended his hand first.

“Your Royal Highness, this humble jester wishes to cheer you up. Why don't you come out?”

He says "cheer me up" when he is really ordering me upstairs. But she couldn't stay there, so Giselle followed him up the stairs.

Outside, the darkness was as dense as when she was locked in the basement. Seeing the wall clock, Giselle understood that an entire day had passed there.

What could have happened outside while I was kidnapped? Do they even know I’ve disappeared?

Dazed, she looked at the cabin, identical to the day before, as if nothing had happened, until her gaze fell upon the man in front of her. At least one thing was clear:

Edwin didn't kill himself today.

Thank God.

Though, of course, staying locked up for life wasn't a viable plan. Nor was giving up her life the only way to save his.

It was time to execute the escape plan she had devised in the basement. But hunger and dehydration were clouding her mind, making it difficult even to remember the details. While she remained paralyzed, the man tossed her clothes (clearly brought from her house) and pushed her toward the bathroom.

“To save yourself the effort: don’t even try to open the bathroom window. It’s nailed shut.”

It was true. The only window had nails embedded in the frame, impossible to move. She could break the glass, but the man would surely be waiting outside to catch her as she fell.

Damn it, he’s meticulous.

She gave up on escaping through the bathroom. Why would he give her clothes if he only wanted to strip her? After washing, the man led her to the kitchen.

Didn't he say he would prepare food? The stew in the pot looked ready, but it was cold. Looking at him confused, he made an awkward, out-of-place gesture:

“It seems the little Duke doesn't know how to use a wood stove. Someone as exquisite as you would never do something so vulgar.”

Edwin only knows how to heat military rations in the field. He didn't cook this. It must have been brought from the Duke’s residence.

So they know I was kidnapped?

Devouring the food, the answer came with a brazen comment:

“Good puppies eat and behave well. That way, their Lord doesn’t worry. Did you know he didn't eat anything today thinking about you?”

She served food onto his plate, but he, offended, returned it:

“Why do you worry about a pureblood who never went hungry? You, a street mongrel, aren’t even a worthy dog.”

Is he… jealous?

Perhaps he wasn't envious of her, but of Edwin. After all, that man only knew how to despise what he couldn't have.

When Giselle returned the food to the pot, he lit a cigarette and looked at her furiously.

Chapter 110.
 "Why don't you eat more? Is our beggar princess offended because I insulted the perfect Duke?"  "If you eat too much after starving, it's bad for your health."

It was a lesson Giselle had learned as a child. The day that man rescued her, facing the first decent meal of her life, she choked, devouring it like a beast. Even when the stomach pain doubled her over, she kept eating.

'Maybe tomorrow there will be nothing.'

Now, with a full stomach, that fear seemed ridiculous. But back then, she had survived on crumbs for a month.

At first, the man served her more food every time she asked, until he abruptly stopped:

 "You would die if you gorge yourself after starvation."

Giselle didn't believe him. Among the Roslein, food was too valuable to waste on useless mouths. So she stole food secretly.

The next day, she paid the price: her body swelled until it almost burst.

 "Ah... right."

Did he find that memory in the man's mind? His bitter eyes were fixed on her.

Does my past taste bitter to you? That cigarette will taste more bitter.

Giselle drank her tea, challenging the demon with an angel's face. He didn't insist she eat more, but offered something unexpected:

 "Do you want to smoke one?"

She shook her head. The silence that followed was dense, dangerous.

There were only two options: lock her up again or undress her. She decided to speak first:

 "Hey..."

Start a conversation.

The man moved the cigarette away from his lips, but instead of answering, he exhaled smoke and arrogantly arched an eyebrow, crossing his legs.

Who does this bastard think he is?

Giselle dug her nails into her palms and asked in a docile voice:

 "What's your name?"

His brow furrowed, as if flicking the ashes into the dish required his full attention. He only spoke upon putting the cigarette back in his mouth:

 "Lorenz von Eisenhardt."  "That's not true."

Crack.

The cigarette crunched between his teeth. The sound was a warning. Giselle's mouth snapped shut; his opened to spit out poisoned words:

 "I was born with that name."

Since he gained consciousness, he knew he was the hero of Constanza, Baron Lorenz von Eisenhardt. It was a truth rooted in his being... until the owner of his body called him a "rootless parasite" and severed that only bond.

 "Who are you to deny it? The pet of that arrogant brat?"

Giselle backed away. He had admitted earlier that he wasn't Lorenz, but now...

 "I just wanted to know your name. Why are you getting angry?"  "Then tell me: what am I?"

The question paralyzed her. Between his fingers, the cigarette's ember glowed like a red eye. A demon watching her.

The silence became suffocating. He was the one who broke it:

 "If you can't answer me, don't deny me my name. It's... irresponsible."

He crushed the cigarette against the table until it snapped in two and stood up. The chair screeched. When he grabbed Giselle's wrist, her heart stopped.

 "If you're finished, come with me."

He didn't undress her. He led her to the cabin entrance and threw her trench coat at her.

Are we leaving already?

It was bad news: if they locked her up again, escaping would be impossible.

 "Get your coat from the bag."

She thought he was referring to the cold in the basement.

 "Just that? It's cold outside..."  "...I'm going out too?"  "I brought the car. How about a drive?"

A kidnapper inviting her on a "romantic drive"?

It was absurd. He was furious, but he acted as if he were offering her a date.

What the hell is he planning?

There seemed to be another hidden purpose to this "drive," something Giselle didn't understand. She thought perhaps he wanted to move her somewhere else, but he left her bag of clothes in the cabin when they got into the car, so it probably wasn't that.

Does he not consider that I might try to escape?

The answer came immediately, though she didn't want it: as soon as they got into the car, the man handcuffed her wrists together.

The car descended the mountain until it reached the asphalt. There was no trace of civilization in the middle of that forest, just impenetrable darkness beyond the headlights. As black as Giselle's thoughts.

Turning toward the window, her eyes met her own reflection in the glass. While she planned her next move, the manwho was drumming the steering wheel and humming with irritating carelessnesssuddenly asked:

 "Do you want me to teach you how to drive? Since he can't do it anymore because of me... how about I apologize by being your teacher?"

Apologize? Did he even know what remorse was?

 "No, thank you," she answered curtly.

Silence returned, but this time without his hateful humming. It was just as unsettling as during dinner, although speaking carelessly before had only made things worse. Now she kept her mouth shut, ignoring even when the man cleared his throat.

 "Are you angry?"

Giselle's eyes widened in her reflection.

Seriously? He asks me that? When had her mood ever mattered to him? She had already told him she didn't expect affection, that hatred didn't affect him.

She didn't answer. Not even when he brazenly toyed with the handcuff chain.

 "Is nothing else interesting to you besides my name?"

She was tempted to reply with a sharp "no," but...

He was the one who got furious earlier over an innocent question. It hurts not to even know who you are.

Still, now she knew something about him. The more she discovered, the more vulnerabilities she would find. Perhaps she could use them. For that, she had to flatter his ego.

 "I have many questions," she said, sliding her gaze toward him.

 "Many?"

His pupils shone in the face of the road, unable to hide his excitement.

 "Ask."  "Can you control Edwin's body whenever you want, hide and return memories...?"  "That's right."

Men always boasted about their abilities. Like males in nature, showing their strength to scare off rivals and attract females.

Is it instinct?

He was no different. Just by saying "that's right," his arrogance was already evident.

 "How do you do it?"

Most men didn't need to be asked to brag. But if a woman showed interest...

They wouldn't be able to help but empty their last secrets.

And him? Would he be the same?
Chapter 111.
 "I don't know."  "Why don't you know?"  "It's an innate ability. If someone is born blind, could they explain to you how they see the world?"

On the surface, it sounded like an analogy adapted to Giselle's level, but upon second thought, the man was merely belittling any ordinary person who didn't possess his ability, reducing them to simple defective handicapped individuals.

 "Wow, how boring."

As soon as she uttered those simple words that pricked his pride, the man's mouth opened again. This time, he spoke longer.

 "The world I live in is composed of many doors and rooms. I know exactly where and how to hide or reveal my memories in those countless rooms. And as for the body... there is a special door. If I open it, I step out to the front of consciousness and take control of the body and mind."

Did he skip the part where he kicked out the true owner of that room?

 "What's special about that door? Is it different from the others?"  "Why? Are you going to tell Edwin?"

Had he opened the doors inside my mind without permission too?

 "You'll have to know him to find out."

Giselle didn't try to deny being found out and deliberately grumbled so he could hear.

 "Then, can you open that special door at any moment?"  "Usually."

That meant there were times when he couldn't. She was curious, but if she asked, the conversation would only be cut short, as he would never reveal information that could harm him.

 "Then, could you keep the old man's body forever?"  "Of course."

In an instant, fear flooded her, and she felt goosebumps even on the back of her hand. The man, who was playing with his fingers, smiled a twisted smirk upon noticing her reaction.

Is he just bragging again to scare me?

Like that time when he swore he could kill someone with his tongue. Giselle watched him cautiously.

 "Then why don't you do it? That way you wouldn't have to keep clashing with that old man you hate so much."  "Do you really believe that?"

Screeeech.

Suddenly, the man stopped the car in the middle of the road. His eyes, which moments ago were fixed on the road, turned to Giselle. They reflected no light, only madness.

 "Do you want me to kill the consciousness of your Lord and keep this body forever... and love you? After all, he already wants to die, so it would be fine by him. And on my part, I'd get rid of an enemy. And you?"

Giselle felt she was facing a rabid dog about to bite her. She had to gather all her strength not to show her fear.

 "I don't just love a person's shell."  "Ah, you love his heart? That cold heart that doesn't even love you?"

The rabid dog had bitten right where she already had an infected, weeping wound. It was only rotten, but not dead, so it still hurt.

 "Think about it carefully. Am I not better than a man who doesn't love you? I only love you."  "And what good is your love to me if I don't love you?"

In reality, she wanted to yell something much worse: "I don't need the love of a disgusting leech that lives attached to someone else's body, unable to be grateful for it, a stupid parasite that almost kills its own host." But she softened it several times before letting it out.

Aun así, tal vez fue suficiente veneno. El hombre apretó los dientes con tanta fuerza que su mandíbula se marcó con tensión.

 "I can't even kill you."  "Because if I die, you will die too."

She released a brazen affirmation with total certainty and a radiant smile. The man's gaze changed. From the unpredictable madness of a lunatic to the common expression of any boy.

 "Ah...!"

As if he couldn't bear her audacity, the man gently pushed her forehead with his index finger before concentrating on the road again. Giselle had a hunch that, after all, he couldn't keep Edwin's body forever.

 "Then why don't you do it? That way you wouldn't have to keep clashing with that Lord you hate so much."

He avoided answering the question by diverting the conversation and trying to scare her. But with that, Giselle already had her answer. So she moved on to the next one.

 "Could you make my Lord fall in love with me?"

His eyes, which had returned to the road, went back to Giselle with a look of pure annoyance. Without saying a word, he made it clear he was displeased with her obsession over his unrequited love.

 "I'm not asking you to do it. It wouldn't be real; I don't want it. I only say that, if anything, don't do it."

Only a case she heard in a microbiology class about parasites that manipulate their hosts had come to mind.

 "If you ask me if I could manipulate him to do something against his will or provoke non-existent feelings, the theoretical answer is 'yes,' but the realistic answer is 'I won't.'"  "Why?"  "Because it requires much greater effort than simply taking control of his body. I'm not the only one with free will; he has it too. Besides, I have my own rules and my pride. If I change my enemy to my convenience just to win easily, could I say I defeated him cleanly? That would be cheating."

A crawling parasite talking about ethics and pride... Well, there was nothing like talking to a normal person to have a logical conversation.

 "But hiding your memories from my Lord is something you can do, and is that fair too? Because, after all, they are yours."  "Exactly."  "Then..."

Giselle turned completely towards him and leaned closer.

 "Could you erase a week of my Lord's memories?"

The dawn when Giselle became an adult, the moment that man appeared, and up to the instant Edwin discovered the truth... If he could hide all those memories, could she go back to the time when Edwin didn't know she loved him?

If that were possible, then, even though that man was the cause of all this disaster, Giselle would thank him and gladly pay any price.

 "A week? Ah..."

The man understood immediately which period she was referring to without needing to ask.

 "That's impossible. It's a very valuable memory for me."  "I'm only asking you to hide it from my Lord. Let it be something just between us. Please. I will do anything."

She clung to him, even though he was someone she wanted to hitno, beat to death if possible. But the bastard only smiled smugly.

 "Ours?"

He seemed pleased to intentionally repeat the word Giselle had chosen with care. But even so, he didn't give in. Not even when she offered him anything in return.

 "You know? Our valuable memory was on the verge of being reduced to ashes. I had to hide it very, very well to save it."  "...Reduced to ashes? How?"  "Electroshock therapy."  "...What?"  "Your Lord wanted to kill the guy who touched you, so he scorched his brain with electricity."

As Giselle turned paler than a corpse, the man burst into laughter, as if what he had just told her was the funniest thing in the world.

 "His memory was full of holes, like Swiss cheese. He could forget anything else, but our fiery memories... That, never. So I carefully stored them, and as soon as his electro-roasting session was over, I gave them back to him."  "..."  "Tell me, beautiful, have you been listening to me? I endured the pain of the flesh burning just to protect those memories. And you think I'm going to erase them just because you ask me to?"

But Giselle wasn't even listening. She was still trapped in the shock of what she had just heard.

 "Did my Lord really receive electroshock therapy...?"

That brutal treatment that could cause brain damage and even death.

 "It can't be... With Professor Fletcher?"  "Exactly."  "No... No..."

Tears gushed out suddenly, blurring her vision, so she couldn't see the expression of the demon looking at her. The face floating blurredly before me only seemed like that of a Lord who was too good to harm her, someone like my Lord.

 "Lord, I... sniff I did wrong."

Giselle collapsed and hugged Edwin.

 "I shouldn't have let myself be fooled by that crazy con artist, sniff, because of me, Lord, sniff, please don't make decisions you shouldn't... sniff I'm sorry, Lord."  "Stop it now."  "Please, could you never do that again? If you suffer, I suffer too."  "Do I look like your Lord? I told you to step away."  "If you die, I will die too."  "Ah, this is... why are you clinging like this while I'm driving?"

The man tried to peel Giselle off him as she cried and clung, but when he couldn't, he stopped the car on the side of the road and murmured some curses.

 "How disgusting."  "The disgusting one is you, sniff."

The woman, who had previously clung to him like a cicada, began to look at him with an expression as fierce as if she was going to tear him apart. The man was speechless, but it wasn't because of the familiar look he had seen so many times.

Now she really knew how to swear. And she did it quite naturally.

The Giselle Bishop in Edwin Eccleston's memories was a good, proper girl. At first, sure, she was a bit of a village girl, somewhat mischievous, but she had never used the kind of vulgar curses a street criminal would use.

It seems she had hidden her true self from a boy she liked.
Chapter 112.
Although she was annoyed that she couldn't hide anything, she also thought this was a Giselle Bishop secret that only she knewsomething Edwin Eccleston was unaware ofso it didn't seem so bad.

The man brought his forehead close to hers, filling her vision only with eyes that hated her, and began to provoke her.

 "Should I tell your Lord what you just said? It must have been a huge loss, all the money he spent raising you like a princess. With that money, he could have married a real princess, but instead, he picked you up from some dirty corner like a wretch, and it was all just a waste of money..."  "How funny. How can you talk about origin when you have none?"

The man closed his mouth. His eyes, which were violent before, slowly began to fill with madness, but he wasn't the only one who had gone mad.

 "You only have your mind, and you don't even know how to control it?"

It was astounding how such a disgusting parasite managed to harm the body and mind of such an angelic Lord. She had accumulated so much rage while locked in the basement that the pressure made her explode; all that now was driving her to madness.

 "This is all your fault!"

Giselle, who thought she could never touch Edwin, grabbed his collar and shook him.

 "Don't you even know that keeping a host alive is a parasite's basic survival strategy? That's why you aren't even a parasite. A brainless insect is smarter than you, did you know that? Your brain is on the tip of your cock, isn't it? And that's why you don't understand a word I'm saying."

Although her words were full of insults, the man remained silent, listening to her. When the rage disappeared from his eyes and a slight smile appeared on his lips, Giselle realized that he not only wasn't hurt by her criticism but enjoyed it. What kind of being was this? With more fury, Giselle abruptly released her grip on his neck.

 "Did you understand me or not! From now on, you stay quiet. If you pull any more stunts, I'll kill you."  "And do you know how one kills?"  "Ugh, Lord... Even so, please don't kill me..."

This cunning fox. Since she had no answer, she ignored him and returned to pleading with Edwin. The man, pitying the lunatic who was whining as if starved, gently patted her back to calm her.

 "Don't worry. I don't plan on living long."

What kind of nonsense was that? He had kidnapped Giselle precisely because he wanted to live. It made no sense.

 "It's just that I can't die yet."  "And when do you plan on dying, then?"

The man, who had stopped his tears, lifted his head and stared fixedly at Giselle with a disturbingly strange expression. Then he shoved her toward the passenger seat and slammed the accelerator, avoiding the answer.

 "How about we agree, amicably, that it was the fault of the quack doctor who recommended useless treatment?"

The madman, without waiting for Giselle's consent, grabbed her cuffed hands and shook them as if to seal an agreement with a handshake.

 "Huh? In the end, he deserved it, didn't he? I killed him properly. Right?"

His claim of having killed someone with words still sounded like bragging, but Giselle was too exhausted to argue. She decided to play along.

 "But... why did you kill the professor? Did he electrocute you?"  "No. If I were to kill everyone who electrocuted me, I would have surpassed a dozen by now."  "...What? There are more?"  "If that poor Lord finds out he was tortured with electric shocks in the prison camp, he'll do nothing but whine and become unbearable," so the man returned to the important point.  "I killed the professor because he threatened to expose to the illustrious Duke that... my 'hostile personality' existed. He wanted to cover up his own scandal."

Did this doctor who killed someone also blackmail him? But Giselle's anger towards the deceased didn't last long. She blinked, frowning. No matter how much she thought about it, there was something she couldn't understand.

 "And why did you care if they exposed it? Did you have something to lose?"  "Of course. If they lock the Duke up in an asylum, I would be condemned to deal only with madmen for the rest of my life. And I doubt I'll find another one as pretty as you."  "Ah... You didn't want to live locked up..."

The man let out a scornful, out-of-context laugh. Now she understood: he was laughing at himself.

 "Why am I revealing my weaknesses so easily?"  "Is the story about the 'weapons of seduction' a short one?"

You're not so pretty that you should think of yourself as a beauty, he thought, but glancing at her out of the corner of his eye, he fell silent.

 "Ha... Calling this insolent brat an 'angel.' Edwin Eccleston has no eye for people."

She, noting that he wouldn't hurt her no matter what she said, had started speaking with total freedom since yesterday. He had locked her up to use her, but today it was she who was devouring him.

What could this brat do even if she knows my weaknesses? There's no need to worry. Although... men who fall into those traps usually trust that a fragile, pretty woman is harmless... until a knife pierces them.

The logical thing would be to feel irritation at her suspicious interest. But, for some reason, he only found it amusing. Or, to be vulgar, perhaps it was more accurate to say that it turned him on.

Could it be that Edwin Eccleston has no eyes? How did he not feel hungry for such a provocative woman? Privileged son of a bitch.

The car, which had been driving aimlessly, veered onto a road bordered by thick vegetation and stopped. It was a moonless night, a rural road without streetlights. As the engine turned off, darkness enveloped them like black water, swallowing them.

In the silence, the hoot of an owl was heard, but it sounded distant, as if they were listening to it underwater. Like all external stimuli when consciousness sinks beneath the surface: dull, aloof.

Every time he relinquished control of this body, he was torn from the world of stimuli and thrown into that arid, tasteless place. Alone.

In that indifferent world where fragments of the past, sensations of the present, and thoughts of the future marched each with its own label toward separate destinations, only he was conscious of himself. The only lost child without a direction.

What he once believed to be a nightmarewhen he still identified as Lorenz von Eisenhartwas, despairingly, his reality.

Since he gained consciousness, a pain had corroded him. He recognized that emptiness as hunger, but it wasn't the hunger common humans know.

That yearning, almost congenital, became uncontrollable after he accepted that he wasn't a complete being. It dominated him.

How do you satisfy a hunger without knowing its origin? He rose to the surface of the dream and devoured others' desires; he set himself up over humanity. He also played at being a god underwater, creating worlds with his own rules. Ephemeral pleasures. The emptiness persisted.

Until, unexpectedly, in the climax with Giselle Bishop, he not only forgot the hunger but felt satiety.

Was his emptiness only sexual desire? No. Masturbation never satisfied him. Giselle not only touched his body but his mind. Something in hernot through others, but directly toward himreached him.

That day, he knew the name of his hunger:

Solitude.

The solitude caused by his absence.

Or maybe it wasn't her specifically. Perhaps any human could fill that void.

He didn't know.

And he didn't want to know. Never.

He wasn't interested in trying others. He only wanted Giselle Bishop.

But she was a complete being. He couldn't cross into her world with a body of his own, nor could she discard hers to become a fragment of consciousness and inhabit Edwin Eccleston's mind.

Their love was condemned not only by unequal emotional orbits but by incompatible essences.

'If I could create a paradise just for us in my world, I would kidnap you there right now.'

In this instant, with the world distant, he allowed himself an illusion:

What if we were both exiled beneath the surface of consciousness?

'Us'

He savored the sweet word before swallowing it. A low moan vibrated in his throat. He didn't know if it was the whisper of an insect in the forest or Giselle's choked gasp.

He inclined his head toward her face, barely visible in the darkness. Her trembling breath filtered into his consciousness. He liked it.

 "Ahh..."

I want to devour you.

It was time to calm his hunger, and for her to "write" to her protector: "I'm still alive. I even had electrifying sex with my kidnapper."
Chapter 113.
 "Mmmph"

A warm, wet mass worked its way past her lips, exploring every corner of her mouth. Giselle clenched her teeth.

She could prevent his tongue from invading, but not the saliva that seeped through. The distinct bitter flavor of cigar smoke coated her own hidden tongue. The sensation of asphyxiation made her open her mouth reflexively, and the man’s tongue immediately slipped inside. She was genuinely beginning to drown.

While above, the moist sounds of skin against skin grew obscenely loud

Crunch. Slurp.

Below, sounds of different textures mingled. Because the man’s hands, while holding Giselle’s wrists captive, roamed her skirt avidly.

His fingers closed tightly around her bare thigh, exposed between her stockings and underwear, as his thumb slid toward the interior of her firmly joined legs. Giselle instantly tensed, and the man, still sucking at her lips, let out a mocking laugh, as if annoyed by her reaction at this stage.

In the complete darkness, she could pretend it wasn’t him who was touching her. That slightly relieved the guilt, but it didn't make the contact with another man tolerable.

Pop.

 "Haah"

As soon as the man released her lips, Giselle, desperate to distract him, threw out the first question that came to mind:

 "Why did you kill the guard at the prison camp?"  "Out of curiosity."

Kill someone... just out of curiosity? Even if it was a boast...

She didn't know if the man failed to see her distorted expression due to the darkness, or if he was simply too blinded by lust. Dodging another attempt to capture her lips, Giselle turned her head and asked more firmly:

 "Did you want to see how a person died?"  "No."  "Then... hah... what did you want to know?"

The tongue that was licking her collarbone toward her neck stopped abruptly. The man lifted his head to look at her.

In the darkness, his face was invisible, but Giselle couldn't look away. There was something dangerous in this silence, broken only by her ragged breathing.

Suddenly, the man laughed. Although she didn't see his expression, she imagined it was that laugh of his that sounded almost like a sob.

 "I wanted to know if I could have a body, too."  "What?"  "If I could abandon this body that hates me... and move into an empty shell, one without a soul."

For a completely unexpected reason, Giselle was speechless.

I thought only Edwin wanted to get rid of the intruder in his body... But I never imagined the intruder also wanted to escape from him.

 "The fact that I'm still trapped in this body should tell you everything. I can't."

An abysmal silence followed. The man let out a self-deprecating chuckle, a punctuation mark for that emptiness, but the mood had already sunk into the depths.

 "Yes, you're right. I can't even be a parasite. A parasite could at least jump to another host."

What he wanted was to be a complete human, with a body of his own. That's why he had resorted to murder, the most inhuman act, to achieve his most human desire. It was so contradictory it was unsettling.

Perhaps she sensed it.

She knew that telling him "without a body, you can't even be a worm" would hurt him... which meant that, deep down, he yearned to be treated as an equal.

 "...How pathetic."

The man stirred, as if he had been waiting all his life for that pity. He kissed her furiously, then buried his face in her chest, his rough breath filtering between the buttons of her blouse. Giselle shivered, but instead of pushing him away, she wrapped her arms around him and stroked his broad back.

Pathetic? Me? Your vulnerability is my opportunity.

If he wanted to be treated as human, she would play that game. After all, what better way to manipulate him?

 "Is there anything else you desire, besides having a body? Any dream?"

He nodded against her chest, unbuttoning a button.

 "Something bigger than this. A purpose."

The lips brushing her skin twisted into a sneer.

 "Do you think a monster like me has such aspirations?"  "Humans can't live without dreams."

His lips stopped.

 "Do you see me as human?"  "Perhaps a demented human."  "Ha. Didn't you say I wasn't even a parasite?"  "That was to hurt you."  "And now you treat me like a person? Of course, you'd say anything to soften me up."  "If you're so distrustful, why did you believe the 'pathetic' part? You could have taken it the wrong way."

When she withdrew her caresses and leaned back, he pulled her abruptly against his chest, clinging to her as if afraid she would vanish.

 "Do you know why the art of seduction has centuries of history? Because there are always idiots like me who fall for the trap."

His tongue trailed over Giselle's skin, which was covered in goosebumps. She thought she had failed in avoiding contact and in trying to win him over, but the caresses ceased on their own, without needing resistance.

 "No body, no name. I'm not even alive. What's the point of talking about 'dreams'?"

Even while devouring her body, his mind remained trapped by her question. At least she had managed to capture his attention.

 "What do 10 or 20 years matter? By then, I'll still be a parasite in another body, dragging out an empty existence."

Giselle understood then: he was dangerous precisely because he had no future, only a savage present.

How do you tame a horse without a bridle when it doesn't even desire anything? The basic method was reward and punishment, but first, she had to give him a desire to exploit.

Perhaps she didn't know how to kill his evil personality, but she knew how to tame him. By turning a demon who only lives for today into someone with dreams for tomorrow.

 "Why does it not make sense? In 10 years, you could graduate and even become a professor. Why don't you study something? I'll help you convince him."  "Only the class valedictorian would suggest studying."  "If you don't like that, do something else. Develop your own skills. It would be gratifying, wouldn't it?"  "I don't want a long life trapped in other people's bodies."  "But at least you're alive. Many don't even have that..."

Like her family. For a moment, she almost felt pity for him... until she remembered what he was.

 "Ah, now that I think about it, I do have a dream."  "What is it?"  "Why do you ask? To 'help' me?"  "Yes."

He burst out laughing. Why does he find that funny?

 "My dream is..."  "Yes?"  "To die when you die."  "......."  "Would you sacrifice yourself for my dream?"

Ah. That's why he was laughing.

 "Don't joke around. I asked seriously."  "Me too."

Without another word, he used his tongue only to taste her. His fingers unfastened the buttons of her blouse, and his lips followed the exposed path.

When Giselle swallowed involuntarily, he bit her neck and sucked hard, leaving a mark that would turn red the next day. A shame, whether others saw it or not.

 "So, what's your dream?"

he asked, dragging his lips to her ear.

 "I suppose... not to sleep with you now."
Chapter 114.
Even if he agreed, Giselle didn't truly believe that this demon would fulfill her dream. Her heart, having already given up on the best outcome, had settled for Plan B: mounting him from above this time, moving her hips.

 "There is a way to fulfill your dream."

The warm, humid breath that brushed her ear confirmed the man was completely aroused, but Giselle didn't trust his words.

 "But in exchange"

Of course. That was the way of a demon.

Demons grant wishes. Always for a price.

And a demon's price is never cheap. Anything he asked for would be worse than simply opening her legs and accepting him right now

 "Give me a name."  "What?"  "A name."  "......."  "I want one too."

Why are you asking me? Giselle was agape, stunned, but the man, perhaps thinking she was reflecting, remained perfectly still, not touching her.

Is he seriously waiting for a name?

Such palpable expectation emanated from this invisible, inaudible man that it almost forced her to fulfill this duty.

 "Uh..."

After a long silence, her mouth opened, but only doubt came out. The man lost his patience.

 "Do you prefer sleeping with me over giving me a name? Or maybe, deep down, you enjoyed raping that old man?"  "Lorenzo."

As the name "Lorenzo" escaped her lips, a dense silence filled the air. She could feel the man's expectation morphing into disappointment without needing to see him.

 "How insincere."  "Insincere? It’s a name I chose with great care."

Giselle forced a smile.

 "To me, you are Lorenzo. Any other name would sound fake. And it suits you well... Lorenzo."

Would he swallow that improvised excuse? She expected him to insist on another name, or use the failure as a pretext to demand his "payment" and plunge himself inside her. But

 "Ah!"

What pierced through her was not his body, but the light. The man started the car, and the headlights illuminated the night. The vehicle returned to the road, and he drove in silence, his hands firm on the wheel. Giselle couldn't believe it.

We’re really not going to do it?

She didn't trust that this swindler had kept his word. Especially when the "payment" had been such a ridiculous name.

 "Lorenzo."  "What?"

He answered the call. It seemed real. He even seemed content.

The drive continued. So long, that Giselle soon realized they were driving in circles in the same area. And she understood why.

Feigning ignorance, she chattered throughout the "ride," flattering his quirks. Only when he finally parked in front of the cabin did she divert the conversation to what she really wanted:

 "I’ve been thinking... As much as I want to save Edwin, I can't stay locked up here forever. I have my own life; it must bother you, too, to come all the way here every time I need help."  "It doesn't bother me at all."  "Ugh"  "It's fun."  "What if there's a forest fire while you're gone and the cabin burns down? Will it also be 'fun' to rescue my charred corpse from the basement? Ah, but if I die, you die, right? Maybe you should pray it doesn't happen."  "I'll find another place."  "That doesn't solve the underlying problem! Let me convince Edwin not to commit suicide. You know I hate his death as much as you do. I'll cling to him tooth and nail."  "Convince? The same person who couldn't even convince me?"

The man laughed at her before locking her up again. This time, in the bathroom.

 "Do you know why you still can't become human? Humans are social animals."

SLAM! CLICK! (The door closed).

 "If you want to be human, first learn to listen! So far, you've just been a wall, a damn wall!"  "Then this wall is retreating. Until tomorrow, beautiful."

As always, words only worked when there was someone on the other side.

At dawn, Dawson arrived at Duke Eccleston's secretariat with dark circles under his eyes that looked like bruises. Without wasting a second, he declared:

 "I'd bet my medal it wasn't Oxley."

The previous night, anticipating the failure of the surveillance, they had deployed a surveillance network around the central station in Oxley. Dawson had been part of that operation. But there was no sign of the Duke, or even his white sedan. Faced with this, Dawson's instinct told him they were searching in the wrong place, and Loise had no choice but to agree.

 "It seems he wasn't in the city."

Upon inspecting the car the subject had driven at dawn, they found dried mud and flattened grass embedded in the undercarriage and between the tires. Clear evidence of unpaved rural or mountain roads.

The odometer showed a distance traveled that far exceeded a round trip to Oxley. When Loise showed the noted figure, Dawson, whose eyelids were heavy with sleep, abruptly opened his eyes.

 "That far? With that distance, he would barely have had time to arrive, say 'Hello?' and come back..."

As he watched Loise scrutinize the map in search of remote rural areas, Dawson let out a skeptical grunt.

 "My gut tells me the odometer was manipulated. Wouldn't it be typical of the Bishop to hide her nearby and spend the night driving around to throw us off?"

That cunning bastard was capable of that and more.

 "Then, even the mud on the car could be a trap to confuse us."

Even the most genuine-looking clue could be fake. Loise, disheartened, slumped into his chair and buried his forehead in his hand.

 "Damn it... So, what the hell is Oxley? Did he change taxis there?"  "At the central station, there are taxis even in the early hours."  "Should we interrogate the taxi companies in Oxley...?"

If necessary, it would be better to delegate it to a local detective. Loise reached for the phone to ask for a recommendation, but just then the device rang loudly.

 "Loise speaking. What's going on?"

As soon as he recognized the caller, his eyes flew open, then squeezed shut. Throughout the call, he kept massaging his brow, marked by deep wrinkles.

 "Yes, do it that way."

Upon hanging up, Loise let out a sigh. Dawson didn't hesitate to ask:

 "What happened?"  "They lost him during surveillance."

Miss Bishop's kidnapper had started moving early today. Although they had him watched, the subject had been changing taxis instead of using his own car, zigzagging through the city. The last report indicated that he had withdrawn a large sum from the bank before disappearing.

 "Adding insult to injury."  "We can't stop him, can we?"

Loise wasn't in the mood to politely answer the obvious.

 "This is the first time we've felt so tied up and helpless."

He didn't even nod at Dawson's comment, which only reflected his own frustration.

 "I don't understand why we're going around in circles when there's a clear path... If the Lieutenant would just recover his memory, all this suffering would be unnecessary."

Loise ignored the comment. It was a broken record Dawson had been playing since yesterday. Why complain about something that had no solution?

 "I read in a magazine that you can even recover memories of past lives with hypnosis."

It was a new variation, but just as absurd.

 "Why doesn't the Lieutenant try a hypnotherapist?"  "He already did."  "And? Didn't he recover the memories of his other personality?"  "That wasn't the goal."

He recalled that Professor Fletcher had attempted hypnotherapy at the beginning of the treatment. But when the malignant personality started to disappear, the sessions were suspended.

Recently, the family doctor suggested that hypnosis, combined with electroshock, could help recover the lost memories. But the deluge of events prevented them from trying it.

 "As you know, this is a deadly secret for the Duke. Even trusted academics have blackmailed him. Who would you trust with his treatment?"

The lack of a doctor wasn't just due to Loise's absence, but to growing caution. What if that demon tried to kill another doctor? Dawson didn't need to know that.

 "Then he needs a therapist without ambition."  "Does such a creature exist?"  "Not in the city. But in my hometown, in the Idees Islands......"
Chapter 115.
The slight dialectal inflection in Dawson's accent struck him as peculiar; apparently, he was from an island.

 "Since anesthesia is hard to get, the dentist gives them a mushroom concoction before pulling their teeth."  "Mushrooms?"  "Not the kind you buy at the market. Anyway, there are people even that doesn't affect. In those cases, they call Mr. Galloway."

From the moment Dawson mentioned that this Galloway used hypnosis as an anesthetic, Loise began to lose interest and only half-listened.

 "He comes from a family that has been shamans on our island for centuries. I know it sounds like a cult scamming naive villagers, but neither are the islanders that gullible, nor is Mr. Galloway a charlatan."  ""  "He’s a licensed psychiatrist, no lessa graduate of the Richmond Medical School."

Loise wondered what such an accomplished professional would be doing helping pull teeth on a remote island without anesthetics. Dawson's story became more absurd the more he embellished it.

 "He didn't adapt to the city and returned to his homeland after 20 years. Now he farms the land and treats patients as a hobby. Hypnosis is his specialty. He even helped recover the testimony of a witness under hypnosis during a homicide on the south island. Don't you think he could find hidden memories?"  ""  "Besides, his only ambition is to grow pumpkins bigger than last year's. He's not the kind of person who would extort the Commander. Oh, you don't need to reveal your rank. I doubt he'd care to know."

Dawson rummaged in his bag, took out a notebook, and scribbled something on a piece of paper on Loise's desk: probably the name and contact details of that mysterious doctor.

 "Just a moment... It's pumpkin harvest season now. If I ask him to come, he’ll refuse. But if you want to meet him, I'll move heaven and earth to convince him. Even the neighbor's dog!"  "I'll speak with His Grace."  "Yes, please do tell him."

Loise accepted the paper out of courtesy, but he was sure he wouldn't call.

 "Well, let's get back to the matter at hand."  "Ugh This has no useful information"

Dawson's expression in front of the map was almost pathetically candid. Loise, once again, restrained his manners and avoided sighing heavily in his presence.

A military commander must know how to place and utilize his people at the right moment. In that aspect, His Grace was considered the best strategist of his era, praised even by the Queen, who rarely offered compliments.

That such a brilliant tactician had tasked Dawson with the search for Miss Bishop implied he must be competent but his absurd ramblings made Loise doubt. Could His Grace's judgment have failed? The worry, unusual for him, filtered into his thoughts.

 "Let's see Last night he manipulated the travel mileage Manipulated Wait."

Bang!

Dawson's sudden, thunderous clap made Loise jump.

 "I'll go to the taxi company again!"  "What for?"

Dawson shot out, shouting something unintelligible. Loise only caught one word:

Manipulation?

It is said that the first thing you do upon waking determines what your day will be like.

CRASH!

Giselle's day began by breaking the bathroom window. What kind of day awaited her? Only time would tell if she would be the one breaking things or the one who ended up broken.

Clank. Clink-clank.

As she crawled toward the open window, through which the icy forest wind blew at dawn, a metallic sound echoed in the bathroom. It was the clash of the handcuffs against the security bar fixed to the bathtub wall. Of course, the other end of the handcuffs was fastened to Giselle's wrist.

Taking advantage of the little she could move, Giselle managed to reach the window and sat on the edge of the tub. Then, she screamed outward:

 "Help me!"

She repeated her plea at regular intervals, minding her voice, but in the end, her throat was raw. That could only mean one thing: for hours, no one had heard her cries.

Castleton was famous for its beautiful mountains; in autumn, when the trees turned red and gold, it was obvious that hikers would frequently pass by. However, no one heard Giselle because Edwin had built his cabin on one of Castleton's most solitary peaks, a place deliberately removed from the hustle.

Ugh... enough.

She gave up on waiting for a rescue, but she would never give up on escaping. It was time to put the second plan she had devised the night before into action.

 "Hup!"

She hung from the shower curtain rod with one hand. Under her weight, the rod bent with a sinister creak before snapping in half. For a moment, Giselle felt triumphant, brandishing the long pipe like a giant until her gaze fell on the thick security bar that held her in handcuffs.

Is it the thickness of a thumb? She compared the thin pipe she held with the bar, at least three times thicker and much sturdier. She rolled up her sleeves with determination.

We'll see which one breaks first.

Dawson questioned the employee of the taxi company, but he only received evasions.

He might be pretending not to know

He wasn't disappointed. It was what he expected. Good thing he had memorized the license plate when the employee checked the register yesterday.

 "You finally show up."

He had waited half a day, crouched in a corner of the company's back garage. The damn taxi with that plate didn't return until sundown.

 "Hey, can I ask you something?"

Dawson approached without hesitation and knocked on the driver's window. The taxi driver, a middle-aged man, rolled down the glass and looked at her suspiciously.

 "How can I help you?"  "Yesterday at dawn, you picked up a young couple near Magnolia Terrace, at Kingsbridge University, didn't you?"  "Hmm I don't recall."

But his face instantly tensed, his words dragged, and his gaze shifted. Everything about him screamed that he did remember those passengers.

 "The girl is my sister. We haven't heard from her since; my father is so worried he can't even go to work."

She mentioned a father who didn't even exist, appealing to the driver's conscience. The man grew even paler. The guilt was already planted.

 "The register said you took them to Oxley, but that wasn't true, was it?"

With no time for persuasions, Dawson went straight to the point. The man turned livid and stepped on the accelerator to flee.

Click!

But Dawson, with quick reflexes, snatched the keys before he could escape. Now, his silence was a confession. She pointed to the operating license stuck on the windshield and reformulated her question:

 "Yesterday at dawn, you took them to an unauthorized area and falsified the register, putting Oxley, a permitted location with a similar distance. Am I wrong?"

Taxi companies can only operate within government-authorized areas. By law, both the origin and destination must be within those zones. But manipulating the records to bypass the rule was an open secret in the industry.

Something a taxi driver had told her years ago, when she traveled frequently for work. She never imagined that piece of information would end up helping her corner one of them.

 "If I report this, the company will receive a penalty and you'll be fired."  "W-w-wait"  "Of course, that only happens if you don't tell me where you dropped off my sister."

 "Mr. Loise!"

Dawson called at sundown, after being out all day, her shout nearly rupturing his eardrums upon greeting. She had discovered something.

 "It wasn't Oxley!"  "Then what?"  "He dropped them off at a cabin in White Hill, Castleton! Do you know where that is?"  "The Cabin in White Hill!"

This time, it was Loise who, without realizing it, clapped his hands.

 "Give me the exact location on the map."

Loise unfolded a map and she indicated the route and street names toward the Cabin in White Hill.

 "I'll go immediately."  "Wait."  "Why?"  "He hasn't returned yet."

The cunning individual who had evaded surveillance in Richmond was still at large. Perhaps he, too, was heading to White Hill.

 "You might run into him at the cabin."
Chapter 116.
 "I’ll handle that delicately, don't worry."

The answer, so confident that Loise almost doubted if it was the same clumsy person from that morning, made him realize no further warnings were necessary.

 "I'll also contact the ranger who lives at the foot of the mountain and leave immediately."  "Yes, I’ll see you in White Hill then."

With that reliable response, the call ended. Loise, unable to hide his emotion, murmured while dialing the ranger's number:

 "Dawson, thank you Thank you."

Although he didn't have time for a proper farewell, he felt such great gratitude that he even wanted to bow to that subordinate, so young and far away now.

In the end, he should never have doubted the Duke’s judgment.

Crack.

Metal doesn't break, it bends. She spent the entire day using the shower curtain rod as a lever, propping it between the security bar and the wall, until both ends were twisted and useless.

But her effort bore fruit: one side of the security bar now hung loose, with several screws protruding an inch from the wall. Giselle, instead of discarding the useless rod, adjusted it forcefully.

Rake. Chiiii.

As she wrenched the bar off, the tiles splintered. With the end of the metal, she began to scratch and dig at the exposed cement. Sweat had been running down her back for a while. When the drops even rolled down her nose, she wiped them clumsily with her sleeve, noticing how her shoulders burned.

'Tomorrow, I won't even be able to lift myself out of bed.'

She didn't care. As long as it was her house. Her bed.

'But at least I'll finish before he arrives.'

Although the sun was already tinting the mountains outside the window, Giselle wasn't worried. The man would come at dawn, as he had for two days.

She chewed the bread he had left her while continuing to dig around the screws. When two were completely out and the rest halfway extracted, her hands were already red and swollen.

 "Ugh"

She hung one arm from the bar and pulled with all her weight.

Crack, crack.

The screws began to yield.

 "Why are there so many damn screws?"

After countless attempts, the last one detached with a clack!

 "I did it!"

It was too early to celebrate, though. The metal plate of the bar was larger than the link of her handcuffs.

But compared to digging out cement, this was nothing. She bent the plate against the wall until she deformed it into a triangular shape. On the third attempt, the handcuffs slid free.

I did it!

Now she could leave. As soon as she felt freedom, she jumped out of the tub and ran to the door.

Clank!

But it was locked from the outside. No matter how much she wrestled with it, it wouldn't give. "If one door closes, a window opens." Without hesitation, she headed for the broken glass.

She smashed the dangerous fragments with the bar, placed a thick towel over the sill, and jumped. The window was large and low enough that rolling out was easier than a somersault.

Crack.

The sound of dry leaves under her feet felt like muffled applause. But there was no time to be proud. She picked up the towel and followed the outline of the cabin.

Twilight had fallen. Going down the mountain without a flashlight was stupid.

'Better to break the living room window, call the ranger, and hide nearby.'

Just as she grabbed a rock from the ground and turned the corner, she came face-to-face with a car entering the path.

 "Slower!"

Dawson had driven like a blind bull for over an hour, covering the distance in barely thirty minutes, and only reduced speed when she spotted the cabin roof at the end of the steep trail. She glanced quickly: no one was around, no car in front of the cabin.

Hasn't he arrived yet? Please, don't let him have moved her already.

Just in case, she decided to leave the car far away and first find out what was inside. But just as she drove past the cabin to hide the car higher uppreventing anyone who came up from seeing itshe turned the corner and found herself face-to-face with someone in the front yard.

For an instant, she thought it was the kidnapper disguised as Major Bishop; her heart sank. But looking closer, she saw it was an old man. The ranger? Dawson stopped the car, rolled down the window, and shouted:

 "I'm Dawson! Where is Miss Bishop?"

The ranger’s grim expression as he approached did not bode well...

 "No one is in the cabin. Judging by the broken bathroom window, it seems Miss Bishop escaped that way..."

She escaped on her own?

Involuntarily, she looked back toward the path she had come from, but the ranger reached into the car and handed her something.

 "This was on top of the doormat at the entrance."

She took it without thinking: it was a chess piece. A white bishop, with two characters scrawled in black ink on its head.

Slow....

Giselle's whereabouts were once again a mystery. This time, without leaving the slightest trace.

Edwin stared fixedly at the back of his hand. Nail marks that weren't there yesterdayone, two, threehad appeared. Now he could only confirm Giselle's survival through the prints that animal had left on him. Not being able to chain that rutting dog was driving him to the brink of madness.

He had been registering all his properties in the country for days since Giselle escaped the cabin, but there was no trace of her. It was increasingly evident that that cunning fox must have moved her to a completely new location.

Where on earth could he have hidden her?

The answer could only be found within himself. Opening his eyes, he left the house and knocked on the door of a suite in a nearby hotel.

 "Ah, you've arrived. Come in and sit down. Let's skip the greetings and begin."

Despite the early hour, when dawn had not yet fully broken, the old man not only didn't seem bothered but was even more hurried than Edwin himself. His sun-weathered skin and rough features made him look more like a farmer than a doctor, and his mind seemed to be more on the fields than on his patient.

Dr. Galloway only looked forward to the day he could return to his pumpkin patch, leaving Edwin in the hands of his family. He was perfect. The two, equally impatient, had spent the entire previous day trying hypnosis, only pausing for essential rest. And in the last session last night, they had finally seen results.

 "The world I live in is made of many doors and rooms."

Edwin had managed to unlock a hidden memory purely through willpower.

 "To take control of the body... there is a special door. If I open it, I emerge to the surface of consciousness and take control of the body and mind."

The conversation that one had with Giselle in the car late at night had shed light on the personality that had hitherto remained in darkness.

 "Good, now release control and get up to open a very special-looking door."

Dr. Galloway asked Edwin, already in a hypnotic state after relaxing, to open that special door, a metaphor that one used to represent the boundary between consciousness and the subconscious.

A special door. Although he didn't have a clear image, a door radiating that feeling appeared before him. Without hesitation, he turned the knob. Creeek. He felt vividly how it opened in his palms.

 "Now, walk slowly outward. One, two, three."

Following the doctor's instructions, he stepped forward. But upon exiting, he noticed no change. He paused, unsure of his location, until he heard the voice again:

 "You are now in a hallway full of doors. Each one carries a date and time, containing a day's worth of memories. Do you see the door with this morning's memories?"  "...Yes."  "Open it. What do you see?"  "Giselle..."  "Where are you and Giselle now?"

A bed.

Edwin pressed his lips together, unable to verbalize it. Because in that bed, he and Giselle were wearing nothing.
Chapter 117.
 "Let's not focus on the situation, but on the details of the surroundings."

The doctor, perceiving his ragged breathing, calmly attempted to distract him.

 "Do you see any clue about the location?"

Edwin shook his head. The bed covered with a white sheet was so ordinary it offered no particularities. He wanted to look away, but his body wouldn't obey. He was merely reliving a memory; it was logical.

The only things his eyes registered were three tied bags brazenly displayed on the bed. From the contents, he deduced they were used condoms.

Three ejaculations. The marks of a prolonged act were also reflected in Giselle’s face, which swayed to the rhythm of the thrusts. Her blue eyes, glassy and unfocused, looked on the verge of overflowing with tears at the slightest touch. Her expression was absent, as if her mind had deserted her.

 "Ah, ah, huuu"

Giselle, lost in a mechanical sway, began to moan and scrunch up her face. Her demeanor, initially empty, clouded with pleasure in an instant. Seeing that creature transform into an adult shouting drunkenly with pleasure was more torturous than any suffering he had ever endured.

The place. Find the place.

He scrutinized every visible detail in search of a clue, but his search was interrupted again and again. The memory of his own pleasure at that moment surged repeatedly. The joy caused by the girl he had raised was nothing but agony for Edwin.

Crack, crack, crack.

 "Ahk, ah, aah, nngh, h-hng"

In his memory, his self of that time, driven mad by the carnal pleasure caused by her tight core, began to thrust harder. As much as the current Edwin suffered, the Giselle in the memory did too.

 "N-no ugh, stop I want to stop."

In his memory, his hand trapped Giselle's delicate wrist, which struggled to escape the man who was raping her, and forcibly entwined their fingers. Her small, immobilized body shook uselessly.

 "Hk, stop ahh, hh"

Each brutal thrust between her legs tore heartbreaking sobs from her swollen, red lips. The ruthless hip didn't seem to stop until her spasms became uncontrollable, only then did it cease.

 "Darling, if you cry like that, how do you think Edwin feels? You should smile for him."

His own voice spoke disgusting words. Edwin's hands, resting on the arms of the armchair, clenched until his knuckles turned white.

 "Giselle cried. I raped her. A son-of-a-bitch like me should die."

No. Giselle smiled. I made love to Giselle. We enjoyed it very much. If she liked it, I liked it too.

Perhaps because he was the demon inhabiting him, he also understood his thoughts perfectly. Edwin desired only one thing: to kill the man who had violated Giselle.

 "Huh? What if I show your Lord this memory right now? What do you think he'll think?"

Giselle stopped crying suddenly and stared at him, her eyes soaked with tears. An instant later, her pupils dilated, as if she had suddenly locked eyes with Edwin himself, who was now observing that memory.

 "So, for your Lord's sake have fun."  "Didn't you promise you wouldn't tell him?"

It seemed he had sworn not to reveal that memory to Edwin. Tears sprang from her large eyes and instantly overflowed.

 "Lord sniff I'm so sorry"

No, Giselle. Why are you apologizing? I am the one who should beg for your forgiveness.

When Giselle broke into sobs and apologized to him, a tear escaped through Edwin's tightly closed eyelids and slid down his cheek. The moment the drop, suspended on his chin, fell to the floor with a click, Edwin opened his eyes abruptly. Dr. Galloway was shaking his shoulder to wake him.

 "I woke you because you didn't respond when I called. Did you fail to see the location?"

Edwin wiped his cheek and shook his head. Only now, freed from that suffering, did his reasoning return. This isn't a memory I found on my own, his instinct whispered. That demon knew I was struggling to recover my memories under hypnosis, and he sent this one back just to mock me.

The doctor silently observed Edwin's trembling fist, listened to his conjectures, and then reached for the side table separating the two.

 "Let's try a different approach."

He opened a box that had been there the entire time. Inside, he kept objects related to the case. The doctor took out a white chess piece and handed it to Edwin.

 "You placed this bishop in front of the refuge. What did you do next? Let's use that question as a guide this time."

Edwin tightened his grip on the white bishop, marked by the demon's mockery, looked at it with resentment, and, nodding to the doctor, closed his eyes again.

 "Good. Inhale slow, deep very deep."

The doctor must have noticed his emotional agitation, because this time he took more time to help him relax.

 "When I count three, nothing you see will disturb you. No matter what traps that demon prepares, you won't fall for them. Nothing will hurt Giselle and therefore, nothing will hurt you either."

A lie.

 "One. Inhale deeply."

A lie I want to believe.

 "Two. As you exhale, release the rage, the sadness all emotion. Slower slower slower. And three. Now, empty of feelings, you will no longer experience anything."

The doctor was an excellent liar.

 "Let's open a special door and step out."

This time, he saw a door. No it wasn't a door. It was more like

A hatch?

A round hatch, like those on a submarine or a tank, appeared sealed beneath his feet. It wasn't the same door as before. Precisely because he was so sure of it, Edwin intuited that it was the correct answer and, without hesitation, he yanked open the heavy hatch.

Crack. Thud.

As he descended the steel ladder that emerged upon opening, he stepped into an impenetrable darkness where something awaited.

If this is a submarine hatch, then it's the worst design in history. The interior was flooded. Although he didn't see the water, nor did he feel wet, nor was he lacking air, Edwin could only compare that substance enveloping him like a gas to the most obvious liquid.

 "Have you left the door yet?"

The doctor's voice sounded distant and distorted, as if he were hearing it underwater with his head submerged. Edwin nodded in the external world, but in his mind, he let go of the handrail. His body didn't fall; it floated slowly in the void.

 "The bishop you are holding will now appear in front of you."

It was true. But the piece, unlike the one he held, was as tall as him.

 "Follow the bishop. Place it in front of the cabin and return to that day."

At that instant, like in the cartoons Giselle watched as a child, a white, plump leg emerged from the huge bishop. Simultaneously, Edwin’s feet, which were floating in the air, touched a solid surface.

He walked unsteadily behind the bishop. The white piece glowed with its own light in the absolute darkness, but its radiance weakened. It wasn't that it was losing luminosity, but that the surroundings were brightening. Although that bluish gloom was far from comforting.

Just when he thought it resembled twilight after sunset, the air around him changed. A cold breeze blew. With the smell of autumn.

Edwin stopped his feet without realizing it. The giant bishop began to shrink. He tried to run after it, but his legs didn't respond.

Meanwhile, the piece moved away until it reduced to the size of the one he held. Its absurd feet disappeared, but it kept moving because it was now in another hand. A hand that deposited it onto what looked like an entrance doormat.

Edwin had reached the memory: the moment he himself left the bishop in front of the cabin.

Later, he rushed agitatedly to leave a message for the "Duke's hounds" before turning toward his car. As he got into the driver's seat, he met the furious gaze of "the Duke's pet," handcuffed to the door, with tears of rage in her eyes.

 "Would you want me to die, Lord? Why run away? Hey, you leeches shouldn’t you pay me for raising you?"

The doctor’s suggestions took effect. Not even those words managed to alter his concentration. The memory continued: driving down a road that darkened quickly.

On the blood-red horizon, the familiar profile of the city began to rise, dazzling. As he changed lanes to exit the highway, he read aloud a sign he passed:

 "Richmond. Center."
Chapter 118.
The sound of the pen scratching against the paper was faint. The doctor's furrowed brow wasn't from the nuisance of jotting down clues, but from something else.

I can't see it.

The instant they exited the highway, his vision darkened, and the memories abruptly cut off. To reconstruct them, he needed a guiding thread, but he could no longer follow the white bishop. Edwin desperately clung to any detail that could serve as a clue.

 "From today on, you're mine. I made a deal with the Duke. He hands you over to me, and I... keep quiet. So"

The lie that that guy spat out right before entering Richmond.

'So'

What did he say next?

 "If you don't behave, Edwin will have a tough time."  ""  "Understood? Answer me."  "I don't speak to things that aren't human."  "So you'll only understand if I mix with you in body?"

As Giselle glared at him, a familiar statue passed behind her head. The buildings of downtown Richmond appeared before his eyes, but before he could orient himself, the memory vanished again. Observing Edwin's agitated chest and the frantic movement of his eyes under his eyelids, the doctor noted his struggle to return to the thread of memory and posed a guiding question:

 "Where did you get out of the car in Richmond?"

He had to remember, but nothing came to mind. Perhaps this abrupt drop in his thoughts was the demon's doing. Maybe, now that Edwin was trying to recover his memory, he had begun to sabotage him.

He had to find Giselle's hiding place and tell the doctor before the other one took over his body again. Anxiety clouded his concentration when...

 "Do you see the Cognac River?"

The moment the doctor asked, the river that ran through Richmond appeared before his eyes.

 "I see it."

But they weren't crossing it. He was observing it from very high up.

 "Better view than a basement, right?"

From a building window.

 "And more windows to break and escape."

It was a height sufficient to kill him instantly if he jumped out the window.

 "Miss Leech, it's time to pay for having raised you."  "No! Ah...! S-stop...! Ugh!"

The scene changed abruptly: Giselle tried to flee, but he caught her, threw her to the floor, and lifted her skirt. Without bothering to remove her underwear or use any contraceptive device, he penetrated her immediately with brutality.

 "Hah Since you’re a leech Nngh you adhere so well"

The demon was showing him this memoryviolent, humiliatingto destabilize him. But Edwin, instead of falling into the trap, remained calm and methodically described the visible scenery from the window:

 "North of the Cognac River. More than 30 stories high. You can see the City Hall and National Plaza And the royal palace is to the"

He was about to say east, but his mouth betrayed his thoughts:

 "to the west."

The demon had taken control.

 "And damn it It's too dark to see well."

He feigned confusion for the doctor, giving false information while the latter tried to help him. This continued until the doctor, frustrated, suggested ending the session for the day.

 "With this, we've narrowed the search area sufficiently."

The demon handed the notes with erroneous data to Loise, who, oblivious to the deception, set off enthusiastically to investigate. Edwin, trapped inside his own body, watched him leave.

 "Doctor, I don't know how to thank you. Without you"

In Edwin's voice, the demon expressed gratitude and even allowed himself to ask for a favor:

 "I know it's a lot to ask but could you stay in Richmond until we find her? Perhaps I'll need more hypnotherapy."  "That would be"  "Even if it's just for today! I'll send someone to buy your return ticket as soon as we find her."  "I'll stay until tomorrow morning."  "Thank you."

Thus, the demon ensured the doctor would leave in a day. Easily impersonating Edwin, he fooled everyone.

«You can't beat me.»

The demon's arrogant voice resonated in his mind, even after stealing his body. Edwin saw everything: how he tricked his assistants, how he mingled with the morning crowd, and headed to Giselle's hiding place. He floated in the darkness beneath the hatch, powerless but a witness.

«This isn't over.»

She had abandoned all hope of escaping on her own.

The only exit, the main door, was sealed with internal and external locks, as solid and thick as those of a bank vault. Neither force nor tools could break it down.

She had screamed for help through the cracks, but who would climb to the penthouse lobby, occupying the entire top floor with no neighbors? She had even pounded the floor and overturned furniture, hoping someone on the lower floors would notice. Three days later, no one had come to complain.

There was no escaping this damned cabin. Frustration was driving her mad.

'You're going to fail.'

In her blurred vision, the Kingsbridge University campus looked small like a dollhouse. While her friends attended classes, she was trapped here, entertaining a man. The image of the university soon faded into a blur.

 "Are you crying?"  "Nngh"

When the man, intertwined with Giselle, grabbed the back of her neck and tilted her head back, thick tears fell onto their chests.

 "Why are you crying?"

He asked in a low voice, like a predator growling. Neither his tone nor his expression showed a trace of humor.

The man, who had returned in a matter of hours, seemed deeply disturbed. All morning, he had been tense, unpredictable, like a beast about to strike. Even more unstable than when he had interrupted her piano recital at the Naias Pavilion.

What the hell had happened between dawn and morning?

He didn't say. As soon as he arrived, he demanded comfort by plunging back inside Giselle. But, unlike always, he couldn't focus, growing irritated throughout the act.

 "The university?"

Turning around, the man instantly understood what she had been looking at while riding him.

 "Mmph"

With one hand, he squeezed her cheeks hard enough to make them ache, preventing her from turning her head. She could only look at him.

 "I said you're mine now. Your dear 'uncle' sold you to me. If you value everything he did for you, raising you like a princess, you shouldn't be thinking about the university instead of his cock."

It wasn't even another man, just the university, but his eyes glowed with rabid jealousy.

 "Do you understand, leech? Know your place."

Had someone else humiliated him, and was he taking it out on her? Giselle felt anger boiling inside her, wishing she could go equally mad. But this rabid dog wouldn't even laugh if she bit him now.

 "Pay for having raised you."

Clenching her teeth, Giselle looked at him with hatred, but still obediently lifted her hips. The thick, gnarled cock that had been buried deep inside her slid out, scraping her internal walls. A pleasure she hadn't asked for exploded like sparks within her, making her naked body tremble. The man exhaled roughly between her breasts.

 "Ngh"

The muffled groan that escaped his throat, as if his neck were being squeezed, was because Giselle had strongly clenched the trapped glans inside her, almost crushing it with her intimate muscles.

 "Haa I don't know why you insist on moving those hips for a man you hate, but your technique gets better every time. As expected of the number one student you learn fast, nngh"

The man lost his rhythm when Giselle abruptly dropped her hips. The cock, which had been furiously thrusting into her, stopped just before hitting the bottom. She had planned it.

Chas, chas, chas.

It would be easier to simply get up and let herself fall, but by controlling every movement, adjusting the depth, her thighs burned as if they were on fire.

Although Giselle had trained her endurance with tennis and sports, she was at her limit today. She hadn't recovered from the exhaustion she suffered in the cabin's bathroom, and with the man tormenting her day after day, how could she have any energy left?

 "Do you want help?"  "Ah! No"

The man responded by separating her buttocks with his hands and shaking her up and down. The tip of his cock, as thick as a mallet, crossed the boundary she had marked, invading forbidden territory.
Chapter 119.
Giselle concentrated all the strength possible in her lower belly, desperately trying to block the thrust of that cock pushing into her, twisting her hip to deflect the angle of his assaults. The man seemed even more excited by this: groaning, he began to move not only Giselle's hips but also his entire lower body.

Crack, crack, crack.

 "Ah, mmm, that! Wait! Ah!"

But, as if he still wasn't satisfied, he finally lifted her as if to tear her away from him and threw her abruptly onto the sofa, climbing on top.

Before Giselle could understand what was happening, his cock, which had withdrawn, opened her again and entered at a terrifying speed.

Ahh. No

Terrified, she contracted her internal walls urgently, but even using all her strength couldn't stop him: the man, leveraging his weight, pinned her down like a battering ram.

 "Wait! Just a moment!"

She tried to push her hips back, but he grabbed and dragged her back. Giselle, desperate, even kicked the man's abdomen and shoulders, trying to free herself, but from the beginning, he was an impossible rival to defeat by force.

 "Hah! I I was going to do it!"  "Until when? Were you dreaming of fucking all day with me?"

The man easily crushed her entire body against his chest and, as if cracking a whip, shook his hips ferociously.

Chap chap chap.

The wet sound of his sex coming in and out became increasingly obscene, the mix of their fluids soaking from their groins to their bellies. With each new thrust, the noise of flesh colliding became more shameful.

Yet, Giselle's face was pale, frozen.

Bam.

Again, that mass of flesh, hard as a fist, impacted against the bottom of her core. When she felt a burning tug shoot up from her lower abdomen, fear chilled her from the inside.

It feels like he's going to pierce me all the way to my womb. Even though she knew it was impossible, if he continued hammering her like this from the outside, something would eventually happen.

What if it did?

Conflict began to tangle not only her belly but also her mind. Unable to organize her thoughts, her pupils lost focus at some point.

I don't know. I don't even know anymore.

Ultimately, there was nothing Giselle could do. As if she had exhausted all resistance, she let her body go slack under the man's weight, limiting herself to waiting, dazed, for him to finish and get off her.

 "How obedient"

he murmured, softly kissing her sweaty forehead and stroking her hair before closing his eyes.

Lord

When that look full of madness disappeared, she could see the man she loved. But, no matter how hard she bit her lower lip, the sight of his muscular buttocks moving obscenely behind his elegant face shattered any illusion. It was still shocking to remember that, beneath the appearance of that gentleman, a wild beast was hiding.

 "Lord ngh, wake up please."

Now, the only way to escape him was for Edwin to regain control of his own body. Giselle pleaded with the true owner of that body that was violating and crushing her mercilessly.

 "Lord please haah, react."  "Do you really want him to react now? You'd be the one in trouble."

The man lifted his torso, which had kept Giselle pinned down. With both hands, he forcefully pulled the nightgownwhose sweat was it?that was clinging to her skin.

Pop.

The buttons flew off in all directions.

As the last shred of fabric covering her disappeared, two pieces of white flesh began to shake freely. The man's hands, still clutching the remnants of the garment, followed the undulation of his own movement, roughly caressing her trembling skin.

Although his hands were large enough to cover Giselle's face in a single sweep, they couldn't completely encompass her breasts. His fingers closed greedily, kneading the soft flesh that escaped between them.

 "Ahh!"

Right at the center of her chest.

He didn't suck it, but he pulled the erect nipple and shook it violently. As if it were proof that she, too, was aroused.

Although the man moved his hands away from her breasts, Giselle couldn't relax. His hands moved down, grabbed her legs, and bent them to the sides, shamelessly exposing the place where his cock, erect and vertical, sank into her. The sight of her reddened core, frantically swallowing and spitting out that bronzed shaft while drooling uncontrollably, was so obscene that not even she could bear to look at it.

 "How about it? Should I call Edwin now?"

So he can see how vulgar I've become?

Giselle pressed her lips together and shook her head in despair. The man's sharp gaze immediately softened.

 "Oh, what a shame your Lord can't see this obscene body. I'll have to enjoy it all by myself."

The man immobilized her wrists so she couldn't cover herself and looked at her with lustful eyes. No matter how bestial and exposed she was, every part of her seemed to excite him more, and his movements became increasingly impatient and uncontrolled.

 "Ah nh, ah no I don't want to"

Not just him, but Giselle, too, was being forcibly dragged toward climax. Although pleasure against her will was already enough, the cruel demon seemed intent on turning this moment into an even more unbearable torture.

 "Tell me my name when you come."  "No"  "If you do, we finish here today."

She had the vague feeling that, this time, he would keep his promise. But more than that, she was certain that, if she didn't obey, he would torment her mercilessly for the rest of the day. Left with no option, at the very moment of ecstasy, Giselle looked him in the eyes and, in a broken voice, whispered his name.

 "Lorenz."

The instant she uttered his name, his eyes changed. It was evident: upon hearing her, he, too, had reached the limit of pleasure.

Today was different. The man's body on top of her was trembling with such intensity that Giselle could see it clearly. His hips convulsed uncontrollably, as if they were no longer under his command. She, too, often lost control of her body when overwhelmed by pleasure.

Until now, when they reached climax together, he always regained consciousness before her. But this time, even after Giselle managed to catch her breath, he was still panting heavily.

 "One more time."

The man, whose eyes remained tightly closed, demanded with a voice laden with frustration. Pronouncing a meaningless name a couple of times shouldn't be difficult, but why did it feel so uncomfortable and painful?

 "Lorenz."

Even that name, gritted through her teeth, seemed sufficient. As if she had said something forbidden, Giselle immediately closed her mouth, but the man forced it open again, eagerly inserting his tongue. As if he wanted to tear out and swallow the name she had given him.

 "Mmph hng"

'You are not welcome inside me.'

What Giselle traced over and over with the tip of her tongue was not the man's name, but the words he least wanted to hear at that moment:

'Lord I miss you.'

His pupils trembled as she disdainfully observed that idiot who was kissing her fervently, completely unaware that she was calling out for another. Because the blue gleam in those eyes looking at her now seemed different.

Lord?

It wasn't an illusion. As soon as he recognized her, the man suddenly pulled his lips and his body away. With her hands covering her face, Giselle saw in him the same Lord from that night, desperate upon realizing what he had unconsciously done.

No. It can't be. It's impossible.

At first, she didn't even believe it. She thought the demon, an expert imitator, might be playing a cruel joke, manipulating her.

But why would he do this now?

It was the perfect time to enjoy her without interference. Tricking her would only harm him, not her.

Then? Did he realize I called out for Edwin?

Perhaps, as revenge, he had brought him back at the worst possible moment. Yes, that had to be the answer. As she shrank back and muttered under her breath that she wanted to kill that demon, she heard Edwin speak to himself:

 "I succeeded but why now?"

Succeeded?

 "Lord."

Giselle slowly raised her gaze from between her knees, observing the man at the other end of the sofa.

 "Have you recovered your body?"

He nodded, his head resting in his hands, but noticing that she, too, was covering her eyes, he replied out loud:

 "Yes."  "Oh"

Giselle's mouth opened involuntarily, letting out a gasp of astonishment before she could stop herself. Did he misunderstand? Through the fingers covering her forehead, she saw his eyes close tightly.

 "I thought only he could do it but you succeeded. That's incredible."

Her voice, forcedly cheerful to conceal the discomfort, sounded artificial even to her own ears. Although it could be taken as empty flattery, she was sincere. It was as if a knight in shining armor had defeated the demon to rescue her. Only, given the shame of her nudity, she couldn't throw herself into his arms as she would have liked.
Chapter 120.
 "Thanks to you, I succeeded."  "What exactly did I do?"

The man did not respond to Giselle's question. He picked up his shirt from the floor and, instead of putting it on, offered it to her, his head turned away. It was as if, having seen every inch of her naked body, this piece of clothing was sufficient to cover her.

 "I’m sorry."

When Giselle accepted the shirt, his neck was already flushed crimson. He lowered his head further, his voice heavy with remorse.

 "I was too late."

This time, unlike before, he hadn't lost consciousness when his body was taken from him. He could perceivealbeit faintlywhat was happening around him. But over time, that connection had weakened, becoming intermittent until it nearly vanished. Still, through dulled sensations and Giselle's soft murmurs, he guessed what he had done: I've done something unforgivable to her again.

It would have been a relief to regain control midway through the act, but Edwin’s legsand what he saw between themconfirmed it was already too late. Even so, Giselle did not blame him.

 "No. I’m just happy you’re back, Lord."

Have I really returned?

Edwin had tried to open the hatch of his consciousness all that time, without success. Until, without warning, it yielded. It was only upon seeing the state of his body that he understood why: That bastard's resistance weakened right after climax.

It was obvious that once the sexual excitement faded and the other personality recovered lucidity, he would try to regain control. Edwin didn't know how to prevent his body from being snatched away again. Time was running out. While Giselle dressed in the shirt on the sofa, he pressed her:

 "Get out of here before he realizes and takes my body again."  "I can't."

That wretched man had installed a combination locklike those on bank vaultson the penthouse door. He locked it every time he entered, so Giselle couldn't escape even if he let down his guard.

 "Don’t you know the password?"

Edwin tried to recall it, but it wouldn't come to mind. He would need to relax, open the hatch, and search through that guy's hidden memories. Without a professional hypnotist, he wasn't sure he could pull it off.

Or maybe he didn't even need hypnosis. Soon, the other personality would recover the body, and Edwin would be dragged back into the subconscious. But if he fell unconscious this time, as usual, he couldn't save Giselle. Even if he held onto this body, what good would it do? They would both remain trapped.

In the end, he concluded there was no choice but to go back, no matter how reckless it was, and find the lock combination.

 "I think I have to go back to find out."  "I’ll wait for you."

The smart girl didn't ask where he was going or beg him to stay.

 "Just hold on until then. I’m sorry."  "No, don't worry. I'll be fine. I've been fine so far, right? Although Lorenz’s personality is a bit naughty, he’s good to me."

Giselle chattered with false bravery, laughing as if she had no worries. As if he didn't know she was lying. Giselle, I saw everything. I saw you cry because you wanted to go to school. And that wasn't all he saw. That's why he couldn't tell her. Feigning ignorance was the most courteous thing to do.

 "Ah! Wait! Lord"

Just as he was about to lose control of his body again, Giselle called him in a rushed voice.

 "What is it?"  "If you wake up like this Lorenz will realize you returned"

She was right. If that happened, that bastard could sabotage Edwin's attempt to find the combination, change it, or even take Giselle somewhere else.

But what truly made Giselle hesitate, blushing as she mentioned it, was that they would have to return to the same position they were in before: her body naked, his tongue deep in her mouth. And that damned dog in heat hadn't been satisfied with just that.

He had faced countless dangers, he had been through all kinds of battles, but nothing had left him as paralyzed as this: being forced to perform, of his own free will, that repulsive act that should never be permitted.

However, there wasn't even time for conflict or torment. The sound of Edwin’s shirt being ripped off and thrown to the floor echoed in the room. As he felt Giselle's movement on his skin as she lay back on the sofa, he finally lifted his head, which he had kept down all that time. But his eyes remained closed, advancing toward her only by the touch of his fingers.

The inability to see forced him to feel her naked legs and waist. Looking at Giselle's body would have been indecent. And touching it? He didn't know which of the two she would consider more appropriate, but for Edwin, both were equally unforgivable.

Beneath his fingertips, Giselle's body tensed with a clarity that made him wish he could kill himself right there. Immersed in that self-hatred, he climbed back on top of her. Now the hardest part awaited him.

In the exact same posture where he had regained his composure.

Edwin still held the base of his own cock in his hand, rigid and repulsive.

Edwin is about to enter me.

Although it was already habitual, Giselle's heart pounded faster. Even if it was the same act, it wasn't the same when it was him, and not another man.

 "Hnn"

Edwin is inside me.

She knew the right thing was to close her eyes, but Giselle couldn't look away from the man she had always loved in secret, who was now merging with her body. The man she loved was handing her, with his own hands, a symbol of desire. Her reason told her this was wrong, but her chest ignored all logic and thumped forcefully.

At what point did I become a monster to Giselle?

Although his sight was denied, the heat of her body and the soft but firm pressure enveloping the tip of his cock sent a shiver down his spine. But, at least, it confirmed that he had succeeded: he had found her entry without needing to grope, guided only by instinct.

The cock, still far from easing its rigidity, slid easily towards the girl's core. Edwin thought the insertion had stopped when it touched the bottom of her core, but his body, acting by instinct, rotated his hips. As soon as he adjusted the angle, his sex opened Giselle's narrow channel and sank to the root in a single, sliding movement. A wave of dizziness washed over him, followed by icy horror.

What he had imagined as the most difficult proved easy and that ease led to a terrible revelation: his body knew Giselle's too well. It remembered the shape and location of what it should never have learned, moving without thinking.

 "Mmm."

Pleasure struck him first at the tip of his sex, followed by a guilt that petrified him. Giselle, feeling his involuntary tremor, became alarmed: the walls of her core, still convulsing after orgasm, contracted uncontrollably. She feared he would misinterpret those spasms as an attempt at seduction, and her heart skipped a beat.

 "It’s just that my body won’t obey me."

The explanation sounded like a pathetic excuse as soon as she uttered it. While nibbling his own lower lip, Edwin moistened his dry lips and murmured:

 "Forgive me."  "I’m sorry too."

As she watched his faceonce tensecontort in agony, the guilt in her chest drowned out any flicker of emotion.

 "Why are you apologizing?"  "Because you ah."

She tried to tell him he shouldn't apologize, but the words were cut off when he tilted his head and sank his teeth into her lip.

Boom.

In that instant, her heart shook her entire body and then stopped. When his tongue timidly entered between her parted lips, her heart started beating again like a runaway horse.

He’s kissing me. He Not another, but him

She knew it was an empty kiss, a mere pose for the demon to recall his last action. But still, her chest fluttered with a mix of shame and euphoria. I hate being so stupid, I hate that this makes my heart race but she couldn't help it. It was a force beyond her control.

This is his kiss.

The kiss of a large man containing his strength, fearful of hurting the fragile woman in his arms. Every movement was cautious, deliberate so characteristic of him. A kiss that only Edwin could give.
Chapter 121.
t was a contact too brief to call a kiss, yet every one of his small movements unleashed a torrent in Giselle's chest.

The tip of his tongue, which had remained still as if unsure where to go, brushed against hers. She didn't know if it was a mistake, but she instinctively followed it when he tried to pull back. The moment their damp skins met, Giselle felt Edwin suddenly tense between her thighs.

She quickly withdrew her tongue and watched his reaction. His eyes, which had been tightly closed, snapped open. Giselle froze as well, but the shifting light in his gaze convinced her that the one looking at her now was not Edwin, and she felt a wave of relief.

 "What's wrong?"

The demon sucked on her lips with curiosity.

 "Did something happen?"  "Did something happen?"

She feigned composure, but began to worry: Will he notice, through the place where we are joined, that my pulse is racing?

 "Did I say something strange?"

The intensity of his gaze made her uncomfortable. But if he asks that, it means he doubts, but isn't sure, right?

 "Have you ever said anything normal?"  "If your Lord had returned, perhaps I would have."  "Really?"

Giselle widened her eyes exaggeratedly, feigning greater surprise. The man seemed to fall for the trap, but he didn't entirely abandon his suspicion. He lowered his gaze to check if they were still joined. And he didn't stop there: he confirmed that his cock was still erect, that Giselle's core was still throbbing around him, that not much time had passed since the climax and only then did he stop doubting.

 "Yeah, right. That would be impossible."

What if, out of shame, he hadn't returned to his original posture? Just imagining it made her dizzy. Thank goodness Giselle secretly swallowed a sigh of relief.

 "We're done now, let go of me."

As soon as she overcame the crisis, Giselle tried to escape him, but the man held her fast.

 "Ouch! You promised it would only be once."  "Who said it's over? Don't you know that a meal doesn't end until dessert, after the main course?"

As he started licking every corner of her body, determined to savor his victory, Giselle desperately pushed him away.

No. When Edwin returns, he has to be dressed.

If she woke up this time while he was sucking her breasts or sinking his tongue between her legs, Giselle would die of shame before Edwin himself could react.

But the demon trapped between her thighs didn't move an inch. If force wouldn't work, she would have to use her brain. The first thought that came up was to feign exhaustion so he would hug her, and she could fall asleep. It wasn't a bad plan. That way, even if Edwin regained control, he wouldn't notice.

But what if, by falling asleep, the demon also returned to that place in his mind with doors and rooms? He might run into Edwin. Thinking it over, it didn't seem like such a good idea.

 "I actually want real dessert. I'm hungry."

Better keep him awake for now.

 "Buy me something tasty."

To leave, he would have to open the lock. The moment he turns the dial, will Edwin be able to see the password in his mind? Even if he didn't see it, perhaps the act of recalling it would help. Now that was a perfect plan.

But wouldn't the man find it suspicious that she, who was recently crying with rage and despair, was suddenly hungry and sending him on errands?

 "What do you want to eat?"

Against all odds, he didn't seem suspicious at all. Rather, as if he was happy that Giselle was asking him for something, he even wrote down her order.

 "I’ll be right back."

You come back or you don't come back, I don't care.

When the man got dressed and left, the real wait began.

Lord, come back soon.

This time, the hope was real.

 "I'm back."  "......."  "Come on, come closer. I was waiting for you. This is how you greet someone."

 "I waited."  "Not for you for Edwin."

But even though the demon returned, Edwin did not. That afternoon, Giselle sat on the sofa and looked worriedly at the face of the man sleeping on her lap. What if Edwin is digging through hidden memories and the demon finds out? She had tried everythingexcept something obsceneto prevent this demon from falling asleep, but he had finally succumbed to exhaustion.

Maybe it's easier to regain the body while he sleeps

So she fought the weight of her eyelids to stay awake, but Edwin still didn't return.

Can't he come back?

Does he only appear when we reach climax?

Just thinking about it made her face burn and cold sweat break out.

Please, let that not be the case.

She fanned her burning cheeks; the movement bothered the man, who frowned slightly and stirred.

Is it Edwin?

But no: avoiding the light, he burrowed his face into her belly, took her hand, and awkwardly stroked it before falling back asleep.

But why won't he leave?

Except for the day he brought her to the cabin, he always came at dawn and left before daybreak. But today he had shown up early, and now, with tea time approaching, he was still planted in the penthouse.

Besides, she had never seen him sleep before

If it were Edwin, she would wish this dreamof having him resting in her armswould never end. But this guy just seems to be using her as a pillow How annoying!

Why the hell won't he disappear already?

If he had returned to the residence and given the body back to Edwin as usual, Giselle would have already been rescued. Edwin she knew would have deduced her location just by looking out the window.

Could it be that this wretch suspects something and that's why he won't leave?

Giselle looked at the sleeping man with eyes full of apprehension. What could be happening now inside that mind that never rests? Imagining it, her cheeks flushed red once more.

Edwin said he could open the doors to that inner world and rummage through memories Did he see everything that happened between this demon and me?

Oh my God, it can't be.

The shame she felt when Edwin saw her nudity, the sorrow at imagining him suffering over a relationship he never wanted everything tangled in her chest, suffocating her. It was hard to breathe, as if something was pressing down on her from the inside.

What will I do? What will he think of me now?

Giselle dropped her head forcefully against the backrest of the sofa and covered her face with her hands. If she didn't hide like this, she wouldn't be able to endure the embarrassment.

 "Giselle."

Hearing her name, she opened her eyes abruptly and lifted her head. Just then, the man sat up on her legs, and their eyes met inches away. That warm blue could only be

 "Lord"

Now she was sure: just by looking into his eyes, she knew how to distinguish him from the demon.

 "You're back."

She instantly forgot the distress she felt moments ago, worried about how to face him. Seeing him again, she couldn't help but smile. However, Edwin did not return her smile. With a serious expression, as if afraid of being overheard, he urgently murmured three numbers:

 "32, 18, 1."  "Thank you, Lord."

He frowned and gave her a slight push on the shoulder.

 "You leave first."

As she got up, he gave her quick instructions: 'As soon as you get out, take a taxi and go to the Eccleston residence. Look for Sir Loise. I'll take care of the rest.' It was logical: if they left together and the demon regained control, everything would have been in vain. Giselle nodded and took a step toward the door.

 "See you later."

Edwin didn't nod. Instead, he forced a smile, but his expression remained bitter. A bad sign. Giselle stopped dead in her tracks.

 "Lord, wait You're not thinking of?"

Suddenly, a thought chilled her blood: Is he planning to commit suicide? Without hesitation, she ran back and tightly grabbed his hand.

 "Come with me."  "Don't talk nonsense. You know I can't."  "If you don't go, I won't either."

Why is this intelligent girl choosing to throw a tantrum right now? Edwin didn't understand until he saw her eyes fill with tears.

 "If you die, I will die too."  "Giselle"

My decisions only hurt you. Her pain pierced his chest.

 "I won't die. I promise you. Now, please, go."

Even though he spoke sincerely, Giselle didn't believe him.
Chapter 122.
 "I won't leave without you, Lord."  "As you say, we'll see each other again. How about we have dinner together tonight? While you wait for me, think about what you'd like to eat."

Although he tried to calm her even with promises, Giselle did not listen and continued to pull on his hand desperately. There was no time for this. Edwin stood up and dragged her towards the entrance. When he personally unlocked the door and opened it, far from rejoicing at her liberation, Giselle clung to his waist with a start, sensing his intention to abandon her.

 "I'd rather live locked up forever than let you commit suicide."

She knew that even though she had him trapped now, if he used his brute force, she couldn't win. Giselle's only weapons were her words.

 "Actually I lied to you, Lord."  "We'll talk about this later."  "I might be carrying your child."

The steps of the man, who was dragging Giselle towards the elevator, stopped dead. When he looked at her in horror, she delivered another blow:

 "I don't know for sure yet. But I think I'm pregnant."

Of course, after her body had been so mistreated, if she hadn't miscarried, perhaps it wasn't a pregnancy but she omitted that detail. That kind of truth wouldn't keep him.

 "And the baby?"

Giselle remembered. The night he had asked her if she was pregnant, a dark foreboding had struck her: “Perhaps he will commit suicide.” Hadn't he brought up that topic, avoided by both for so long, because he hoped that if she carried his child, he would abandon his decision to die? If she had answered him honestly that night"I don't know yet"perhaps he wouldn't have brought the razor to his wrist. Since she learned he wanted to die, she hadn't stopped tormenting herself, replaying that conversation over and over.

 "If you're not here What will become of me and the baby?"

So, she used a child who might not even exista bastard who, if born, should be eliminatedas a shackle. Shamelessly, she clung to that pretext to tie down the feet of the man heading towards death.

He who raised the child of another without obligation could not evade his duty if it were his own. Furthermore, would he really be cruel enough to throw himself into the void without remorse, knowing that his mistake had left Giselle pregnant? She was so desperate to save him that she didn't hesitate to manipulate even the feelings he would have preferred to forget.

 "Giselle"

Striking his weakest point brought him down instantly. He no longer tried to pull away; instead, he caressed her tear-soaked face with his palm. She, like a puppy begging for mercy, raised her glassy eyesabout to overflowand buried her cheek into that hand as wide as his heart.

Edwin looked at her with that soul-crushing gaze. The same one he had when she, threatening to starve herself if he abandoned her, forced him to stay.

'How could I leave you and go?'

Giselle knew: at that moment, he was thinking exactly the same thing as he was back then. His heart was once again leaning towards life.

 "Don't worry. I will always be by your side. So please, take care of yourself. For yourself."

Finally, he managed to usher Giselle into the elevator that had just arrived.

 "Hurry up. Leave before that guy wakes up."

This time, she separated from him without resistance and entered the elevator alone. The firmness in her gaze, which until then had denoted an unwavering determination, had vanished. Most likely, his decision to die had dissolved amidst doubt.

 "See you later."

The elevator doors closed. The pale face that reflected, with cruel transparency, an anxiety he hadn't even managed to hide, disappeared from his sight. Edwin was left alone.

The smile he had feigned for her vanished without a trace. In front of Giselle, he had acted as if he had recovered the will to live, but the reality was quite the opposite. However, now he couldn't even allow himself to think of dying. 'I might be pregnant'whether true or just a desperate lie to keep himproved once again that Giselle was a clever girl.

A baby

For Edwin, the word "child" had only been used to refer to Giselle. But if she was telling the truth, now "child" could mean something he hadn't imagined even in his worst nightmares: a son of his and Giselle's.

He would respect her decision, but was it truly a choice made in freedom? A forced decision was not a decision.

Giselle had walked a golden path: from the academy for high-society young ladies to the kingdom's most prestigious university. At the end of that road, a life of respect and comfort awaited her, perfect for raising a child. But now she intended to abandon that secure future to enter a path full of thorns.

The bright future of the girl he loved more than anything in the world was about to be ruined by another child. Even if it were his, the idea was not pleasant. If another man had gotten Giselle pregnant, he would not have hesitated to advise her to reconsider. But, as he was the culprit, any attempt to dissuade her would only be seen as a cowardly attempt to shirk his responsibility.

A desire to dissuade her from having the baby wasn't born only for Giselle's sake.

If she became a mother, Edwin would inevitably become a father. A father who sometimes transforms into a murderer? That demon, just as he had done with Giselle, would undoubtedly use the child as a hostage. He would be the worst father imaginable.

So, this was not wise for anyone. Giselle, as intelligent as she was, already knew this. And yet, she had made this foolish decision just to save him. In the end, it was all Edwin's fault.

These looping thoughts always led him to the same place: wanting to die. But, of course, for the Edwin of now, death was a luxury he couldn't afford.

He had rescued Giselle from the clutches of that monster, so now he had to find a way to protect her and that possible child. Just then, as he heard the sound of the elevator descending and turned around to return to the penthouse, it happened.

A sudden dizziness, as if he were being sucked into some abyss. His vision suddenly darkened. He felt his body sink, as if he were being dragged underwater. He knew immediately that he no longer had control.

If so, all sound should have faded and yet, a voicesharp, close, like the growl of a beast showing its fangspierced the back of his neck:

 "Why are you still awake?"

Edwin turned towards the voice, unable to hide his agitation. There he was, staring intently at him.

The faceless man.

«Edwin Ecclestone is alone.»

For the first time, Edwin was confronting an existence that made that premise false under any condition.

⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⊰⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅∙∘☽༓☾∘∙•⋅⋅⋅•⋅⋅⊰⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅

The escape had failed once again.

Desperate, Giselle longed to hear Edwin's scolding: "Why didn't you leave when you could?" But she hadn't seen him for over three days.

What could have happened to him?

He hadn't left the penthouse. Which could only mean one thing: the demon had been in control all this time.

What might have become of Edwin?

Giselle stared intently at the face of the man who had forced her to sleep holding him. In a quiet voice, she called him:

 "Lord"

But he didn't wake up. Perhaps, now, he couldn't even do so if he tried. Before going to sleep, she had seen him take pills. Undeniably, they were sleeping pills.

Is he drugging Edwin to ensure he doesn't regain control?

She knew the truth now: Edwin could open that "special door" and take command of his body. He could rummage through memories, just like her.

That power he boasted about was no longer exclusively his. Just as it happened to her, now he was exposed: every thought, every memory, laid bare. The demon was on the verge of a role reversal.

How delightful.

The revenge was so sweet that it even seemed comical: she had been the one who gave Edwin the tools to fight back.

 "I succeeded thanks to you."

Reflecting on those words, Giselle wondered: Did Edwin obtain that new power by hearing, in his mind, the conversations I had with his other personality?

It seemed the man also believed this to be the case. Thanks to her or rather, because of her. Furthermore, after discovering her escape attemptthat conspiracy to decipher the password by secretly allying with Edwinhe now treated her like a spy who had betrayed his trust.

Betrayal? How ridiculous.

I was never on your side to begin with.

Fortunately, that absurd resentment only manifested in his expressions and words. Although she knew he wouldn't go so far as to hit her, she couldn't shake the knot of anxiety in her chest: What if he crosses the line this time? His mental state always hung by a thread.

That lack of control, that desperation of being cornered was undoubtedly because he was now the one being pursued by Edwin. And that growing irritation? Could it be due to lack of sleep?

Although he medicated himself with sleeping pills, no matter how much he slept, his exhaustion worsened day by day. That morning, over his cigarette and coffee, he had squinted his eyes with a tired expression and murmured something strange in a low voice
Chapter 123.
 "Everything is too vivid. That's why I don't feel anything. Does the same thing happen to you?"  "No?"

The man asked Giselle if the same thing didn't happen to her: if, when flooded with stimuli that were too intense and sudden, she didn't end up dulled, as if her mind and body became numb in a fog, or if the world didn't spin as it does after a heavy drink.

 "I've spent nights awake and felt stunned But you've been sleeping."

He looked at her in confusion, unable to make her understand, and after a resigned sigh, he fell silent. At that moment, he seemed like a defeated man.

 "I need to rest."

Despite having just woken up, he took more sleeping pills and went back to sleep. As expected, he dragged Gisellewho didn't need to sleepto bed and held her close.

Now that she thought about it, since that day, the man only used her as a pillow or held her tight in his arms, but he did not satiate his sexual desires. Perhaps it was because, as he himself said, he no longer felt stimuli or because exhaustion stifled even desire.

In other circumstances, when Giselle replied with that 'No?'as if what he was saying sounded absurdthe man would have understood that he was the only one experiencing those symptoms and would have fallen silent. But this time, even knowing that revealing his weaknesses had led to this situation, he ended up confessing another. Was he so exhausted that he had lost even his judgment?

After observing and listening, Giselle deduced that the personality parasitizing Edwin's mind was more vulnerable than an ordinary human to external stimuli, and that controlling the body and consciousness demanded excessive energy from him. That's why he couldn't maintain dominance for very long and kept retreating.

See? You can't snatch this body away from me forever.

So, if the other was weakenedlike at climax or when sleepingcould Edwin regain control?

What Giselle was anxiously hoping for was, for the man, a concern. That's why he kept taking sleeping pills or obsessively checking the clock while awake.

 "There's no need to do this."

Giselle had been trying to convince him to stop this nonsense for days.

 "You're doing it to keep me locked up, right? I already told you it's not necessary!"

Edwin wouldn't commit suicide. If he still wouldn't release her had the reason for her captivity changed?

The man knew why Edwin would no longer try to take his own life. He remembered what Giselle had told him.

 "That thing about you thinking you're pregnant was it serious or a lie?"  "A lie."

Saying it was a lie is also a lie. No, she didn't know. She had lied so many times that even Giselle was confused about her own condition. There was only one certainty:

She still hadn't seen blood.

At least, that was true until that afternoon.

 "Why are you still awake?"

The demon realized that Edwin, although he had lost consciousness, had not lost his self-awareness and was still digging through his subconscious.

 "How did you do it? Why don't you just disappear?"  "I'm the owner here. It's your turn to disappear."

Thus, unexpectedly, Edwin found himself face-to-face with the demon inside him. Seeing him up close, he looked less like a demon and more like a monstrous creature. He charged like a furious beast, but seeing that Edwin wouldn't die no matter how hard he tried, he ended up treating Edwin as the monster and banished him.

Toward the depths of the subconscious.

In that fathomless abyss, where he couldn't even perceive himself, no external stimulus arrived. That's why there was no way to know if Giselle had managed to escape or if she had been captured again.

Edwin walked and walked in absolute darkness. Do the senses adapt even to the absence of stimuli? Little by little, he began to perceive his surroundings.

He stopped for the first time when he noticed an abrupt change in the flow. He advanced against a swift current and, in the end, it was not an illusion: there was a faint glow. It didn't take long to reach the exit.

Just as he was trying to escape, a dolphin appeared in front of him, blocking his path. It had a dial on its dorsal fin. It was the same creature Edwin had trapped before the monster discovered him.

When he needed to find a password, Edwin assumed all memories were stored in rooms, so he opened countless doors. Until he realized that here, things without a room-like form also existed. Like that dolphin that, upon seeing him, fled in terror.

What is this creature for?

Following a hunch, the dial appeared in his field of vision, just as he expected.

The demon, realizing that Edwin was searching for the password through the rooms of his mind, had decided to store it not in a place, but in a living being: the dolphin, programmed to flee every time Edwin approached.

Trapping it was not easy. Every time the usurper of his body tried to extract the code from his memory, the dolphin submerged as if seeking refuge in the depths. Edwin studied its pattern, waited for the moment it emerged to reveal the password and then he attacked.

Although he captured it on the first attempt, the number did not appear immediately. The demon had left a kind of riddle: only when Edwin guessed the answer did the dolphin expel three digits from its blowhole.

What bad taste. Childish, even.

The dolphin, as if knowing it had betrayed its master, grew furious upon seeing him: it violently thrashed its tail. But Edwin was already crossing the exit threshold when, suddenly, the creature darted like a torpedo and vanished. It was not a retreat, but an attack: it was heading towards the surface, the boundary between consciousness and the subconscious.

Now he's my guardian?

As he anticipated, the demon soon interfered.

First, it was the tongue.

Something wet and soft wrapped around his, crushing it with a dull pressure. The texture was almost carnal, familiar and then he understood. The memory of a kiss with Giselle.

 "Haa"

A sound, somewhere between a groan and a meow, echoed in his ears. Close and distant at the same time. The mass surrounding his tongue trembled, vibrant. Before he could question it, it appeared before his eyes: pink, moist flesh, sliding towards him. A small, pulsating knot at its center.

A woman's sex.

It wasn't a kiss.

His tongue was buried inside Giselle's core.

"Evil" and "I'm sorry" sprang simultaneously from his mind. He closed his eyes reflexively, but the memory did not fade.

Clasp.

The sensation of warm liquid, expelled from her body, splashing onto his face. The demon had deliberately selected the most sordid moments, the vilest abuses, to show him. An obvious tactic: to shake his will.

His body, halfway out the exit, retreated a step but did not fall back into the darkness. As painful as it wasas much as he wanted to throw himself into hellnothing would strike him harder now than the memory of that moment: having soberly penetrated the girl he himself had raised.

As he took the definitive step, the dolphin watching him from above let out a wail.

And then, the scene changed.

 "Could you make Edwin fall in love with me?"

What?

It was a question that could only leave Edwin perplexed. But Giselle was not a child so naive as to sell her soul to the demon for a love potion. There must have been something more behind that question. However, the demon, cutting out all context, had made him hear only that, clearly to incriminate her.

Just as Edwin, maintaining his calm, was about to take his other foot out

 "The filthy asshole here is you."

''

My sweet puppy swearing such bloody words? This really caught me by surprise, to the point of making me stop dead. It was obvious, from the context, that the wretch must have insulted Edwin or Giselle with dirty words first. There was no way Giselle, always polite and refined, would be the first to swear.

After resisting all the attacks, he had finally managed to exit the depths of his mind. Like eyes adapting to darkness, the longer he spent in the world of the subconscious, the more accustomed he became to its sensations. What was initially just a dense, undifferentiated darkness now revealed itself with clarity.

Small fish swam among multicolored corals clinging to the rocks. It resembled the sea of the Emerald Coast, where Edwin used to dive in the summer. But here there was something that place did not have:

A tower.

An artificial structure that rose imposingly in the middle of a landscape shaped by nature. Edwin looked up. The tower extended vertically until it was lost high above, becoming an unattainable point. But now he knew something: at its summit, where it touched the surface, there was a hatch.
Chapter 124.
My breath caught. What right did this intruder have to build his own world inside my mind?

According to his own tastes.

He had recreated the sea he loved so much, but Edwin sensed he hadn't done it unconsciously.

Still, why did it have to be the bottom of the sea?

At the very least, it made it easier for Edwin to swim towards the surface. He was an expert swimmer, capable of surviving even the most turbulent rivers. He fought the currents with brute strength, but escaping required more than just skill. Every time he got close to the top of the tower, he invariably ran into dolphins or surveillance planes.

Airplanes flying underwater. A madness that completely ignored the most basic laws of physics.

As soon as the watchers detected him, that guy would interfere. The resistance was much fiercer than in the depths. Desperate, even. It seemed that the closer he got to the surface of his consciousness, the greater the influence the intruder exerted from the outside. That's why, just as Edwin reached the summit, he was dragged back into the abyss in an instant.

Ascent and descent. It was like being condemned to push a rock uphill, over and over again, never reaching the top.

This isn't working. I need another path.

Edwin entered the tower.

If you're going to invade my mind, I'll do the same to yours.

As he climbed, he opened every door he found. The other wouldn't like him rummaging through his memories. He might stumble upon something he had hidden on purpose.

Vroom.

As expected.

A dolphin sped past the window; shortly after, the tower shuddered. But it wasn't an attempt to stop him, but rather to collect the memories Edwin had scattered carelessly.

BAM! BAM! BAM!

The sound of doors slamming shut in a chain pursued him from below. Unfazed, Edwin kept opening them all, ascending calmly as the tower shook.

What's this?

Suddenly, he stopped dead in his tracks. His gaze fixed on a small door, hidden in a corner like a mouse hole. It had no knob, but when he pushed it with his fingers, though it didn't open, there was a response: a dial appeared.

Could there be something here he wants to hide from me? Some thought or memory?

'Might be important information.'

After spending time combining numbers that the other might have considered memorable, he found the answer: Giselle's date of birth.

'Damn son of a bitch.'

What could he have hidden behind this? He had a feeling it would be shocking, but if he wanted to destabilize him, he needed to bring it to light. He opened the door.

"Mmmh, ah Duke Ah-ah!"

The first thing that greeted him was a woman's moan. Ironic that he now recognized Giselle's gasps all too well, which is how he knew immediately it wasn't her.

Sure enough. In the scene unfolding before his eyes, the two intertwined bodies were those of Edwin's father and the governess he had once been in love with.

It was common for a teenager to idealize a trusted adult and for that admiration to turn into attraction. But the moment he witnessed their intimacy, what should have been a passing fever of youth became a wound that left indelible scars.

His father had always been a manno, a beastwilling to mount any woman. Who would expect morality from an animal? Because of that, Edwin believed he had overcome the pain of his father's immoral lust.

He didn't know it would be different if the woman involved was someone he had loved.

Had it been another man, Edwin would have reproached himself for his own incapacity, due to his youth, to be a romantic interest. But why did it have to be that depraved man? Even she began to seem repulsive to him.

The governess, whom he remembered as a serene and devout woman, had been his mother's confidante. The betrayal upon discovering that, while comforting his mother over his father's infidelities, she was secretly sleeping with him, was indescribable.

At least, if it had been a forced relationship, he would have understood. But her actions showed no coercion. And what followed was the most clichéd affair storyline.

Edwin's disillusionment with humanity always originated in sexual desire.

And just when his revulsion towards sex was at its peak, he saw another person having intercourse. If the act between parents was already a nightmare for a child, what then was the adultery of one of them? For Edwin, it was an event traumatic enough to change his character.

And that very memory was hidden in this room.

Edwin understood too late: this wasn't a safe for secrets.

It was a trap laid for him.

'What a pity. I've fallen for it.'

But the other would regret it too. The Edwin of now was not that teenager traumatized by his first encounter with sex. Thanks to that degenerate who, without being an Eccleston, still faithfully followed his family's stallion lineage, he had already lost count of how many times he had thought that nothing could be more shocking than violating Giselle in full lucidity.

Apparently, the other hadn't yet read those thoughts, as he kept offering him incorrect answers.

'Even so, he was right to calculate that I would fall into this trap.'

They didn't just share reasoning capacity, but also patterns of thought. Edwin was fighting against himself, and time and again, the other was anticipating him.

'Then, I should also be able to read his moves.'

Although he had wasted time falling into the trap, he had already ascended quite a bit. Thanks to his skill at evading the watchers. Edwin, hidden in the blind spot by the window, waited for the sound of the drones to fade before crossing the space with an agile leap. Just when he thought he had reached the darkness beyond the reach of his pursuers, something grabbed his ankle.

What is this?

"Ajussi"

A fragile voice, emerging from below, stopped him for a second time.

"...Giselle?"

Only upon kneeling down could he make out the girl curled up in the dark corner of the staircase. A skeletal, trembling figure, smeared with blood. The first image Edwin had preserved of her.

"What are you doing here?"

She wasn't stored in a room, like the other memories.

"I'm scared"
"Of what? Who is hurting you?"

The answer came before Giselle could speak: a drone passed behind the wall, and the girl turned ashen in an instant, freezing solid. Her rigid body trembled like an aspen in a blizzard.

Giselle was terrified of planes. For her, they weren't a means of transport, but deadly rain falling from the sky. Although under his protection she had managed to heal from the traumas of war and readjust to a quiet life, she never overcame that terror.

Perhaps in those four years without him she had managed it. But back then, the mere roar of an engine left her petrified.

"Hmm"

His heart constricted seeing her so terrified she couldn't even scream or cry as she might have wanted.

Even if it was just a memory, he couldn't take a step and leave her there.

Edwin took off his uniform jacket. It was ironic: a moment ago he was only wearing a shirt and trousers, but now he was in full officer's regalia. As he always did when Giselle, at ten years old, got scared, he wrapped her small, trembling body in the jacket. As he sat down beside her, the girl took refuge in his lap without hesitation, just like in those days.

"It's alright, I'm here."

The girl's trembling subsided as he comforted her, but she still rolled her eyes, alert to any outside sound, in case the plane returned. The scene broke his heart.

If only he had something else to calm her down.

At that moment, he felt something in his pocket. Pulling it out, he couldn't help but smile: it was one of those chocolate bars distributed by the army.

"That what is it?"

Recognizing food, the girl's eyes lit up. Edwin handed her the unwrapped chocolate. Without even thanking him, Giselle grabbed it eagerly and, after three voracious bites, stuffed the whole thing into her mouth, as if afraid someone would snatch it away.

She won't even be able to chew it like that.

Pursing her lips with determination, she moved her mouth like in the old days, when every bite was a race against hunger.

"Is it good?"

Only after swallowing the chocolate did the girl exhale the air she was holding and flash a radiant smile. It was one of those smiles that, just seeing them, filled you with satisfaction.

Edwin wanted to see that smile over and over again. That's why he had shared with her everything that brought him happiness. Wasn't that the feeling of a father towards his daughter? But he, who had always believed he would live and die a bachelor, never imagined he would have something like a daughter of his own.
Chapter 125.
When Edwin was in the position of having to get married, of course he had to change his perspective. To secure his lineage, he needed a son, but Edwin, against all logic, longed for a daughter. An adorable little girl like Giselle.

If he shared these thoughts with his married friends, they all insisted that their children would be incomparably beautiful, but Edwin was reluctant to believe it. He preferred to trust in the frank admiration of his elders: "Nothing surpasses the beauty of the first child."

Giselle, you are my first girl. My beautiful girl.

As if a weight had lightened in his heart, he wrapped his arms around the little girl who, now relaxed, rested her head against his chest and began to fall asleep. He caressed her back with gentle pats. Although those had been difficult times, reuniting with the Giselle of his childhood filled him with joy.

This girl, when she grows up, could give me a son

Suddenly, a self-disgust pierced his chest, sharp and shameless. He felt guiltynaturallybefore the Giselle of the past, innocent and oblivious that the body that was now seeking refuge in him would end up committing impure acts with the adult she would become.

 "Lord, don't go," the girl murmured as she noticed his embrace loosening, clinging to him with childish stubbornness.

 "Tell me something funny."  "Something fun?"

Suddenly, he recalled those nights in the bomb shelter, when the bombing kept the little girl shaking, unable to sleep. To calm her down, he told her stories, even resorting to unfunny tales when his ideas ran out. Ironically, those adults also forgot their fear of death while listening to his murmurs. Paradoxically, the nights of bombs had become good memories thanks to the presence of the most fragile of all: a girl whom he could not protect.

 "Do you know why the four-leaf clover is a symbol of good luck?"  "No. Why?"  "A long time ago, a general in the middle of a battle bent down to pick up a four-leaf clover and at that moment, a bullet whistled past his head."

Repeating the same story he had told her before, reliving every word, a forgotten warmth expanded in his chest. It was a happiness he hadn't felt in a long time.

I want to return to that time.

It was impossible, but he could stay here. Was he not allowed to live, even for a moment, in that beautiful past instead of in his shattered reality?

Without realizing it, he was surprised to be smiling at those thoughts.

This trap was designed this way.

They didn't use suffering as bait, but happiness. When not even his worst memories managed to hold him back, someone had planted the little Giselle near the top of the tower, the only being Edwin could never let go of.

'Well played.'

He was a strategist even more ruthless than the enemy ace whose name he had stolen long ago. Although, compared to his great master plan, the details were sloppy. He deserves a failing grade, Edwin thought.

 "Giselle."  "Yes?"  "Do you know who Giselle is?"  "It's the name you gave me."  "No. You are Natalia now. Not Giselle."  "......."  "If you were really ten-year-old Natalia, you wouldn't know who Giselle is. So who are you?"

The girl's previously serene face twisted into a grotesque expression. Her body, which should have been that of a ten-year-old girl, swelled unnaturally, breaking away from Edwin's embrace. Her neck lengthened until it hit the ceiling of the tower's narrow hallway, and her shape ceased to be human completely.

Grrrk.

Between her exposed fangs, instead of Giselle's sweet voice, the roar of a beast emerged. The creature extended its claws towards Edwin.

She had fallen asleep for a moment, but when she woke up, she noticed that the lower part of her body was wet. Edwin is always very warm, she thought. As he hugged her tightly while she slept, she assumed it was just sweat until she tried to move.

As she sat up, she felt something warm and thick sliding between her legs. With trembling hands, she lifted her skirt.

There it was: in the center of her white underwear, a crimson stain expanded. Giselle's face paled, as if all the blood in her body had fled to that place.

What is this?

She remained paralyzed, until, too late, she realized that she could stain her skirt and the sheets. She crawled to the bathroom.

Sshhhh

The sound of running water must have alerted someone, because she felt footsteps approaching the door. She wanted to go out, but her legs didn't respond. The body that minutes before had moved urgently now belonged to another person.

 "What are you doing there?"

The man opened the door and, seeing Giselle curled up against the wall, asked. Then he looked away at the sink, where the water continued to gush. Inside lay her blood-tinged underwear. She should hide it, she thought, but something inside Giselle was so numb that she didn't even feel ashamed.

After a moment, the man rephrased the question:

 "You said you weren't pregnant."  "I don't know."

It was impossible to distinguish, just from the blood stains, whether it was a late menstruation of one month or a baby who had arrived eight months too early and was now lying dead. But one thing was clear:

 "No I'm pregnant."

Menstruation or spontaneous abortion, in any case, Giselle was not carrying that man's son inside.

It was a relief.

 "Hic"

And for that very reason, a heartbreaking pain.

How could she be relieved not to have the son of the man she loved?

She had tried to convince herself to forget itit was a child who would disappear anywaybut she couldn't. She couldn't ask him to stop, although that demon might have killed him upon learning of the pregnancy. Still, she had moved her hips desperately, as if she could protect a condemned child from the beginning.

Deep down, she wanted him to live.

As much as she repeated that it was the right thing to dodelete itshe never wanted to do it.

Perhaps she could have loved that child, even if she hadn't desired him. Not only for being his son, but for being hers. The first true family she would have, after hers was exterminated.

Since she lost her home in the war, she had lived as a parasite in other people's houses. Not even that palace was a home, and the man who raised her as a daughter was never considered family. If I had dignity, I would know that everything was borrowed, that one day I would have to let go.

He never made her feel that way, but the whole world looked at her with contempt: "You are a leech that sucks the lives of others." If even she believed it, he would suffer. And Giselle hated seeing him suffer. That's why, in front of him, she always smiled, radiant, hiding behind her back the fear that stalked her like a shadow: the fear of being alone again.

When her younger brotheruseless for survival, just a burdendied, she felt relief. It was the best for both of us. But, just as when she lost the adults who protected her, only emptiness remained.

Now I'm completely alone.

Until then, she had only sought a way to survive on her own. But at ten years old, Giselle learnedthe hard waythat surviving alone and being abandoned were not the same.

I'm still terrified of being alone.

The Giselle of today was not a ten-year-old girl. Furthermore, this was not a battlefield where her life depended on a rotten potato.

But if she were ever left completely alone, she felt like she would be that ten-year-old girl fighting a cruel world again. Because that would mean having lost him. A pure ransom, without asking for anything in return, would not happen twice in her life. She would be completely helpless.

That irrational fear followed her like a shadow close to her heels.

When she feared she was pregnanta child she never desiredthe terror of loneliness calmed a little. How would she carry a little brother if she could barely support herself? But that shadow, which for a moment had shrunk, suddenly swelled when she knew there would be no baby. And then it devoured her completely.

 "Sniff"

She began to cry, answering incoherent things like a sleepwalker. Lorenz sat next to her, silently watching her face buried between her knees, before asking:

 "Why are you crying? Does something hurt you?"

She raised her head suddenly and looked at him with fury.

 "Yes, hmph, it hurts. And you? Are you glad I suffer?"

Do I look happy? No. Of course not.

His body and mind had become impossible to control, and now he couldn't even hide what he felt. Every emotion was etched on his face without permission, and the humiliation of knowing she was so exposed burned inside her.

Didn't he know what expression to wear? Had he chosen the wrong one without realizing it?

Lorenz felt the urge to search his face for an answer, but he couldn't. She grabbed his shirt tightly, without letting go.

 "Why should I suffer? What did I do wrong?"

He shouted at her, defiant.

That voice that once sounded sweet to him, even when she pierced him with her words, now only resonated harshly in his ears. Not even rest had been of any use; tiredness enveloped him again.

 "I didn't do anything to you! So don't make me suffer!"  "Why are you complaining to me? The one who impregnated you was not me, but your dear Lord"

Slap!
Chapter 126.
The sound of the impact resonated on my skin, and a vibration expanded, followed by a stinging pain that rippled like an echo from my left cheek. In the midst of the saturation of sensations, which paradoxically left me numb, a thought emerged with clarity in my consciousness, so obvious it wasn't even worth analyzing:

You hit me? And how do you plan to handle the consequences?

Instead of hitting her back, I merely stared at her in silence, intently. The woman's pupils dilated in terror, her irises contracted and darkened, while her face paled until it became livid.

 "A-ah What have I done?"

Of course. Women are never relieved after something like that. They always regret it first.

 "Lord, I'm sorry I must have gone mad."

Lord. Lord. How disgusting. When she raised a trembling hand, as if intending to caress my precious cheek in a gesture of atonement, Lorenz reached an obvious conclusion, so predictable that it was tedious.

Slap!

But, breaking his expectations, another smacking sound burst into the air. This time, the pain did not come. Because the woman hadn't hit himshe had slapped herself.

 "What are you doing? Have you really gone mad?"

Lorenz quickly trapped her wrist before she could hit herself again. She tried to free herself, but seeing that he wouldn't let go, she finally yielded and dropped her hand. Her shoulders and head sank simultaneously.

 "Sniff"

Tears fell, one after another. Although he was no longer hitting her, she seemed to suffer more and more. Until now, the pain of others had been Lorenz's pleasure. Even Giselle Bishop, the only human he loved, was no exception: every time he made her cry, he felt a shiver of satisfaction

Why do I also feel pain now?

 "I hate being who I am"

Giselle, who had fallen into hell deceived by that demon, finally released in a sob all the resentment that had accumulated in her chest like tar, suffocating her. But her crying was interrupted when the man abruptly pulled her against his chest.

 "I hate myself too"

He whispered in her ear with a hoarse and broken voice, as if it were a secret no one else should know, before burying his face in the back of her neck. Giselle's skin began to moisten but not with her own tears, but with his.

The man was crying with her.

A strange, indescribable emotion took hold of her.

Smack!

A sudden crash exploded above his head, startling Edwin's attention, who was face-to-face with the monster. But that noise didn't come from the creature. Even she seemed surprised, stopping her hand in the air before reaching him, and looking up.

On Edwin's face, where nothing had touched, a stinging sensation spread. As he got closer to the surface of his consciousness, external stimuli began to filter in again.

I've been slapped?

 "Sniff"

This time, a heart-wrenching sob resonated from above. It was Giselle. In the end, the monster had trapped her.

Giselle, why are you crying?

What other atrocities has that cursed creature committed against you?

Regardless of whether the monster's minions were chasing him, Edwin climbed the tower in long strides.

Shhhshhh!

On the way, a sound impossible to hear in that place broke through the walls. Rain? He thought it was an illusion, but water was really hitting the window. Rain under the sea Nothing here followed the laws of physics.

And the creature's delusions were not the only problem. Soon, the sobs coming from outside doubled.

Did that wretch start crying too? How disgusting.

It seemed it wasn't smoke. The master's emotional agitation had caused confusion even in his servants. In the distance, a dolphin cried out in distress. The engines of the reconnaissance planes coughed, struggling to stay in flight.

The tower swayed violently. At least, luckily, the monster plummeted into the abyss, but in that state, not even Edwin could maintain his balance.

Why must I obey the physical laws that this world ignores?

Concentrating only on climbing, Edwin swam through the darkness, where up and down no longer made sense. Until, suddenly

Tap.

He bumped into a wall.

No it was a hatch.

Edwin had finally reached the boundary between consciousness and the subconscious.

 "Do you want me to call a doctor?"  "......."  "Do you prefer me to take you to the hospital?"

The woman did not answer, not even with a gesture. She remained lying down, absent, her gaze lost. Had she given up on the idea of escaping? Or had the escape no longer made sense? Something about her was strange. And that made Lorenz feel strange too.

 "What if I tell you something to comfort you?"

Even his own head betrayed him, suggesting words he should never pronounce if he wanted to fulfill his dream.

 "If you decided to get pregnant and have the baby I would marry you."

Only then did the woman's glassy eyes clear, fixing on him. Her pupils trembled, reflecting contradictory emotions. With Edwin Eccleston, it was easy to read his thoughts like an open book. With most humans, a little observation was enough to guess their intentions. But her with her, it was impossible to decipher what she hid behind that gaze.

 "Are you trying to comfort me?"

It was the first time she had spoken since she stopped crying. Lorenz nodded sincerely.

 "Then, die."  "I will."

For an instant, the glacial coldness of her eyes broke into confusion. Tenderly, Lorenz moved a lock of hair stuck to her cheek, damp with tears, and placed it behind her ear. Then, in a sweet voice, he promised:

 "The day you die."

Crazy. The woman murmured the word without force, looking away from him to stare into the void again. Her expression blurred once more. What the hell is she thinking about?

Lorenz lay down opposite her, studying her still profile. She closed her eyes. Was she sleeping? Or perhaps she wouldn't open them again. Like a corpse.

Thump, thump, thump!

A rapid hammering in his ears made him frown. The outside had finally calmed down, but now it was his own heart that was stirring, rebellious. He brought his fingers close to the woman's nose. Only upon feeling the faint but regular brush of her breath did the uproar in his ears subside.

Had she really fallen asleep?

Although observing the motionless woman offered no new visual stimuli, the world in front of his eyes began to wobble. With no other option, he hooked a finger on the tip of hers and closed his eyelids.

Minutes later, he felt a gaze fixed on his skin. She had opened her eyes. Curiosity burned him: What could she be thinking looking at me? But he didn't dare open his own to check. If he did, she would close them again, pretending she had never observed him.

He even held his breath, as if trying to attract a scared dog, without moving a muscle. And then, the woman acted. She moved closer. And she let herself be embraced. Between his arms.

Lorenz suppressed a laugh that boiled in his gut. Why was I wondering what she was thinking? She wasn't seeing him: she was looking at the 'Lord,' she was taking refuge in the 'Lord.' And he knew it.

Still, he hugged her. Voluntarily.

If he followed his impulses, he would have pushed her away without hesitation. But he didn't live for bursts of passion, but for the longing for tomorrow. Let this woman cling to the one she can't have, until she ends up hanging herself for real. If she, afflicted with the same sickness as him, reached death first, Lorenz would follow that path gladly.

We don't share love, but we will share death.

To fulfill his dream, she had to become even more obsessed with Edwin Eccleston. So Lorenz, an accomplice to her illusion, kept silent and wrapped her in tender caresses, pretending to be the 'Lord' she loved.

The body in his arms began to tremble. A suppressed sob vibrated in his chest. His own heart constricted, without reason. Will this tenderness lead her to ruin? Suddenly, fear assailed him: Maybe I'm only ruining myself.

He knew it. The kidnapping had already lost its purpose. So why couldn't he stop? Why was he accelerating his self-destruction with such foolish acts? If before only she was incomprehensible to him, now even his own heart felt alien.

Do you also find this tenderness cruel?

The woman, who had melted against him, suddenly pushed him away violently.

 "Give Edwin back to me."

He knew she didn't need a doctor, nor freedom, nor even him. Only Edwin Eccleston.

 "He's dead. I killed him."

The woman paled, then grabbed his shirt and shook him.

 "Don't lie. You're just keeping him away. Give him back to me!"  "Why do you look for the man who made you suffer? What is so good about that heartless man? A man incapable of crying with you, even when he holds you in your pain."
Chapter 127.
 "Are you a better man just because you cried with me? Ha! Do you think you cried out of empathy for my pain? You cried out of self-pity."

Her sharp provocation was irritating, but, ironically, he was glad to see the womanwho had been unusually disheartened earlierregaining her usual character.

 "Why do you take words so literally? Do you really not understand that I was asking why you so pathetically cling to a man who feels only obligation, not love, toward you?"

"Pathetically." That word didn't enter through her ears, but through her throat, choking any response.

 "I had sex with you of my own free will, I even let you penetrate me sober and yet you say you don't see me as a woman. It seems the Duke feels no attraction to you."

Her pale face instantly flushed crimson. Trembling like a furious puppy, she seemed about to lunge and bite him. Though, of course, she would never dare to bite her master.

 "Then will you love me instead?"

As always, she only showed her teeth with words, feigning calmness as she let out a mocking laugh.

 "I don't need the love of a leech like you."  "Why are you repeating what the Duke should say to me?"

You hate being called a leech, yet you enjoy hurting others with the same word. His expression confirmed he had hit the mark: it was the insult that hurt her the most.

 "The Duke doesn't need the love of a leech like you, either."  "Did he tell you that?"  "Of course not. I'm saying it for him."

He confessed the lie because he knew that if she believed it, she would sink again. As he expected, she reacted fiercely:

 "I am not a leech! You are the cursed parasite! You live using another's body and name, without gratitude, full of self-pity, masturbating in your misery. That is what a leech is!"

Well said. And cruel.

 "You also live with another's name, Natalia Rudnik."

She hadn't expected him to mention her real namethe one she hated so much it made her shudder. Her expression was that of someone who had just been slapped.

 "Why don't we just admit that we are both leeches clinging to someone to suck their blood? What makes you so superior? Ah, but you are grateful to your host and pay for his favors? Is that why you break your back trying to be useful, even if it means groveling?"

"Asking 'What profession would help the Duke?', offering your body to other men and spying for him. 'Duke, Duke, my whole life is for you.' Your efforts as an unsolicited slave are sickening."

 "And did the Duke ever want your gratitude? Do you know why he tells you to live however you want?"  "Why?"  "What could someone like you possibly give him?"  "......."  "What value does a beggar who only has her body to offer hold, compared to a man who possesses everything? Even if you tore yourself apart for him, the Duke would prefer a competent servant over you."

She didn't reply. She knew it was true.

 "The Duke doesn't need you. He would live just as well without a leech like you. He has enough loyal dogs by his sidehe could form a battalionto protect him for the rest of his life."

The woman continued to clench her teeth, furious, but the flush on her face had turned to pallor.

 "Yes, my sniveling and self-pity are disgusting. But you should have a little bit of that same pity for yourself. Worry about having no one on your side when the Duke discards you. At least you should be on your own side, Natalia."

She narrowed her eyes, which until then had not stopped boring into him.

 "What? Does 'Natalia' bother you? Do you prefer me to call you Giselle? You were only given an elegant namelike a purebred dogto hide what you are: a street mongrel. Are you proud of a name that is only a disguise? Do you think changing it was an act of respect? If the Duke truly loved you, he would have loved even your miserable origin."  "No He never"  "Ah, with your unsolicited servitude again."

Pathetic. She stayed quiet when she was attacked, but as soon as Edwin was criticized, she opened her mouth. It was unbearable.

 "Wake up, Natalia. No matter how much you wag your tail, do you think a Duke with the noblest blood in the world would even look at a Roselle? If he won't even approach you when you open your legs, don't you understand?"  "Y-You are the culprit! It's all because of you, you cursed psychopath!"

Suddenly, she lunged at him, grabbing him by the neck in a frenzy, shaking him like one possessed.

 "I never coveted the Duke! He never would have known about my feelings if it weren't for you! Bastard! Die! Disappear, demon!"  "I will kill you without fail! Give the Duke back to me and disappear, you damned thief!"

While the woman continued shouting empty threats that didn't faze him, Lorenz began to hum mockingly, inventing a song for Natalia:

 "Poor Natalia, the one who survived by devouring her own dogs, one, two, three How sad. Do you know why the men who burned for you like dogs in heat cooled down when they saw you? How disgusting to kiss a mouth that has bitten canine flesh!"  "Aaaah!"

The woman let go of his neck with a shriek. When she raised her hands, Lorenz expected another blind blow, another act she would regret later. But instead, she grabbed her own hair and pulled hard, as if trying to rip it out.

 "Stop."

He trapped her wrists to prevent it, but then she tried to smash her head against the wall of the headboard. His heart sank instantly; lucidity hit him like a bucket of cold water. Embracing her head, Lorenz admitted to himself that he had crossed the line.

 "Let go of me!"

Frustrated that she couldn't hit even herself, she struggled to get free from his arms.

 "Don't touch this filthy body that survived by eating dogs!"  "I'm sorry. I was wrong. Don't do this, okay?"

Perhaps it was because Lorenz, for the first time, groveled like a beaten dog to apologize, that she stopped thrashing. She calmed down, although her body was soaked in cold sweat, panting. When he released her, she immediately got up, as if she couldn't stand being in the same bed, and began to pace the room, snorting. He assumed she was just trying to calm her anger.

 "I'm going to kill you."

She whispered the same phrase over and over, but he ignored it, thinking they were just empty words.

Another mistake.

The woman suddenly stopped, took the lamp next to the window, and raised it with a brusque movement while turning her gaze toward Lorenz. Her face, pale as a corpse, was distorted into a terrifying expression. Tears streamed down her face as she smiled, radiant, in an image that could only be described as chilling. Even her voice, cheerful yet loaded with sinister words, made the skin crawl.

 "I'm going to die now. And you too."

Crash!

The woman smashed the base of the lamp against the windowpane behind her. A dry crunch resonated, followed by a web of cracks that spread from the point of impact, as if the fractures in her mind were bursting outward.

Clink! Clank!

The glass yielded. A rain of sharp shards plummeted onto her, embedding themselves in her head, her shoulders, splattering the floor in a dangerous whirlwind. And there, in the midst of the chaos, she kept laughing.

 "If I fall from here, I will really die."  "What luck for you."

As Lorenz lunged to stop her, she finished breaking the remaining fragments of the frame and clambered onto the clean edge of the window, as if it were a swing thirty-five stories above the ground. One slip, death would be instantaneous.

 "Stop!"  "Don't come any closer."

With only a step of distance, he reached out his hand, but she lifted her feet off the floor in warning, balancing precariously in a crouch while the hurricane-force wind tangled her golden hair and tore at her clothes. It seemed the gust could snatch her away at any moment.

Lorenz burned to drag her back into his arms, but his feet were nailed to the floor.

Chapter 128.

 "If you take one step back, I will jump."

It wasn't an immediate suicide threat, but a trick to frighten and dominate him. Lorenz was ready to fall for her game, but something in the woman's voice made him believe that this went beyond mere blackmail.

 "I admit I was foolish. That power to drive someone to suicide with words it was real."  "I didn't mean to kill you. It was a mistake."

The woman burst into laughter upon hearing the word mistake.

 "Why aren't you laughing? You were right. You should be happy. Wasn't my death your dream? Well, now it will be fulfilled. Laugh."

Not yet. Not like this.

 "I don't want to kill you. It was a mistake, truly. I'm sorry. Please"

For the first time in his life, he pleaded. In the Duke's memories, people always softened when begged, but she was different.

 "Please, don't kill yourself."

The woman's pale eyes gleamed like those of a predator discovering its prey's weakness. It was the look of someone who knew exactly how her death would become Lorenz's worst nightmare.

And the instant her pupils, firm as steel, revealed that irrevocable decision, the woman's bodyher back to the sunsetleaned backward.

Her golden hair fanned out like a flash of sunlight. She fell between the forest of skyscrapers like an astro that would never rise again.

No.

Lorenz lunged towards her. He managed to grab her just as half of her torso was already hanging outside the window. He tried to drag her back, holding her by the legs, but he met desperate resistance.

 "Let go of me! You told me to die! Why are you trying to save me if that's what I want?"

Didn't she understand the abyss that awaited them? The woman kicked, writhed, and struggled like one possessed, intent on breaking free from his arms and throwing herself into the void. It wasn't death that blinded her, but vengeance.

'If I die, it will be my final revenge. If I beg you not to, you will insist. And if I order you to jump will you obey me?'

In another circumstance, he would have played his cards without fear of losing. But this time he had to win, even though he knew that, as long as he held the cards, he was condemned to defeat.

I can't.

That somber revelation struck him along with the fierce wind that seemed intent on dragging the woman into the void. And then, Lorenz loosened his grip.

 "Giselle?"

The woman, struggling with fury, stopped her thrashing upon noticing the change. Between the skyscrapers, she looked up at the red-tinged sunset, now inverted in her fall.

Then she saw deep blue eyes. As if the darkness of an icy abyss opened to make way for the warm dawn.

 "It's him."

Giselle reached out her hand to him, but the man had already let go. The instant his grip faltered, her body lost balance and tilted again towards the void. Her savior disappeared before her eyes; the world turned upside down.

I don't want to die.

The old desire to live, the one that had led her to betray even the dog that trusted her, resurfaced with fury. She struggled in the air, desperately searching for something to cling to, but only found emptiness.

Too late. I'm going to die like this.

Just as, facing inevitable death, she burst into tears of helplessness, thick, warm fingers intertwined with hers in the cold air. Before she could even react, a powerful force dragged her upward. Giselle did not fall into the abyss: she was thrown directly against the man's chest.

Thump, thump, thump, thump.

His heart was beating so fiercely it seemed about to crack that armor of flesh. Between gasps, his voice trembled:

 "Giselle, why did you do this?"  "Lord"  "Huh? I'm asking you why."

She didn't answer. She only repeated 'Lord, Lord,' as if the relief of uttering those words intoxicated her. She hugged him with the strength of someone who, after gambling her life in an absurd battle, recovers what she should never have lost.

Edwin hesitated before returning the embrace. He had just noticed the fragments of glass embedded in his bloody palm. I mustn't hurt her. He closed his fist, concealing the sharp edges. The glass sank further into his flesh, but he didn't open his hand. The pain was deserved; insufficient, even.

 "Lord, you regret it, don't you?"

Giselle's question, whispered against his chest, pierced him more deeply than any glass.

 "You are so regretful that you would do anything for me, aren't you?"

How to redeem himself? He didn't know. Only she had the answer. Edwin nodded, ready to fulfill her every whim.

 "Then, live."  "Because if you die who will save me the next time I try to kill myself?"  "Right?"  "If the glass fragments had embedded just a little lower"

Had Giselle guessed Edwin's thoughts?

 "Yes, you have won."

When Giselle held the cards, Edwin could only lose. That was the rule between them. And the demon, aware of this game, had dragged her into this deadly match.

 "I will live. For you."

He yielded like a loser, handing over control of his body, but perhaps the true winner of that game had been the demon all along.

The cage was not opened by Edwin.

It opened on its own, before he could touch it. As if its occupant had voluntarily relinquished his body, calling for him.

To prevent Giselle from killing herself.

The same murderer who had ended so many humans without pity wanted to save only Giselle. The emotion hidden behind that decision seemed so obvious it could almost be seen, even without digging into the crevices of his 'tower'. And yet, it was impossible to believe.

Edwin expected that, once the goal of saving her was achieved, the demon would immediately expel him to regain his body. Instead, he unlocked a memory and revealed the new password to the door. As if he was asking Edwin to take her far away from there.

Afterward, he disappeared. Not even a month later had he shown signs of life.

Was he defeated?

If that arrogant bastard had managed to prevent Edwin's death, he should be triumphant. But he wasn't. Ironically, all three involved in this battle acted like losers.

 "Lord, it's me. What are you doing?"

Giselle called several times a day just to confirm that Edwin was still alive. Although he had promised her he would live for her, the girl didn't believe him. Now, in her mistaken mind, she no longer had a way to hold him back: she wasn't pregnant. As if she herself wasn't reason enough for him to keep breathing. But, after all, he had been the one who tried to abandon that life first. That Giselle distrusted him was, undoubtedly, Edwin's exclusive fault.

 "When will you fulfill your promise to have dinner with me?"

They had agreed to share a meal after escaping, but Edwin was injured and Giselle, physically and emotionally weakened, they postponed the meeting. They promised to meet once recovered and stabilized.

Judging by the cheerful tone on the other end of the phone and Dawson's reports, Giselle seemed ready. The problem, as always, was Edwin: a man with a time bomb in his head, ready to explode at any moment.

After the recent events, Edwin had gained abilities he thought were exclusive to that man but he hadn't defeated him. During the last month, he traveled to the Idez Islands to undergo hypnotherapy with Dr. Galloway, without significant breakthroughs. How to protect or lose his body remained an unsolvable mystery.

 "Are you sure it's a good idea? If he sees you, he might reappear."  "There will be more people with us! I can distinguish him you from that ahem, from that. And if he appears, we'll call Lois and Rita. Besides"

She hesitated for an instant, then continued with a certainty that surprised even Edwin:

 "I don't think he wants to hurt me now."

Although it was difficult for him to admit it, his instinct whispered the same thing.

 "Are you okay today?"  "Yes. Perfect."  "If he were to appear don't confront him. Flee immediately."

He hung up, but his uneasiness persisted. This time, he addressed his reflection in the mirror, with a plea between his teeth:

 "Leave her alone."

If you truly care about her

Appealing to that monster's most repulsive feeling made his blood boil.

This morning I attended classes, then had lunch, and spent the afternoon in the library working on my assignments.

 "Rita, it's time to go."

I woke up Rita, who had fallen asleep in a corner of the library as the sun began to set, and we left together.

Since escaping from the clutches of that demon, Rita became her bodyguard and personal escort, protecting her 24 hours a day. There was only one person Giselle needed to be protected from now.


Chapter 129.
Naturally, Rita ended up living at the Magnolia Terrace and even started accompanying her to her club activities.

 "And who is she?"

Barely had they crossed the threshold of the Patriotic Student Society club when a third-year cock coming down the stairs pointed at Giselle with his chin.

 "Miss Bishop's bodyguard."

The student rolled his eyes upon hearing Rita's answer. Few students at the academy needed an escort. Even those with chauffeurs or personal butlers rarely brought them into the classrooms. Giselle knew they murmured things like 'Does she think she's a princess just for being a Roselle?' but there was no other option.

 "Bodyguard? Is that really necessary? Miss Bishop, our club does not admit just anyone."

He pretended to worry about safety, but his tone when saying 'just anyone' and the dismissive glance toward Rita betrayed his displeasure.

 "Miss Bishop could faint at any moment. I must watch over her."

For more than ten days, Giselle had used her 'illness' as an excuse to justify her disappearance. Although many believed it, some still frowned.

 "My, how delicate It would be a problem if she stains our pamphlets with nosebleeds. Wouldn't it be better to rest at home?"  "Don't worry. Duke Eccleston would compensate for any damage."

The student visibly paled, abandoned his attitude, and retreated. Rita let out a satisfied chuckle.

That was her little pleasure: seeing how those brats who scorned 'the Roselle who thinks she's a princess' bowed down at the mention of the Duke. Whenever she could, she played that card.

That day, although no one openly provoked Giselle during the club meeting, the students who flattered her, believing she was an 'Eccleston noble,' surrounded her. Rita, as always, took advantage:

 "Miss, we must leave. His Excellency the Duke is waiting for you."

But when they were alone, Rita never mentioned the 'Duke.' Before, she used to speak of him with admiration, but after that day, she stopped. Perhaps out of fear of making Giselle uncomfortable.

However, Giselle didn't care. Maybe the adversities had hardened her. Or perhaps, after Edwin had seen her at her worst, shame no longer affected her. Or she had simply learned to value that they were both still alive.

It's him!

In the end, all that mattered was that, upon seeing him after such a long time, she only felt joy.

The car stopped in front of the residence. As she stepped out, the main door opened. She expected to see the butler, but it was he who came out to greet her.

 "Welcome."

Have his wounds already healed? What a relief. Only after confirming he wore no bandages on his hands did Giselle look up to study his face.

And then, her steps toward him stopped dead.

Her eyes, full of disbelief, swept over Rita, Loise, and the rest of the staff around them. Everyone was smiling courteously, as if nothing was abnormal.

 "Why does no one else notice?"

Giselle was the only one who realized.

 "It's not the Duke!"

Only then did the others react, protecting her and placing themselves between her and the demon.

 "Step back, everyone!"

But the creature smiled, enjoying the chaos. He ignored Loise's order, as if he hadn't heard it, until finally, annoyed by the interference, he launched an insult with the coldness of a dagger:

 "Useless wage thieves."  "Who are you calling a thief?"

While Loise sweated, unable to reply, it was Giselle, hidden behind Dawson, who shouted. Her voice was low, but loud enough for everyone at the entrance to hear:

 "Go to hell, you damned impostor."

The servants didn't dare to treat him rudely. Not only out of fear, but because, after all, he wore their master's face.

But Giselle not only scorned him, she insulted him with words that had never left her lips.

Loise was horrified, but the ruthless killer, far from getting angry, seemed delighted.

 "How pretty you are. I missed you."  "I came to see Edwin. If you don't want me to leave, give him back."

Edwin had warned her to run if the demon appeared, but Giselle wouldn't waste this moment.

 "No need to threaten me. I just came to give you a gift."

A gift?

The man turned his head and signaled to someone inside the mansion. Seeing no response, he went in himself and returned dragging something tied to a leather leash.

Giselle froze as she recognized it.

 "A dog?"

And not just any dog: a skinny, unkempt mongrel, like the ones she had once devoured.

Her heart pounded fiercely, first with anguish, then with pure rage.

Is this a provocation? Do you want me to kill it again?

Her heart pounded, but her pride won out. While she feigned indifference, the man continued talking about the dog:

 "At the shelter, they said he's about seven years old. He has no diseases, he's healthy"

The dog, panting and looking at Giselle, lowered his head and scratched an ear with his hind paw.

 "Well, he has a skin problem, but he's clean. The vet gave us an ointment. Tell a maid to apply it every day. The Duke will cover the expenses."  "......."  "I gave him a name: Eddie."

He gave his childhood nickname to a dog?

For the first time, Giselle's impassive expression broke. The demon noticed and, smiling with satisfaction, extended the leash toward her.

 "This time, raise him until the end."

This is how you want me to redeem myself? You, of all people, dare to ask me that?

She burned with desire to confront him, but neither the time nor the place was right.

 "Understood. Now leave."  "You have to raise him."  "I said yes!"

Only when Rita took the leash instead did the struggle end.

 "It was a pleasure seeing you, sweetheart. Enjoy dinner and next time, we'll have dinner together."  "Yes, yes."

It was obvious Giselle was replying out of obligation, but apparently, that was enough for the cunning demon.

 "Dawson, take the dog."

And just like that, as if nothing happened, the Duke (Edwin) regained his body and left.

 "That the demon listened to Miss Bishop"

For Loise, it was a shock but also a hopeful sign.

Edwin had tried to cancel the dinner, but Giselle's stubbornness prevailed, and they eventually shared the meal as planned.

Under the watchful eyes of Dawson and Loise, sitting at opposite ends of the dining room, the conversation flowed from trivialities to more personal topics. Edwin, whose life no longer had room for the 'everyday,' could only talk about her.

 "Anything interesting at school today?"  "No, the usual. Classes, homework, and helping with the club's event preparations."

Upon mentioning that the Patriotic Student Society was busy organizing an event for Veteran's Day at the National Memorial, Giselle remembered a favor the club president had asked her last week.

 "The club will auction off personal items from celebrities to raise funds for military hospitals"

It was only possible because all the club members had influential connections.

 "Could you donate something, Lord? It doesn't have to be valuable even something small you've personally used. People would bid like crazy for it."  "Something small? Would a handkerchief that has touched my lips suffice?"  "No!"

It was the first time in a long time that Edwin had joked with that playful malice. Giselle loved that glimpse of his old self, even though the joke itself deeply displeased her.

Imagining women waving their bids for a piece of cloth that grazed his lips Just thinking about it gave her a shiver of disgust.
Chapter 130.
In her imagination, Giselle couldn't bear the thought of the mark of Edwin's lips ending up in the hands of another woman, so, betting all her fortune, from national bonds to the house on Magnolia Terrace, she bought that worthless rag back for just a few coins.

How pathetic. It was only a fantasy, and yet she felt miserable. But fantasies, in the end, are the most honest reflection of oneself.

Edwin, thinking Giselle's anger was just a fit of pique, winked at her with an amused smile, but then began to take her seriously.

 "So what would be suitable?"  "Well something one would recommend but never read again or a tie that's no longer worn because it went out of style"  "Shall we look for something after dinner?"  "Of course."

Of course. That way, she would at least have the perfect excuse: being able to personally choose something that wouldn't hurt if it ended up in another woman's hands, and, furthermore, avoiding having to leave immediately after the meal.

 "Do you enjoy being in the Patriotic Student Society?"  "Yes, I do."

But Edwin's instinct told him Giselle was lying.

 "And is there no one bothering you?"

He knew perfectly well Giselle would answer no, but he asked anyway.

 "Yes, there is."

And he received an answer he didn't expect.

 "Many."  "Who?"  "Professor Davis from Introduction to Economics, Professor Milton from Medieval History of Mercia, the one from Basic Calculus"

He was ready to not forgive whoever it was, but Giselle began to enumerate, one after another, the professors from her classes. Edwin's rigid face relaxed, revealing a smile. That Giselle had returned to her daily routine was already a relief, but that she also had the lightness to joke as if nothing had happened, filled him with gratitude.

 "How dare they overburden my little one with assignments? This cannot stand. Royce, call the dean right now."

Edwin also pretended that nothing was wrong, but he couldn't fool himself: he knew Giselle was not as well as she appeared.

How is one supposed to forget what they lived through while imprisoned? One only survives, enduring it.

Like the guilt she carried for the dogs she had to kill in order to stay alive.

 "If I hadn't eaten them myself, someone else would have stolen them or I would have starved to death. That would have been sadder, don't you think?"

When asked how she had obtained food in those days, the 'Natalia' of then confessed, unintentionally, that she even ate the dogs she had raised. She immediately became nervous and tried to justify it to Edwin. But he wasn't disappointed; instead, he marveled at the tenacity and courage of a child barely ten years old.

 "Of course. You did well. Natalia is brave."

Since that day, they never spoke of the subject again, and Edwin had completely forgotten about it. He thought Giselle had too but he was wrong.

So that's why she turned so pale when she saw that dog on the street last time.

When she said she wasn't afraid of dogs, she was probably sincere. What she was afraid of wasn't the dogs, but the memories.

No dogs were raised at Templeton Mansion, so Giselle practically had no chance of running into one. When she was little, Edwin asked her if she wanted a puppy. She said no, and he, naively, thought it simply wasn't to her liking. How insensitive he had been.

'Giselle, I truly believe that surviving the way you did was brave and intelligent. What you did is not a sin. On the contrary, it is proof that you are destined for great things. Don't be ashamed, be proud.'

That was, and still was, Edwin's sincere conviction. But for a child who suffered so much she contemplated death, even the best words were nothing more than fuel for a memory turned nightmare. That's why, since then, he had kept his opinions to himself and yet

'That bastard, how dare he.'

As soon as Edwin made plans to see Giselle, that fellow ignored his warning and stole his body.

 "Giselle says she wants to have a dog. I was just thinking we could use a guard dog."

Speaking as if he were Edwin, he ordered Royce to bring a dog. No less than a mongrel from a shelter. As if he wanted to dig into Giselle's wounds

'That's not true.'

The madman inside his head immediately denied it, with a tone of false indignation. But how could he believe him, when his actions said otherwise?

After calling Giselle the Duke's pet and a leech, treating her as less than human, what else could that dog seem like but a mockery?

'I only behaved as you taught me.'

And as if nothing, he blamed Edwin, saying he had only imitated him by not treating her as a person.

'You want to be treated like a human being? Then start by behaving like one. Who acts like that with a woman they like?'

This time, he received no response. The other remained silent, without arguments.

'You say you are following my example? Don't make me laugh.'

If he really acted like Edwin, then how would he explain daring to pry at Giselle's wounds, the ones he never touched?

'Is this perhaps your way of apologizing? And what good is regret if you do everything wrong?'

If he was capable of imitating Edwin with such precision, why did he behave so differently with women? It was enough to remember how Edwin treated women to know what to do and what to avoid. Even if he didn't have many references, just by following the courtesy and common sense that defined Edwin, he could have been a perfect gentleman for Giselle.

But someone who knew how to follow Edwin's respect and judgment would never have violated Giselle as an act of revenge.

'To do something like that and then say you like her You lack not only conscience, but also intelligence. You? You dare to set your sights on Giselle?'

She, the most precious creature in this world, was too much for anyone. Even the most upright and brilliant men couldn't measure up to her. And yet, that nameless lout, little more than a thug, dared to court her saying he liked her. If he could have, he would have chased him away like the regular client of a brothel, just as he did with Giselle's past dates.

While holding a light conversation with Giselle, his thoughts, sharp as blades, came to an abrupt halt. Something in front of his eyes had suddenly changed. They were still in the dining room, sitting opposite each other, but Royce and Dawson, who were previously waiting discreetly by the wall, had now approached the table. Everyone, except Giselle, showed tension on their faces.

 "Has he reappeared?"  "He says it hurt him that you spoke ill of him."

Had that madman gone and told Giselle exactly what Edwin was thinking?

 "What did that bastard say?"  "Only that."

By the reaction of Giselle and the others, it seemed to be true. At least he knew that if he went around detailing everything he had been told, she would end up looking bad herself. Cunning and repugnant at the same time.

 "I told him that if he didn't leave, I would leave. And then he left. Don't worry."

It was the second time that fellow had appeared. Giselle, fearing that her uncle might suggest ending the evening early, acted as if nothing had happened, continued eating, and naturally changed the subject.

 "Your photography exhibition is also on Veteran's Day at the National Memorial, right? How are the preparations going?"  "I suppose well."

The answer sounded so distant he seemed to be talking about someone else. Giselle blinked, puzzled, but he offered her a calm smile, as if nothing was wrong.

 "My work finished as soon as I took and selected the photos. I only amused myself; the rest of the effort is done by others."  "I'm looking forward to seeing it. I'll go to the opening without fail."  "Then you can tell me how people react."  "You're not going to go?"  "Don't you think it would be better for everyone including me?"

He laughed lightly as he returned the question, but Giselle's heart sank. And not just because of her uncle's situation. Also because she was beginning to understand that, no matter how much she tried to avoid it, the conversation about him, that demon, was unavoidable. And he wasn't the only subject they couldn't escape.

 "I'll take care of finding a good home for the dog. Don't worry."  "Why? He seemed very calm. I can take care of him."

Edwin could no longer play along with Giselle. It didn't matter if she was feigning for him or for the other man: in his eyes, that stubbornness was nothing but a form of self-harm. He found it difficult to hide the mixture of emotions that overwhelmed him upon seeing her face maintaining that carefree expression with so much effort.

 "Giselle"  "I can change his name."  "You don't need to raise him. It's not your responsibility."

Words he had always wanted to say: that what happened to her dogs wasn't her fault either. He knew her well enough to know she would have understood the hidden message, but Giselle, even so, kept insisting.

 "I really can do it. I'll take charge."  "Stubborn as ever. Alright I suppose a dog is better than a baby."

He murmured it softly, almost so only she could hear it. And for the first time, the constant smile she wore like a perfect mask subtly cracked on her face. It was the sign that they were approaching another one of those subjects they couldn't avoid.
Chapter 131.
 "Loise, Dawson, wait outside for a moment. Leave the door ajar, and if you hear any commotion, come in immediately and take Giselle out."

The two men only obeyed after Giselle confirmed that the person giving the order was indeed the Duke. They left the dining room and stood guard in front of the half-open door.

 "Giselle."

Edwin reached out his hand across the table. Giselle did not take it immediately; first, she scrutinized his face. She thought it was the other manthe lewd one, the impostor.

Only when she was convinced it was truly Edwin did she place her hand on his. Before Edwin enveloped it with his own, Giselle’s fingers traced his palm, carefully feeling the old scar where glass fragments had once embedded.

She had been watching that hand throughout the dinner. And Edwin, knowing this, had made sure to use it constantly, to show that no lasting mark remained, that he was fine, and that there was no need to keep feeling guilty.

 "Because of that madness of mine you ended up hurt."

But the truth was the reverse.

Giselle, it was I who, by acting recklessly, put you in danger.

Holding her hand, Edwin gently ran his thumb over the delicate knuckles that protruded on the back of her small hand.

If only I could also caress the wounds on your soul like this

She had carried so much damage from such a young age, and he, who only wanted to protect her, had done nothing but add new scars to that already marked heart.

 "I have something to tell you. I suppose you can already imagine it. If at any point you feel uncomfortable, tell me without fear."

He saved these words to say to her in person, fearing they would be a new wound, but also knowing that silence would only prolong the pain.

 "I received the results of your medical check-up."

Giselle understood he was referring to the gynecologist. She knew instantly, because she noticed how her hand, previously warm and relaxed, tensed in his. Edwin held her more tenderly, caressing her gently as he broached the subject with all possible care.

 "They found no abnormalities. I am very relieved."

There were no worrying symptoms, and, moreover, her menstrual cycle had resumed normally. The doctor had given him the diagnosis Edwin was afraid not to hear.

 "Judging by the symptoms, it was most likely not a miscarriage, but simply a delayed period."  "And knowing you weren't pregnant that brings even more relief."

Giselle nodded, implying she shared that feeling. But the slight smile she drew seemed more like a reflex than a sincere expression. Even if her body was intact, was it as if she had lost a child in her soul?

Edwin noticed her hand beginning to loosen, and he held it more firmly, not letting go.

 "Don't misunderstand me. I'm not saying this because I want to evade my responsibility. I say this because, for someone like you, who is just beginning to be an adult, a pregnancy would not be a blessing but a misfortune. It is better that it didn't happen."  "I know."  "And you know you are the most valuable thing I have in the world, right?"

She nodded immediately, without hesitation.

 "A child that will come later. When you are fully an adult. When your body and heart are ready"

Then, let's have one.

Why did she expect those words to complete the sentence?

 "I hope you can have a child someday with a man who is sound in both body and spirit, and whom you marry for love."

But what Edwin had just told her was nothing more than a veiled rejection.

Just as that demon had said: after everything that had happened, Edwin felt nothing for her.

How ashamed she felt now for daring to hope for something as crazy as a proposal. She wanted to disappear out of shame.

And yet, Edwin did not let go of her hand.

Thus continued his cruel tenderness.

 "Giselle, I am not rejecting your feelings."

His words demonstrated that he understood her emotions completely.

Hearing from his own mouth that he knew about her unrequited love, she felt she would die of sheer humiliation.

 "I never thought I would end up saying something like this to you, but it's not that you're unattractive as a woman. On the contrary you are so beautiful and adorable that it hurts. You will be too much for any man. For me, too." What could that man possibly have more than you? Why not me?

 "Do you think these are just empty words?"

He had read that in her too. Giselle believed it was just the typical rejection excuse.

 "Giselle, I am not a good man."

The sentence shook her. Until then, she had only half-listened, immersed in her own pain. But that confession brought her fully back to herself.

 "You don't want the killer of someone to be your husband, nor the father of your children."  "Did he really kill Professor Fletcher?"

Upon hearing Fletcher's name, Edwin's face immediately darkened. Giselle understood without the need for an answer.

 "And it wasn't the first time."

That meant the confession that he had murdered his caretaker just to have total control over his body was also true.

 "He almost killed you too."  "But it was someone else who did it. You are not to blame."  "I was the reason. He did it because of me. If you look at it that way, he made you his target because of me. I cannot say I have no responsibility, even though you and I hadn't even met yet."

Would he have gone after you, if I hadn't been in the way?

Giselle could not lie. No, he wouldn't have.

 "Since we are talking about this everything you suffered, it is my duty to bear it. And although it is a situation that defies all logic, if we consider it from common sense, marrying would be the most logical thing."

The proposal she herself had dreamed of until a few moments ago, now that he mentioned it, made her chest ache.

 "It's not that I never considered marrying you."

So the one who said that, if she were pregnant, he would claim her and marry her was telling the truth.

Edwin had thought about it too.

 "But if I join myself to you as a partnerI, who share a body with the one who hurt youif I marry you in the name of redemption, that would not be healing you but continuing to hurt you. It would only be a continuation of the damage."

No matter how differently she thought, she couldn't contradict his words.

He was right. What he was saying wasn't wrong.

 "What kind of person would allow the person they love to live with a criminal?"

Love?

 "Giselle, I have only loved one person in my life and that person is you. Of course, it is not a love between a man and a woman."

She already knew. She expected no less.

 "But even so, you will always be, forever, the only person I love."

Forever? Love only me? Is something like that even possible?

He, after all, should get married someday and continue the line of succession.

Marriages without love were common but even so, many fathers ended up loving the children they had unplanned.

Edwin seemed to have read that doubt in her eyes too.

 "Do you think it makes sense to distance myself from you to protect you and then, quite calmly, go and be with another woman? That would be total hypocrisy, wouldn't it?"  "Then, do you?"  "I don't plan to have another relationship. Or get married."  "And the succession?"  "Let someone from a secondary branch take it."

He said it so naturally that it was disconcerting, but his words were anything but light.

Duke Eccleston giving up his lineage, his bloodline, and choosing to live alone for the rest of his life?

Even to Giselle, an outsider, that sounded like handing the dukedom over to others.

The reputation of the Ecclestons, built over centuries on the continent, was at stake.

Old guards like Duchess Roxworth would not stand idly by watching everything collapse.

And among the collateral branches, there would surely be those who raised their voices to impose their son as heir, unleashing chaos.

The mere rumor would shake the entire nobility.

And yet, Edwin, who more than anyone should foresee all this, had made his decision with full awareness.

 "Don't worry about the house."

Giselle had never worried about the lineage of his house.

Always, always it was him she worried about.

 "But why do you have to live alone all your life because of that person?"  "I won't be alone. In reality, I feel freer this way."

Either way, my intention was always to live single. I am just returning to the starting point.

How selfish I am.

Giselle knew he was thinking of himself and yet, she couldn't help but feel a petty relief knowing there would be no other woman in his life.

But what good was it that Edwin closed his heart to everyone if that also left her out?

'Even if I grow up and become a much more attractive woman, I won't have any chance of winning his heart'

The door was also closing for Giselle.

And if that was the end, the most dignified thing was to accept it gracefully and take a step back.

That was her last chance to save some of her pride

'With elegance with calm.'

She took a deep breath, silently.

And as she exhaled, with a gentle smile, she said:

 "I know it couldn't have been easy to bring this up, so thank you for doing it."

I also thought it was a conversation we had to have at some point.

For Edwin, it was undoubtedly an uncomfortable topic.

But now what made him more uncomfortable than the content of the conversation was Giselle's excessively courteous tone.

Why are you suddenly acting like this with me, so distant?

He felt there was a wall.

She had raised a barrier in her heart, and now she was protecting herself from him.
Chapter 132.
 "You're hurt."

Edwin took a step back.

 "Giselle, my opinion isn't the only valid one. It will only be the right answer for both of us if it's the right answer for you, too. Tell me sincerely: what do you wish for?"

Then would you love me?

For Giselle, that was the only possible answer.

What she truly longed for wasn't marriage. It was the source of all her humiliation and pain, but also her only balm: Edwin Eccleston's love.

Love me as a woman.

Every time he told her, "Ask me anything, and I will do it," Giselle repressed the impulse to blurt out that shameless request. Not out of decorum, but because she knew the truth:

You can't give what you don't have.

Love doesn't sprout from effort. Hadn't she been the one who, one day without warning, started seeing Edwin as a man and fell in love? Edwin needed that same instant of revelation, but miracles can't be manufactured at will.

Giselle didn't want to beg for the impossible or degrade herself further.

 "If you think marriage is the solution, then I"  "Wait"  "You speak first."  "I understand you feel responsible for what I went through, but thinking you must pay for it with a marriage"

I hate it.

If he had proposed marriage out of love, as man and woman, she would have been happy. Even if he had told her, "I love you, but my perverse nature prevents me from committing," the pain would have been more bearable.

But she hated that marriage was only an act of obligation. That her love for him was reduced to a debt to be paid felt cruel.

 "Did I offend you?"  "No."

But she couldn't tell him: "Now your sin is making me feel this," to a man who was only seeking to atone for his guilt.

 "Don't you think that's a bit outdated?"

The answer, unexpected, left Edwin speechless.

 "We no longer live in a time where spending the night together forces you to marry."

Am I that behind the times? And besides, it hadn't been "just one night." Edwin bitterly swallowed the thought that sprung up: What if we hurt the child?

 "Then, what should I do?"

Giselle bit her lip, pensive, before answering, but it wasn't what Edwin expected.

 "I know you will only feel peace if you assume your 'responsibility' in some way."

Giselle, there is no peace possible for me.

She was misinterpreting his need for atonement as a simple desire for relief.

 "Giselle, it's for your own good. I just want your heart to be at peace."  "But I am fine. I'm not so wounded that I need to be 'healed'."  "If you keep lying like that, there's no point in us struggling so much to talk."  "It's not a lie."  "Giselle."  "Don't you think I'm much better now than when I discovered you had another personality? Or am I the only one who notices?"

It was true: lately, Giselle didn't seem as fragile as before, and that disconcerted Edwin.

 "It was hard at first, I admit. Discovering I liked you in the worst possible way it was agonizing."

Even now, confessing it, she felt the same shame as then, as if she were naked before him, more exposed than if she truly were. When Edwin, with an expression more pained than hers, reached out his hand, Giselle shook her head.

 "I don't care now. After seeing you at your worstand your bestmoments, I guess the crush wore off."

Giselle's uncomfortable laugh was met with a bitter smile from him.

 "I'll sort out my feelings eventually. Don't worry."  "Don't force things. Time will resolve it. During your adolescence, I was the only man near you, but now there are more. In college, you'll meet guys your age. That will change your perspective."

With those words that Giselle refused to accept, Edwin frowned, uncomfortable.

 "It sounds as if my love was real and yours was just a mistake."

Finally, Giselle understood why his speech had left her so empty.

 "It's not that. It's just advice from someone with experience."

Experience?

 "Because it happened to me too."

For the first time, Edwin confessed to her that, as a teenager, he had briefly fallen in love with his tutor.

 "In puberty, it's normal to idealize an adult and then mistake it for love. It's part of growing up."

Like a childhood fever everyone must pass through.

But while most overcome it without lingering effects, Edwin's father turned his into a permanent scar, and that demon transformed Giselle's into a chronic illness.

 "After seeing you at your worstand your bestmoments, I guess the crush wore off."

Edwin wished it were true. That, like him with his tutor, Giselle had seen his most grotesque side and been disappointed. Not out of selfishness: he didn't want the girl to end up like him, skeptical and pessimistic. If her heart was healthy, she should be disappointed. It was sad for him, but, as her protector, the priority was that she remained intact.

 "So falling in love with me wasn't your fault."  "Yes"  "It was mine, for being so irresistible."  "What?"

It was an unusual comment for him: Edwin didn't usually yield, but neither did he err on the side of arrogance. Giselle's eyes rounded in astonishment. The man, who until then had looked at her with that haughty gaze resting his chin on his hand, suddenly let out an awkward laugh, as if he could no longer bear the tension. His cheeks instantly flushed red.

 "How was that? Am I more hateful now? Are you falling out of love a little?"  "Yes, definitely."

No, not at all.

He was right: it was his fault. If even when he was pretending to be unpleasant he made her heart pound, what could she do?

 "Giselle, choose what makes you feel most at peace. I repeat: I will do anything, as long as you are well."

Except love you. Right?

The next day, Sir Loise visited Giselle on the Magnolia Terrace. His reason was completely unexpected.

 "Her Majesty the Queen has decided to grant the Duke a decoration and knight him on the occasion of Veterans' Day."  "Really? It's not surprising for someone like him, but that's wonderful news. I would love to be there to see it."

However, Giselle, who was neither a royal nor an Eccleston, would not have the privilege of witnessing that glorious moment.

 "Neither you, nor anyone, will be able to see it."  "Why?"  "The Duke has decided to send his aide in his stead."  "What?"

There was no need to ask the reason: it was because of his malevolent personality.

 "But after the armistice, when he returned, wasn't he received by Her Majesty?"  "Back then, the Duke had not yet experienced how much of an uncontrollable lunatic that demon was."  "Ah"  "And there's no guarantee that the luck of that time will be repeated."  "You're right. Still, it's a shame."  "I agree."

Sir Loise let out a sigh before continuing.

 "But the problem is that this isn't just a simple 'what a shame'. However justified his reasons, isn't it a grave disrespect to Her Majesty? And he can't tell her the truth either."

Loise had expressed his concerns to the Duke, but the answer had been firm:

 "It would be far more insulting if I became a lunatic in front of Her Majesty. Tell her I have a contagious disease. Then they themselves will cancel the audience."

But of course, they couldn't use the excuse of a "contagious disease" every time the Duke had to appear in public.

 "The Duke cannot keep shutting himself away like this."  "It's true."  "That's why I thought if we could at least distinguish between him and that other one, perhaps the Duke could regain some of his daily life with more peace of mind. Yesterday, seeing you, the idea occurred to me. So"

Sir Loise adjusted his glasses with one hand and stared intently at Giselle. It was a habitual gesture of his when he had something important to say.

 "Could you teach me how to distinguish between the Duke and that other one?"  "How?"

Upon hearing the request, Giselle remembered something from her childhood. Her dog had had two male puppies, and one had been given to a neighbor. Although the other villagers always confused them, even blaming the wrong dog for killing their chickens, Giselle's family and their neighbors were never wrong.

Today, when asked how she differentiated the Duke from the demon, Giselle could only give the same answer as when asked how she distinguished those two dogs.

 "It's just I simply know."
Chapter 133.
 "Doesn't he look different?"

Loise, with an expression as perplexed as Giselle's, repeated the question.

 "What do you mean by 'different'?"  "The feeling he gives off."

Loise blinked behind his round glasses, as if he hadn't caught the slightest clue.

 "For starters, even his gaze is distinct."

Wasn't it obvious to those who knew him well? That's why, yesterday, Giselle hadn't understood that Loise didn't notice. But now it was he who didn't understand her. Not even Rita, who had worked under Edwin's orders during the war.

 "Let's go together to see the Duke to confirm."  "Lord, I've arrived."

As she peeked her head through the ajar door of the office, the man sitting on the desk, reviewing documents, turned an inquisitive gaze toward Giselle.

 "Is something wrong?"

His expression oscillated between joy at the unexpected visit and concern. Without prior notice, it was natural to assume something urgent was happening.

 "It's nothing important."  "Oh, really? Come in."

He put down the papers and stood up. Giselle pushed Loise and Rita inside, whispering under her breath:

 "Come on, who do you think it is now?"  "......."  "......."

Was it because of the distance? Both Loise, with his glasses, and Rita, without them, squinted in silence, without answering.

 "Then, come closer."

The two subordinates lined up in front of him, but only stared intently, saying nothing. Their employer tilted his head slightly.

 "What are you doing?"  "Nothing important, Lord."

Loise, even up close, vehemently denied it, as if he still didn't understand. Rita imitated him and, coming closer, whispered only for them:

 "He looks like the Commander to me."  "Is it because I called him 'Lord' and you assumed incorrectly?"

Rita wrinkled her nose, as if caught in the act, and confessed:

 "I have no idea."  "I told you on the way."

Although both had blue eyes, Edwin's gaze was warm and soft. The sinister character's was cold and sharp.

 "Yes, I remember but I still don't understand it. Blue eyes are just that: blue eyes."  "No. They are colder than usual, darker"

Giselle, unable to tolerate the situation unfolding before her any longer, fixed her gaze on the approaching man and described the tone of his pupils, which became sharper with every step:

 "In short, doesn't he seem sinister to you?"

In other words: the man advancing toward them was the malicious personality. The perpetrator had taken Edwin's body just before inviting her in, pushing the real one into the abyss of his own mind.

The other two, completely unaware of this fact, tensed and stepped between Giselle and the man. Although she had warned them it wasn't the Duke, their confusion was evident: they still couldn't distinguish them.

 "Giselle, why don't you come in?"  "Because I don't obey you."

Giselle's dry response coincided with a smile that spread across the man's face: an unsettling grimace, between fury and ecstasy. Rita and Loise seemed to understand then, but it would do little good: when this one pretended to be Edwin, he never revealed his characteristic expressions.

 "Darling, how is our puppy?"

The man looked at Giselle over the heads of the two subordinates, as if they were a low wall, asking about the dog he had tasked her with the day before.

 "Although, tell me where is our Eddie? How is it that you train other people's dogs and neglect your own?"

'As if humans weren't already beasts,' he seemed to think. He had instantly grasped Giselle's purpose: to teach them how to differentiate between the two.

 "I see the recruits are incompetent."

He mocked the two with disdain, but in his attitude toward Giselle, reverence and caution were mixed.

 "How on earth do you distinguish me?"  "That's none of your business."

Key weapons are never revealed to the enemy.

There was another difference, actually. Unlike Edwin's serene gaze, this lunatic was excessive. His eyes wandered aimlessly, like those of someone insecure.

She had explained it to the others beforehand: that detail also served to identify him. But, for some reason, today his eyes barely moved. Another useless method.

 "Call Edwin for a moment."  "Do you see me as a dog? Do you think I will come and go at your command?"

His refusal was not born out of displeasure at being commanded, but out of fear: he was afraid that the others would also learn to differentiate them. That Giselle recognized him pleased him, but if the others managed it, it would be a problem.

 "Then there's nothing to be done. I have no reason to stay. I'll leave."

Unlike Edwin, his unstable gaze clung to Giselle, as if wanting to hold her back. But, at the same time, he stubbornly clung to Edwin's body, and only when Giselle took a step back did he decide to surrender.

 "It would suffice to gouge out the eyes of those who distinguish us."  "My eyes?"  "But you are not 'that kind of person,' sweetheart."

With these words, the reminder of Edwin's rule that he shouldn't leave even if he ordered her to, the light in his eyes began to change gradually.

 "Did you see it this time?"  "I was looking at him the whole time, but I still don't understand."

Rita was no different:

 "Ah, Lorenz! Didn't we agree to have dinner together?"  "Today?"  "No."

Giselle used a trick to call the other personality again and asked them once more if they noticed the difference, but both shook their heads again.

Since everyone was only staring intently at the eyes, the other man realized he was being distinguished by his gaze. He stood in front of the mirror and began to intensely study his own eyes. It wouldn't be obvious to others, but at that moment the perpetrator was rapidly alternating between taking and releasing the body, trying to imitate Edwin's gaze. But since Giselle always managed to recognize him without fail, there was no progress.

Lord. Demon. Lord. Lunatic. Lord. Idiot.

After observing the constant back and forth between Edwin and the other personality, dizziness began to overwhelm them. It was Loise, even before Giselle, who put his hand to his forehead and heavily collapsed into a chair. He took off his glasses, tightly closed his reddened eyes, and muttered in frustration:

 "This is the only method we have"

He seemed desperate upon realizing that his abilities were insufficient.

 "Although I have served the Duke the longest, I cannot recognize him What a shame"

While listening to Loise's complaints, Giselle suddenly remembered the words that the demon, furious in front of the mirror, had said to belittle her, treating her as a useless leech:

 "Even if you gave everything for him, to the Duke, you are not worth as much as an experienced subordinate."

Was it really like that?

 "What could you do, insignificant as you are?"

But there was something. Something only she could do.

 "It's not that there isn't another way."

Loise opened his eyes wide; the other two also turned their attention toward her. Under their expectant gazes, Giselle continued:

 "I could follow him everywhere."  "That's a good idea."  "Not you. Edwin."

Edwin's answer was obvious

 "No. Absolutely not."  "But"  "Giselle, I regret having to say this to you, but are you in your right mind?"

In Edwin's eyes, not only Giselle, but also the other two, seemed to have lost their minds.

How could the very people who were supposed to protect the girl from the demon inhabiting him now suggest she voluntarily approach that creature? It was utter madness.

 "If Miss Bishop is willing, wouldn't it be good to at least consider it?"  "He's right. I'm fine."

Loise and Dawson, ignorant of what Giselle had suffered during her confinement, believed her words. But Edwin, who knew every second of her torment, was not fooled.

 "Miss Bishop doesn't fear him, and he, curiously, seems to listen to her. We saw him go and come like an obedient dog today."  "Dawson is right."

Loise added, crossing a dangerous line.

 "Although he ignores the Duke's orders and mine, he easily succumbs to Miss Bishop's pleas. Frankly, it's admirable."

Dawson, taking it further, tried to convince him with the words that most repelled Edwin, achieving the exact opposite effect:

 "Yesterday, she even had the courage to kick out that thief as if nothing. Miss Bishop would have even made an excellent soldier."  "Your Grace, it's been six months of rejecting invitations and communiqués. You cannot keep hiding. It is for the good of the Ducal House and your own."

Unlike Dawson, Loise was astute enough to know how to appeal to Edwin's sense of duty. But if the safety of Giselle was on one side of the scale, nothing on the other sideno matter how much it accumulatedcould tip it.
Chapter 134.
 "Dawson and I, we promise not to take our eyes off you for a second. We won't leave you alone under any circumstances. It won't be different from now."  "That's true. And nothing happened yesterday either. Lord, you know I can't avoid him forever, right?"  "Giselle, you"

Don't you feel uncomfortable? After what that man did to you with this very face? To get over it, to sort out your feelings as you decided, it would be better not to see each other.

What the hell do you want from me?

The words Edwin swallowed in silence so as not to hurt Giselle kept piling up until he finally fell silent.

What on earth was she thinking? Perhaps, in her youth, she wasn't thinking at all. Her words sounded absurdly naive.

 "And don't you think Lorenz has also lowered his guard?"  That bastard, at this very moment, is only scheming how to stab you in the back after hearing that.

'It's not true.' 'Shut up, lunatic.' 'He's worse than I am. Didn't you see what he picked up on the battlefield? Even I'm afraid of him now.' 'Afraid? You gave away a dog!' 'You'll see. I'm right. While the "Duke" builds walls for his "dignity," I tear them down, even if they call me a scoundrel. Which of the two truly loves her?'

Murmurs. His head was chaos. After more than a year silent or speaking in incomprehensible tongues, now that man wouldn't stop giving his opinion about Giselle. He couldn't cover his non-existent mouth, and enduring his nonsense was an ordeal.

 "I'm not scared anymore."

And to top it all off, the absurd words echoing outside his head worsened the torment.

 "I am stronger than you think. You know that, right?"

At that moment, Edwin could not remain silent.

 "Everyone out. Except Giselle."

When the two guards went out and stood guard in front of the door, Edwin finally spoke the words he had suppressed.

 "Are you so strong that you tried to kill yourself over a comment from that man?"

At that instant, Giselle's expression was as if she had been slapped. Edwin couldn't help but feel the pain of his own sword stabbing her.

If he avoided touching Giselle's wounds, it wasn't out of dignity, but to care for her. But raising someone sometimes meant being the villain.

 "That"

Giselle moved her lips as if to reply, but finally pressed them together without saying anything. With her typical pride, she tried to hold his gaze, but her eyelids reddened, as if tears would burst forth at one more cold word from Edwin.

Where is your strength now?

Giselle seemed fragile, too fragile. Edwin approached her, wrapped her restless hands in his, and looked intently at her.

 "Giselle, I'm afraid afraid that man will hurt you again. I'm worried. Aren't you?"  "But it was just an outburst of mine. He didn't try to kill me, you know? Just as he said, it was a mistake, and he tried to stop me."  "That he is capable of killing by 'mistake' makes him even more dangerous. Don't you think?"

In his mind, the other's voice insisted: 'I never wanted to kill her!' but Edwin ignored it. Meanwhile, Giselle dodged his words with another question:

 "He didn't even hit me"  "Does simply not touching you already make you feel safe?"

Does she seriously not fear a rapist just because he didn't hit her? Far from reassuring him, the girl's lack of fear caused him a worry that clouded his vision.

 "If that man, while receiving a decoration in the palace, calls you to his bed instead of staying still what would you tell him?"

Giselle's cheeks instantly burned, as if she had never expected Edwin to touch upon such a delicate subject.

 "Well, of course I'd tell him no!"  "And if he insists?"  "I will convince him with words. I know how to talk to him."  "Why you?"  "Because he listens to me."

Edwin didn't believe for a second that that selfish animal could have been 'domesticated,' but he let the comment slide.

 "Why do you carry that responsibility? Are you his mother? His owner? Did you plant him in my head? No. Giselle, why do you assume that role?"  "It's not that I just want to help you, Lord."  "For you to live your life, I already have enough"

Edwin was about to repeat his usual phrase but stopped.

 "Do you know why he also tells you that 'for you to live as you wish is enough'?"  "Why?"  "What the hell could you do for someone like him?"

He recalled the lie that the son-of-a-bitch had shamelessly blurted out.

 "What he said is affecting you, isn't it? That's why you're acting like this."  "It's not true."

Although it lasted an instant, Edwin didn't overlook the flash of unease that clouded Giselle's serene gaze.

 "Did you really believe him? I didn't think you would disappoint me so much."  "It's not that I don't trust you! It's just that man makes me angry."

Her expression was identical to when she lost that chess game against him. She seemed serious.

 "Couldn't you give me the chance to prove him wrong? If not for you, allow me to do it at least for myself."

Edwin then understood that taking the dog hadn't been just about pride. She had succumbed to her own desire: to raise him until the end, to prove to that bastard that she no longer cared.

 "Giselle, sometimes losing is winning."

He had to teach that overly competitive girl that there are times when it's wiser to yield than to insist on winning. Today was the perfect opportunity.

So, after opposing it until the end, Edwin was about to send Giselle back when

 "Your Grace, I have a request to make of you."

Suddenly, Loise knelt before him. In more than twenty years of service, he had never done so.

 "I don't know what it is, but stand up and speak."

Loise had no reason to kneel. But his principal secretary, with unusual determination, ignored the order.

 "If I die serving you, I beg you to take care of my wife and daughters."

It wasn't a plea, but a declaration: he was willing to die for him, even in the face of that demon.

 "Your Grace, I am human, and I am afraid. And if you permit the insolence I am exhausted."

Loise had been the closest to Edwin since his return, the one who had endured the other man the longest. And in recent months, from Professor Fletcher's death to Edwin's suicide attempt and Giselle's kidnapping, he had shouldered every blow.

The stress had consumed him. When Edwin returned with Giselle to the mansion, Loise seemed to have aged years in days. Alone, he had to take on impossible tasks, like looking for a needle in a haystack after the other man's whims.

 "I know it is unworthy to ask this, especially after what happened to Miss Bishop due to my incompetence."  "Loise, that's not true."

If anyone should feel shame, it was Edwin, for demanding the impossible of him. Anyone else would have already resigned. But he couldn't tell him to leave: Loise wasn't asking for permission to retire, but for strength to continue.

 "I beg you to give me a chance. Just one."

"I am willing to die for you. Yield, even if it's just this once." That's what Loise was saying.

 "I will protect Miss Bishop as if she were my daughter. And I swear I will learn to distinguish you from him."

While Loise remained kneeling and Edwin, unable to coldly reject him, remained silent, Giselle intervened:

 "I also can't follow you everywhere because of school. I'll only be close when it's important. And Loise will need my help to learn to recognize him."

Sometimes losing is winning.

Perhaps that advice was more for Edwin than for her.

 "Duke Edwin Eccleston, of the Army Special Forces"

The royal secretary announced the first decorated hero while the hero, in full dress uniform, watched the guests from the platform.
Chapter 135.
Since the Swanho incident until the Third Constanza War, he had defended the kingdom against all threats, loyally serving Her Majesty the Queen and the homeland

He made no boast, maintaining a solemn silence, but the countless decorations embroidered on his uniform and his imposing physique exuded a majesty that overwhelmed those who looked at him, forcing them to listen to the feats he would never verbalize.

Edwin Eccleston was the man who shone brightest in the royal palaceeven in front of the monarch who held ultimate authorityeclipsing all other ostentation with his presence.

'That man is mine and no one else's.'

Giselle, seated among the guests, watched him as if mesmerized. When their eyes met, she couldn't help but shudder.

'There's no way Edwin realizes what I'm thinking'

It was fortunate that her current mission was to smile. Even if she gazed rapturously at his most virile side, he would assume she was only playing her part.

 "Let's start with a trial day with Giselle's help."

That day was today: the decoration ceremony at the palace. If his other personality emerged while he was close to Edwin, she was to inform Mr. Royce; if he was far away, as he was now, she would harden her expression and give a signal. That's why her smile was harmlessa tacit message for Royce, who was watching from the entrance.

The eye contact lasted an instant. Edwin, following protocol, looked away towards the hall wall as soon as he confirmed that Dawson was next to Giselle.

In the grand hall, guarded by soldiers and escorts, with photographers and journalists mixed in, any scandal provoked by his "cursed personality" would be disastrous. Both for Edwin and for the demon within him.

 'If they lock the Duke in an asylum, I'll be condemned to seeing lunatics for the rest of my life. None would be as pretty as you.'

That entity feared confinement, as in prison camps. Giselle had discovered that weakness by unlocking its dialogues under hypnosis.

The monster wouldn't dare to ruin his image today; after all, tomorrow he didn't want to appear in scandalous headlines before being dragged into a cell or a sanatorium.

'Ha Pathetic.'

But, as if mocking his thoughts, the voice in his head whispered. In reality, it wasn't laughing at Edwin, but at the secretary's speech: a fictional account of exaggerated merits and strategic omissions. Edwin's true story was classifiedeven his affiliation with the 'Army Special Forces Team' was a sham.

 'Shut up.'

 'Speak with respect. Or else'

 'You will never see Giselle again.'

The voice ceased instantly. Edwin felt not satisfaction, but disgust. How could he not hate that Giselle was the only bait to control that beast?

Before the ceremony, the demon had negotiated: 'I won't take your body today in exchange for the night.'

 'And the little beauty too.'

Of course. That disgusting pig would always find a way to impose his conditions.

It didn't matter if it was just before the ceremony: when Edwin stated his intention not to attend, the other man began to impose conditions. "I won't do anything foolish, I'll just have dinner. You can surround me with dozens of guards," he offered.

 'If that child asks me to disappear, I will do it immediately.'

But Edwin didn't yield. And then, he snatched control of the body, seducing Giselle to bring her to his side. The result was another scandal moments before arriving at the palace. Another defeat for Edwin.

 'If you touch her, you will never see her again.'

While mentally repeating that threat"If you appear today, even for an instant, the dinner with Giselle will be canceled and you will never see her again"the secretary finished reading his fictitious speech.

With precise movements, Edwin turned toward the Queen. The monarch, fragile but unconquered, descended from the platform.

 "Major Eccleston."  "Your Majesty."

Edwin knelt on one knee. Two crossed swords touched his shoulders. The King returned them to an attendant, took the medal from a velvet cushion, and an unexpected figure intervened.

It wasn't an aide, but Crown Princess Helena.

Why would she do such mundane work?

She was known for her arroganceshe despised even her own father for not being of royal blood. That she would stoop to servant's tasks was absurd. Edwin disguised his suspicion under a brief bow, but the princess looked at him with mocking eyes before he turned his gaze to the Queen.

The sovereign of Mercia was so small that, even one step up, Edwin could distinguish her graying crown. He lowered his neck to facilitate her hanging the medal.

 "Major, I value your services highly" she began, squeezing his hand tightly (as she did with everyone, despite her apparent fragility)  "But the last year lacked merit."

She alluded to his capture as a prisoner. She knew that the achievements of his subordinates under his system were also his own, but

 "This award anticipates future services. So now you owe me a debt. Do not forget it."

It was pressure for him to remain in the army.

A debt?

Even the demon in his mind laughed. Edwin also found it ridiculous.

The Queen spoke of "honor" in granting him the medal and the title of Knight, but for himalready overloaded with decorationsit only meant a few more letters in his name.

And there was no reason to yield. Absolute monarchy had been extinct for centuries. Kings were merely decorative symbols, although the House Crowley still used its wealth to manipulate nobles.

But against the Ecclestons they could do nothing.

 "Duke"

Even the astute Queen, with her agile mind and ability to quickly assess situations, must already understand the reality.

 "This old woman needs a general she can trust and lean on. And, of course, the citizens of Mercia do too."

With a skillful display of humility, she broke down the pride of the arrogant monarch to show herself as a fragile, lonely woman, appealing to Edwin's compassion and loyalty. Undoubtedly, it was more effective than direct pressure. That's why Edwin usually described her as "a cunning old fox."

 "I will need time to consider it carefully."

Now he understood why the enemy inside his head didn't use him to infiltrate the army or steal secrets: out of fear of ending up locked up. So, although he no longer had reasons to retire, it was still too early to decide.

 "Take all the time you need. I just hope that, at the end of your reflections, the answer is one that pleases me."

When the Queen released his hand, Edwin descended from the platform and took his place among the decorated.

 "Sergeant Thomas Ritzka."

The presentation of the next honoree began. Edwin's turn had ended ostensibly. In reality, he still had one last duty.

 "The Third Battalion of the Military Intelligence Agency, under the Ministry of Defense."

The final recognition was not for a person, but for a unit.

 "Colloquially known as the Talon Squad"

It was one of the three intelligence battalions. The First Battalion, in charge of internal counter-espionage and personnel protection, was nicknamed the "Sentinels." The Second Battalion, specializing in infiltration and intelligence gathering abroad, was called the "Ghosts."

And then there was the Third Battalion, more hidden than the ghosts, named the "Falcon's Talons" (Talon) for its way of swooping down on its targets with lethal speed. Its specialty: assassination.

"Knowledge only gains strength when put into action," read its official motto. But among its members, another, more direct one circulated:

"A life taken saves my family."

 "Representing the Talon Squad"

It was tradition for the unit's commander to receive the decoration on behalf of all.
Chapter 136.
The public's anticipation, which had been rising in hopes of seeing the Talon Battalion commander, cooled as if hit by a sudden frost the moment the Director of the Military Intelligence Agency stepped onto the platform instead.

The members of the three battalionsSentinel, Ghost, and Talonare kept in absolute secrecy. The same applies to the identity of their commanders. Even in this glorious place where their merits and sacrifices are being recognized.

 "Talon Battalion has responded preventively to hostile forces to protect the people and the homeland"

Preventive response. In other words, assassination. There is no one in the world who doesn't know what the Talon Battalion does, but the state does not officially acknowledge it.

Even without a direct mention, the 'person' in his head will know they are giving him an award for killing Lorenz von Eisenhardt, so won't he act impulsively out of rage?

That's why he has been staring intently at Giselle, who is sitting in the middle of the audience, instead of at the stage, but the fellow has done nothing but rant insolently against the king.

'The old woman is much more aged than last time. At that age, worrying about her husband's infidelities, it's no wonder she's also rotting on the inside.'

Has he already accepted that I'm not the Steel Griffin, or is he simply very preoccupied with Giselle?

'Date.' 'Shut up.'

The medal ceremony ended without incident. However, today's event is still less than halfway done.

Next, a military parade will take place. Centered around the laureates, the royal guard and the honor guard will march outside the palace, and under the watchful eye of the people, they will pay tribute and loyalty to Her Majesty the Queen, who will be on the high palace balcony.

 "Your Excellency may use this room."

The royal secretary, guiding the laureates to the waiting room where they could change, gave a separate room only to Edwin and his entourage. It seemed to be a mark of respect toward the ducal family.

As soon as they entered the private room, the ducal staff found their own tasks without any instruction and helped with the preparations. They deftly took the new medals and the symbols accompanying the knighthood from the chest, pinning them onto Edwin's uniform, who stood in front of the full-length mirror in the center of the room, without a moment's hesitation. It was obvious how countless times they had done this.

There was a brief exchange of words about the order in which the two crosses should be placed, but after Mr. Royce consulted a thick regulation book, there was no further conversation. Their professionalism was astonishing.

And Edwin was incredibly handsome, to the point of inspiring reverence. The blue ribbon of the order of knighthood, crossing his torso from his broad shoulder to the opposite waist, radiated refined elegance and dignity, while further enhancing his fat-free, triangular torso, adding a touch of wild masculinity.

On the left side of the uniform, where there wasn't enough space, the densely overlapping medals shone in gold and silver; on the right side hung a thick braided gold cord. If the decoration is too flashy, the person can be eclipsed by it and appear vulgar. However, Edwin's quiet presence calmly and skillfully dominated that ostentation.

Giselle felt immensely grateful for Edwin's carefree yet self-assured appearance, as if he had returned to the man he was before getting lost in his fight against the demon in his head.

As he finished dressing and put the bicorn on his head, their eyes met in the mirror. In that instant, his eyes, containing a warm blue light, curved gently. Thump-thump. Giselle's heart betrayed its owner's determination.

Living together, one rarely gets the opportunity to see someone fully dressed in formal wear with all their adornments. The attendants would have seen it from time to time, but for Giselle, it was the first time. The man now was the most similar to Edwin and, at the same time, the most unfamiliar.

It was such an enchanting sight that even a stranger would feel excited. So it was not Giselle's fault that her heart was beating without shame.

When the preparations finished and the attendants withdrew, he took the hilt of the ceremonial sword he wore at his waist with his white-gloved hand. The movement of unsheathing the long sword to verify it was fluid and natural.

 "What do you think about coming to the royal palace?"

Even just before the moment of appearing before thousands, tens of thousands of people, his calm demeanor when addressing Giselle without showing any sign of nervousness was admirable.

 "It's fascinating. It's similar and different from the ducal mansion."

She had seen the exterior of the royal palace, but it was her first time inside. As she had come to work as an assistant, she tried not to look like a child who had insisted on following Edwin. However, in front of Edwin, she couldn't help but revert to being an excited girl.

 "Thank you for bringing me."

Tac

Edwin sheathed the sword and narrowed his eyes slightly.

 "I should be the one thanking you. You haven't come for a visit. I feel sorry for you, who have come all this way and can only see familiar faces without being able to see the royal palace or the royal family."  "No, I came to see you."

She wanted to imprint in her eyes the moment her hero shone brilliantly. Of course, the Queen, whom she had only seen in blurry black and white photographs in the newspapers, was fascinating in person.

 "Your Excellency, it's time."

The secretary knocked on the door from outside. Therefore, they left the building, crossed the garden, and headed towards the palace's East Square. Along the way, the honor guard and the royal guard formed in several rows caught her attention. It wasn't the first time she had seen a military parade, but she had only watched it from the street, and it was the first time she had seen the preparation process, so this too was fascinating.

 "Tsk"

Rita, walking next to Giselle, scanned the soldiers in impeccable uniforms, rigid as statues, then clicked her tongue and muttered to herself.

 "Suddenly, I want to re-enlist."  "Do it."

Edwin, walking ahead, must have heard her, because he glanced at Rita over his shoulder.

 "Your position will still be open. Hawkins will love it. I'll have them call you tomorrow."  "Ah, no, Major!"

It was the first time she had seen Rita, always so carefree, so nervous.

 "Does an old man who always says his time has come really want to die?"

Rita slowed her pace, increasing the distance from Edwin, then, muttering so only Giselle could hear her, she kicked the edge of the flower bed with the tip of her shoe. A piece of mud stuck to her sole fell onto the dirt path.

It had been raining non-stop in the Richmond region since yesterday. Most of the other outdoor events were canceled, but the military parade would proceed as planned, so she was worried about Edwin, who would have to ride a horse in the rain, but luck was on their side and the rain ceased for a moment.

The march is normally done on foot, but today's laureates, the heroes, would be on horseback. The group stopped upon reaching a place where soldiers held several horses.

Edwin was given a white horse as elegantly adorned as the soldiers. After receiving the reins, he first took time to break the ice with the horse. When the curious horse brought its muzzle closer, Edwin stroked the bridge of its nose.

 "Good boy."

While Giselle watched the way Edwin treated the horse, as if spellbound, she instinctively shivered in that instant and unconsciously searched for his eyes.

It's Edwin, right?

She felt relieved, but the tension did not easily disappear. Seeing the hand that skillfully and affectionately stroked the horse's smooth neck and mane dried her throat. In the end, a chill even ran down her spine, and Giselle had no choice but to lower her head, forgetting her duty.

 "Giselle, are you feeling unwell?"  "Huh? No."

Giselle instantly erased her tearful expression and abruptly lifted her face. She smiled shyly like a child caught causing mischief out of boredom; the corner of Edwin's lips followed hers upwards before returning to a straight line the moment a whistle sounded in the distance.

Edwin nimbly climbed onto the horse without needing a stirrup or help from the attendants. His claim that he learned to ride a horse as soon as he learned to walk was no exaggeration. Although it was his first time riding in years, his movements were precise and unhurried. They say even animals recognize important people, and the white horse docilely carried him on its back without even a startle.

The man, with a riding crop in one hand and the reins in the other, looked at the gate beginning to open in the distance and then turned his gaze back to Giselle. Even under the shadow of the bicorn's brim, his warm eyes enveloped her. She looked into his eyes one last time and nodded.

 "May you fare well, Major."

Carried away by the atmosphere, she called him by his military rank instead of "Lord." In that instant, the officer on horseback stopped smiling and offered Giselle a solemn salute.

He immediately turned the horse's head and began to move away from Giselle. Thump-thump-thump-thump. Giselle harbored the vain hope that what was resonating in her chest now was the vibration of the horse's hooves hitting the ground.

Edwin's figure grew small before disappearing through the East Gate. Cheers were already audible from outside the castle walls.

 "Shall we go too, Miss Bishop?"
Chapter 137.
 Giselle left the royal palace with Rita through an entrance next to the East Gate. They walked almost running through the crowd that filled the sidewalk, in the opposite direction to Edwin.

The square in front of the balcony where the royalty would appear for the parade would be more than crowded. Giselle, who only cared about seeing Edwin, headed to the last section of the route, where there would still be some space to stand.

However, even the street where the parade would pass later was lined with citizens on both sides, and of course it was impossible to occupy the front row.

 "How about over there?"

While Giselle looked around without finding a gap where she could see Edwin, Rita pointed to a ledge on the outer wall of a building along the street. There, higher than Giselle, naughty children were already sitting in a row like little birds on a branch, and only a secluded space remained where barely two adults could fit.

If she climbed up there in a skirt, Edwin would scold her for behaving like an elderly lady.

But it's better than not seeing him.

 "It's fine."

With Rita's help, she clambered up the wall and sat on the outer ledge. Rita, who climbed up afterward, took something out of her bag and smiled shrewdly. They were binoculars. Giselle, admiring her exhaustive preparation, brought the binoculars to her eyes just as the child next to her asked his friend:

 "When are the fighter jets coming?"  "They're not coming today. Didn't you know?"

It had only drizzled and stopped here, but it was still raining heavily at the air base on the outskirts. That's why the air squadron's celebration flight was canceled this morning.

 "Tch I came to see that."

Besides that child, many citizens would have eagerly awaited the moment when the fighter jets majestically flew overhead. Among the disappointed people, Giselle was the only one who felt relieved. If it hadn't been canceled, Giselle wouldn't have been able to watch this parade and would have had to hide in some secluded palace restroom.

When a fighter jet passes overhead, she still screams and shrinks unconsciously. This is something she hasn't been able to correct no matter how hard she tries.

When she was going to Fullerton, once the sound of a fighter jet pierced the window during class. That day contributed to the stares and pointing Giselle received there.

Please, let it rain tomorrow too.

Tomorrow, at the Veterans' Day event to be held at the National Memorial, a celebration flight is also originally scheduled. She planned to sneak away in time, but if it is canceled due to rain like today, she can help with the event calmly.

 "They're coming!"

As soon as the children's shouts ceased, the military band's music began to be heard. The murmuring crowd quieted, and everyone turned their heads towards the end of the street at the same time.

In a short time, the head of the procession was close enough to be seen with the naked eye. Cheers were heard from the other side of the street, and camera flashes shone like sparks among the people. The flashes fired sequentially along the street, following a point in the center of the row. It was like a wave.

The wave of light approaches Giselle. It means Edwin is approaching. Soon, the image of a young officer on horseback was imprinted in Giselle's eyes through the binoculars. Although it was the same figure she had seen a moment ago, it felt different.

He looks like a victorious general.

The soldier, who rode the horse with an upright and firm posture, without wavering, was dazzling as a bronze statue.

Click, click, click

Even among the crowd gathered at Giselle's feet, camera clicks began to be heard, and flashes lit up. When Edwin arrived in front of the building, Giselle returned the binoculars to Rita and took the camera she had prepared. She wanted to capture this momentous moment not only in her memory but also in a photograph.

However, the instant he appeared in the viewfinder, Giselle could not press the shutter.

The image of the man reflected in the glass was a work of art. And that made her feel lonely. She felt like an anonymous spectator observing a unique masterpiece hung in a museum behind a "Do Not Touch" sign.

Is it because Edwin isn't looking at me?

When she looked at him through the camera lens, he was always facing Giselle. But today's Lord isn't looking at her. A new understanding gripped her finger above the shutter.

She felt foolish for worrying that he might see her behaving unladylike. The hero on the road walks looking only forward. It made no sense for him to look at the anonymous crowd standing at the edge of the path.

Giselle and Edwin belonged to different worlds, separated by an invisible wall like the viewfinder's glass. One layer because of the enormous difference in status, and another layer because of the difference in the temperature of their feelings.

The glass, no matter how many layers it has, can be broken. Today's Giselle had a bold thought that the past version, before being dragged away by the demon, would never have dared to imagine.

Edwin, even now, would gladly accept if Giselle insisted that he marry her. She could tear down the multiple layers of walls between them even resorting to an obstinacy that would shatter her last bit of pride.

The reason she doesn't is because she hopes that man will break the wall himself and extend his hand to the other side. By himself. Only because he desires it.

But he had already made it clear. That such a thing would not happen.

Edwin Eccleston swore to love only Giselle Bishop until the day he died, but he sentenced that he would never love her as a woman. Giselle would be loved forever, but she would not be loved romantically. She did not want to photograph this moment where she once again felt that satiating lack deeply.

 "In a photograph, not only the subject is photographed, but also the heart of the one who shoots."

It was a misfortune for both to paint Edwin's brilliant moment with her somber loneliness.

In the end, she had no choice but to take her finger off the shutter.

In the afternoon, a brief reception was held at the royal palace. In the various corners of the long banquet hall, groups of three or five people, a glass of champagne in hand, blossomed into conversations and laughter.

 "Since you've come this far, you should be promoted to Colonel."  "No, we should make him ascend to Colonel before he leaves, man."

Meanwhile, Edwin was approached by his superiors with stars on their shoulders.

 "Actually, with this amount of merit, it wouldn't be unreasonable for him to receive the rank of Colonel this time"  "He's too young."  "Besides, although he was promoted to Major by his own ability, it was an early promotion due to a special promotion in wartime, so there were many whispers behind his back."  "Of course, if someone knew the merits the Major accumulated in the last war, no one could object to his promotion to Colonel"

The General vaguely mentioned merits that could not be revealed and glanced sideways at Giselle, who was standing next to Edwin.

 "Lord, did that man say you are truly an executioner?"

When Giselle asked this recently, Edwin had no choice but to lie, saying no, although he regretted it.

 "I'm sorry, Major."

Even they, who probably regretted not being able to promote him, had no other option and specifically approached to apologize. They were worried that Edwin would feel dissatisfied with this and resign from the army, so they came to calm him down. The army could not help but misinterpret the reason why he had been on leave since his return.

 "Hold on a little longer. Once you overcome the Colonel hurdle, the ascent to Colonel will be a piece of cake."  "Duke Eccleston wouldn't have any reason to cling to the rank of Colonel, would he?"

As soon as they realized that the owner of the voice that had suddenly intruded was Crown Princess Helena, the Generals tensed up and showed respect. Giselle, who was standing next to Edwin, was also surprised and quickly bent her knees to greet the Crown Princess.

The curtsey with bent knees is a basic skill for ladies of high society. Edwin, who since his childhood had seen countless times women being criticized for this posture, assigned Giselle a teacher whom no one could ignore to teach her how to salute. Thanks to that, despite the suddenness, she did not miss the opportune moment and, although she bowed deeply, her posture did not waver at all.

As he usually did when he felt he had raised her well as an excellent socialite, Edwin looked at Giselle with a satisfied smile. But, for some reason, Giselle's face, which had risen after saluting, was completely red. As if she had committed some mistake.

Only after turning his gaze toward the Crown Princess did Edwin realize the reason. The Crown Princess had an expression that she had never before seen such a vulgar and classless salute. He felt disgusted, but not surprised.

Had the Crown Princess ever stopped disparaging talented people? Edwin, who had already experienced that woman's arrogance, knew it wasn't Giselle's fault, but this girl didn't know it.

 "You were perfect."

He whispered in Giselle's ear so that others couldn't hear him.

 "It is the Crown Princess who lacks manners."

Giselle's eyes, which had been directed at the Crown Princess, opened wide and turned to Edwin.

Even if no one else could hear it, was it alright to say such things in front of the Crown Princess?

Anyone else would have clucked their tongue saying he didn't know the fear of royalty, but in the case of Edwin, there was no doubt that he was the intrepid Eccleston, which made people marvel.
Chapter 138.
 "Ah, would Duke Eccleston care about an insignificant military decoration?"

The generals, who had been about to impose a hut upon someone who owned a mansion, lowered their heads to the Crown Princess and changed their strategy.

 "But, wouldn't Her Highness feel safer if a competent commander remained in the army?"

The Crown Princess tilted her head to the side, with a sulky expression.

 "The Duke does not have to swear loyalty to our monarch of Mercia only from the army."  "Ah, of course."  "That's right."

The Crown Princess's main point was that he should swear allegiance elsewhere. Edwin understood it, but pretended not to.

 "By the way, Duke, how many years have passed? I came to greet you after so long."

The formal apology that a subject should offer to his Lord, for not having gone first to greet Her Highness, did not come from Edwin's lips. Because the Crown Princess was not seeking him now as her sovereign.

 "I am glad you returned safe and sound."  "Thank you."  "It was meant to be. It seems my prayers finally reached the ears of the gods."

At this point, Edwin concluded that he should leave that place.

Of course, he should be grateful. But it wasn't just about being fed up with those arrogant words.

The fact that the Crown Princess, haughty and insensitive, had said that she had even prayed for him, caused the alarm that had been ringing in his head for a while to intensify even further.

The Crown Princess saw him as a man.

From the moment she had taken the trouble to personally hand him the medal, an insignificant task that only corresponded to him, the situation had been suspicious, and his dire premonition had finally come true.

It was obvious that her disdain for Giselle's etiquette also aimed to control the annoyance standing next to him. The Crown Princess was not the first woman who had messed with the innocent Giselle without even realizing that this was a negative factor for Edwin. In the end, the Crown Princess was also a woman with a petty heart, with nothing worthy of respect, like the others.

And he didn't even think of her as a woman.

 "It has been a pleasure, Your Highness. Then, I will withdraw, I have other matters to attend to."

Edwin took Giselle and moved away from the group. Several curious and expectant glances turned to where he would go, but Edwin's eyes moved without hesitation toward the corner of the hall he had been observing until then.

About six guests surrounded a man, listening intently to his story. The man, dressed in a uniform decorated with the insignia of Sergeant, showed pride on his face, as if he were telling the story of how he had come to be there today. Edwin made a gesture with his eyes toward the sergeant and asked Giselle:

 "Do you know that man?"

Sergeant Thomas Ritzka was from Rozelle. And the reality for those from Rozelle was that, due to the deeply rooted custom of viewing them with prejudice for being mixed-race with the enemy country, their merits were rarely recognized, even after achieving great feats.

Even so, the fact that the sergeant had received a decoration directly from the king was due to the extraordinary feats he had performed on the battlefield, to the point that even high society, which detested any contact with those from Rozelle, had approached of their own free will to listen to him.

For Giselle, who would have to fight all her life against contempt and discrimination for being from Rozelle, a hero of her same ethnicity could be a good example to follow, instilling confidence in her. And, to be honest, it was also for Edwin himself.

'Do you really think changing your name was an act of respect toward you? If the Duke loved you as you are, he would have loved even your humble origin.'

He was not in a position to reprimand Giselle for foolishly falling for the provocation of a snake-tongued demon. He was no different.

Edwin had not changed Giselle's name with the intention of denying her origin. But to others it might seem so. He didn't care what others thought, but he didn't want Giselle to misunderstand.

'Giselle, I was never ashamed that you were from Rozelle. Do you know that?'

He wanted to prove it with actions instead of words. Of course, no matter how good his intentions were, the right thing to do was to first ask Giselle her opinion and then act.

 "The surname sounds familiar."

The fact that she responded like that without him mentioning the name meant that Giselle had also been interested in that person and had been observing him.

 "Do you want to go say hello? You don't have to if you feel uncomfortable."

Giselle hesitated, as if undecided, but finally nodded. Edwin waited for a moment, deliberately delaying, and only approached with Giselle when the crowd around the sergeant dispersed.

 "Sergeant Thomas Ritzka."  "Major Eccleston?"

The moment he heard his name, the sergeant's gaze, which had always shone with intelligence, became lost and empty. As if it were a great surprise that Edwin spoke to him, the sergeant saluted an instant later.

 "Sergeant Thomas Ritzka, it is an incredible honor to meet you, Major!"  "Congratulations. I heard a lot about your exploits during the war."  "R-really?"  "Your bravery and ingenuity were remarkable. Thanks to you and your men risking your lives to cut the enemy communication lines during the Battle of Herenberg Hill, my men were saved. I wanted to thank you in person when I met you."

The sergeant took Edwin's extended hand with both hands, and his eyes began to moisten, in a way that did not seem characteristic of such a rock-solid soldier.

 "Receiving a decoration alongside the Major is the best day of my life. Anyway, I wanted to meet and thank the benefactor who prevented the massacre of those from Rozelle and had it recorded. I doubted whether to approach this celebration and cause a nuisance, but having you speak to me first makes me feel overwhelmed and ashamed. I am also deeply moved that the Major remembers my history in such detail."  "You would not be a nuisance. And that I remember you is entirely your merit. It must have been difficult for you not to be recognized like the others due to your origin."

The sergeant's eyes reddened. He nodded, pressing his lips tightly as if trying to suppress a lump that had formed in his throat.

 "I can only thank you for acknowledging it."  "It's nothing. Ah, by the way, I have someone to introduce you to."

Edwin turned toward Giselle, who had been silently observing behind him. Out of habit, he tried to wrap his arm around her waist to bring her closer, but stopped his hand just before touching her.

 "She is"

He decided that the right thing to do was to let Giselle choose what name to introduce herself with and whether to reveal that she was from Rozelle.

 "Do you want to introduce yourself?"

Giselle looked around with a somewhat tense expression and then nodded.

 "Nice to meet you. My name is Giselle Bishop."

He thought she wouldn't want to reveal that she was from the same region, but Giselle moved her lips for a moment and then continued her introduction in a low voice.

 "My original name is Rudnik. I am also from Rozelle."  "Rudnik?"

The sergeant narrowed his eyes as if the name were familiar.

 "Do you know me?"

To Giselle, only his surname sounded familiar. She didn't recall there being a young man named Thomas Ritzka in her town.

 "You don't know me, but I think I do know your father. Isn't he Mr. Rudnik, whose wife was a great beauty, all his children were blonde, and he only had one daughter?"  "Yes, that's right."

It turned out that Sergeant Ritzka was from another town and knew Giselle's father.

 "What happened to your family?"  "I am the only one who survived."

A pain fundamentally different from those who lamented an unknown tragedy was etched on the sergeant's face.

 "I had already been recruited by then, so I avoided the massacre, but my family was not so lucky. You must have suffered a lot there at a young age, without parents."  "I was fine. The Duke saved me."

Giselle had a habit of changing the subject when receiving pity for what had happened to her in her childhood.

 "Then is the orphan from Rozelle that the Major said he had taken in the daughter of Mr. Rudnik?"  "Yes, that's right. Thanks to the Duke I am alive, and today I could see the royal palace and even met the Queen up close."

Edwin's brow, which had remained on the sidelines listening to the conversation, furrowed slightly.

 "What a way to say you came for a stroll. That child has already grown into such a wonderful adult that she helps me with my work."  "Really? Wow, this is incredible! It is very encouraging for us from Rozelle. The more people from Rozelle contribute to the country and move toward mainstream society, the less prejudice and discrimination there will be. Never give up and believe that everything you do raises the status of all of Rozelle. Be firm and proud in everything you do."  "Yes."

Stories about her roots had always made Giselle feel disheartened or defensive. It was the first time she felt so moved. Giselle nodded firmly.

 "Like you, Sergeant."

A satisfied smile spread across the sergeant's face.

 "It would also be good for you to become a soldier like me and serve the country."  "No, enlistment is absolutely forbidden. For a student, studying hard is patriotism."

He had tried to encourage her, but ended up inciting Giselle to join the army. It was impossible for Edwin to overlook that absurd suggestion.
Chapter 139.
 "Ah, excuse me. I didn't know she was a student and committed an imprudence."  "She is not just any student, but the top of her class at Kingsbridge. She will go far someday."

The sergeant's eyes widened in surprise, and he let out an exclamation of admiration; his eyes even welled up.

 "The Rudnick family, who are in heaven, must be very happy. And surely they must be deeply grateful for your great kindness, my Commander."

No. Perhaps they would want to throw into hell the demon who did something terrible to their sole surviving daughter, their only child, and drove her to the brink of death.

Edwin was not ashamed of Giselle. He was ashamed of himself for feeling proud of her.

The look from Helena, who had her back to him and was watching the Duke interacting with a simple Rozelle soldier, could not have been kind.

 "The Duke's first public appearance after his return was the graduation of that Rozelle orphan?"

Her mother, who knew her intentions well, approached to annoy her.

 "Today he even brought her to an official event to present her to people. Seeing that he is trying to introduce her into high society, it seems he did not take in and raise that orphan child just out of charity."

Even during the graduation ceremony, the Duke did not look at the stage, but kept his gaze fixed on the young blonde woman sitting below. Since then, she had a bad feeling.

And when she casually ignored that child, the Duke turned away, completely disregarding the Crown Princess. The bad feeling grew even stronger.

'It seems they have a deeper relationship than I thought.'

Her mother, a shrewd woman like an old fox, knew exactly how to stimulate Helena's anxiety.

 "Was the rumor true that he was raising a child to turn her into his mistress? How indecent. He truly is the most alpha male of the Ecclestons."

How dare she defame the Duke, without any foundation, saying he had an illicit relationship with a Rozelle orphan to push her point of view?

 "According to rumors, I am also a low-performing student who forced her way into university using my power, something impossible with my grades. It is surprising that someone who knows well about this believes unfounded rumors. Even a smart monarch cannot deceive age."

For the Crown Princess, equally arrogant with everyone, her mother was no exception.

 "Don't you think I know the Duke better than you, Mother?"  "Well, that's a funny joke. What would a brat with rose-tinted glasses know about men? Besides, if someone who doesn't know us hears this, they might misunderstand that you have great intimacy with the Duke. Although it seems that you do believe it."

However, her arrogant and biting tongue was, in fact, an inheritance from her mother.

 "You've only seen him a couple of times at Alice's birthday parties, haven't you?"

Her cousin Alice, of the same age, was an Eccleston on her mother's side, so she was also the Duke's cousin. Thanks to that connection, she had met the Duke once a year since she was a child.

For a child, even a difference of one or two years feels large. Therefore, back then, she did not dare to speak to the Duke, who seemed like a distant adult. Although she had eyes of a child and thought he was a handsome, classy gentleman, she felt nothing more.

It was only when Helena was on the ambiguous border between childhood and adulthood that she saw him differently. After he rescued her like a knight from a difficult situation, without boasting of his mature composure, she fell in love with him.

At that time, Charles Eccleston was alive and Edwin Eccleston was the younger son of the dukedom. A spare son of a noble family was the perfect candidate for Prince Consort. Although he was unmarried, that did not seem to be an obstacle at all. Helena's father had also been unmarried, but he could not resist the pressure from her mother and her surroundings, and finally yielded in his decision. So Helena insisted with her mother

 "You are too young to talk about marriage."

Her mother forbade her to mention the subject again. Helena truly believed that her age was the problem and waited until she was the right age to marry. Meanwhile, Charles Eccleston died, and the man Helena had chosen as her husband became the Duke.

That Duke Eccleston himself would become Prince Consort was something that would make anyone gasp and shake their head. Having no choice, Helena gave up and, after graduating from university, met one after another the Prince Consort candidates her mother had chosen, but none pleased her.

Helena's heart was already occupied by another man.

She had always lived a life enjoying only the best. How could she settle for something second-rate? Helena had to have what she wanted. Unthinkable as it was that Duke Eccleston would become Prince Consort, it was not prohibited by law.

 "Helena, a man is not just his appearance. Didn't you learn anything from seeing me suffer because of your father?"  "Mother, you and I are different. The Duke is not just his appearance."  "Of course, there is also the Eccleston Dukedom. What would the Duke lack that would make him want to merge his family with ours and let his son inherit Crowley instead of Eccleston just to become Prince Consort?"  "That remains to be seen."

It was an announcement that she planned to do something in the future. For the Queen, the fact that her eldest daughter resembled her was generally a source of pride, but when their wills clashed, it was terribly problematic.

 "Helena, what do we lack that we would have to bring the Eccleston stud as our breeding horse? After seeing me suffer You make me repeat what I already said!"  "The Duke is not the Eccleston stud."  "Oh, really?"

Her mother gestured with her eyes, as if saying that the Duke's behavior at that moment directly contradicted her words. He was, precisely, extending his hand toward the waist of the Rozelle orphan next to him.

 "Isn't that a familiar and comfortable gesture?"  "Familiar?"

Helena ignored her mother's mockery.

 "He considers her a daughter, not a woman."

However, the Duke retracted from touching her, as if it were a shameful act that should not be shown to others, thus refuting Helena's belief.

Although raising an orphan as if she were a pet seemed peculiar, she didn't believe it would be an obstacle.

No. It won't be.

The reception marked the end of the event. As they left, Giselle got into the co-pilot's seat of the same car as Edwin, just as they had arrived. The escort car ahead left first, followed by Rita's car and then a line of attendants' vehicles.

Only after leaving the palace and entering the road did Giselle finally relax the tension that had kept her entire body rigid. Fortunately, the event ended without incident.

That Edwin had tried to delegate such an important event, where his presence was so significant, to his assistant Experiencing it firsthand turned out to be even more shocking. It was also a relief that such a waste did not occur.

 "Good job, Giselle."

Edwin, sitting diagonally behind, complimented Giselle. She felt uncomfortable being the only one praised when Sir Loise and Rita were also present.

 "Ah, I didn't do anything special"

At that moment, something appeared suddenly next to Giselle's face, interrupting her answer. Turning her head, she saw a blue velvet box the size of a palm.

 "Take it."

Inside was the commemorative victory coin that the Royal Mint had just issued. Officially it was a commemoration of the armistice, but the Mercia government, taking advantage of the fact that the enemy country had signed the agreement under conditions close to surrender, did not hesitate to use the expression "victory" and even created souvenirs.

Among them, the most valuable coin, minted in pure gold and of which only a few units were made, was given as a gift to today's honorees. Edwin was giving Giselle, with total naturalness, an object of great collection value.

 "This?"  "I don't have space in my wallet."

The man who always gave coins to Giselle because he found them bothersome, tried to give her even the commemorative coin with that excuse. The attendants were in charge of the objects the palace gave away and loaded them into the car, so she wondered why he had taken only that one separately. Giselle received it gratefully, but grumbled shyly.

 "How am I going to keep the prize a hero receives?"  "Because today's heroine is you."  "He is absolutely right."

Sir Loise, sitting next to Edwin, added:

 "If it hadn't been for Miss Bishop, we wouldn't have been able to carry out today's event smoothly. I also wanted to express my gratitude with a gift, but I cannot surpass what the Duke has given you."  "Loise, it's troublesome that you try to one-up me."

Edwin's light joke, as before, sparked a warm joy in Giselle's heart.

 "I am glad I could help the Duke return to normal."

For that, Edwin was also relieved, but at the same time uncomfortable. Was it necessary for Giselle to sacrifice even her night for his half-day?

As soon as he thought about the price of his half-day of freedom, Edwin sank beneath the surface of consciousness.

 "Pretty."

The warm atmosphere of the car abruptly cooled with that single word.

 "Now you have to go out with me."  "When did I say I would go out with you?
Chapter 140.
“To say something so outrageousthat you would date Lord’s other selfand do it right in front of everyone!”

While Giselle suddenly retorted, Rita pretended not to hear, continuing to grumble about the situation. Sir Loise, for his part, used his arm to block the space between the front and back seats, preventing that man from touching Giselle.

“It’s early for dinner. Come back later.” “We have to reserve a place in advance. Where do you want to go?” “I will eat at my house.”

Right after the military parade, many people would recognize Edwin. If they dined together in public, strange rumors might arise.

“Then I’ll decide what we do in the meantime. Dawson, to Magnolia Terrace.” “...My house? Why?”

What was he planning to do there? Was he going to say another crazy thing in front of everyone? Giselle tensed up.

“To walk our little dog.”

The answer did not match her worst expectation. Even so, Giselle did not relax. Rita glanced at her, noticing her stiff face. She didn't know which attitude was the correct one.

“Let’s go to Magnolia Terrace.”

Upon arriving in front of Giselle's house, the man entered without ceremony, as if it were his own home. A dog, especially affectionate towards people, ran out to greet him, jumping around and wagging its tail, as if remembering him after only one day. It seems this dog will never be a good guardian.

“Eddie, how are you?”

Giselle, who was intently watching the man and the dog from behind, quickly stepped in to correct him:

“It’s Loddy.” “Loddy?” “Lorenz. Loddy is his nickname.”

Giselle had given the dog a name derived from his. Realizing that ‘Lorenz’ was no longer exclusively his, the man’s smile completely vanished.

Shortly after, a sarcastic grimace appeared on his face, but it did not entirely hide the humiliation he felt. The pleasure born from the displeasure of that devil, though petty, was always sweet.

“Natalia, I see you absolutely love my gift. You even gave a simple dog a nickname?”

It also mortified him that she had baptized the animal with a nickname she never gave him. When the man reached his hand toward the dog’s neck, Giselle felt a sharp lurch in her chest. Will he do it out of jealousy? Or to hurt him?

“Loddy, come here.”

The dog, which already recognized its name and commands, broke free from the man and ran toward Giselle. Every time the animal approached, she felt a knot in her chest that made it difficult to breathe. Even so, she had called him countless times as a tactical sacrifice for her vengeance today. She never thought she would end up using him to prevent the devil from taking out his anger on the dog.

“Have you been a good boy at home?”

The dog, happy to see its owner, rubbed against her legs excitedly. Giselle, defiant, scratched its neck while smiling at the devil who was observing her closely.

Look at me. It doesn't affect me. It doesn't affect me. It doesn't affe...

The dog stopped moving and looked up at her, happily panting. Giselle did not fear the animal. She feared that innocent devotion.

Thump, thump, thump!

Her heart was thundering in her chest, right beneath her sternum, and her insides churned with nausea. She normally avoided the dog's gaze, but with him watching her, she had no choice.

“Loddy, let’s go for a walk.”

She had no choice but to distract the animal. She quickly put on its leash and exited through the back door. They were walking by the lake behind the house when Sir Loise interceded, placing himself between Giselle and the man. That man glared at him, as if considering him an obstruction.

“Get out of here, you worthless salary thief.” “You were the one who said we could assign you dozens of bodyguards and assistants.”

Giselle intervened instead of Sir Loise, who could not speak freely to that scoundrel occupying Edwin’s body.

“And show Sir Loise some respect.”

Pff. The man let out a mocking laugh.

“Why? This man is my servant.” “Your servant? He is Edwin’s secretary. And Edwin himself wouldn't treat an older man that way, unlike you, who never learned manners.” “And you did? Because now you’re disrespecting your elder.” “My elder?”

This time, it was Giselle’s turn to laugh sarcastically.

“Does a one-year-old brat dare to say anything to an adult?”

A one-year-old brat? Rita, who was walking behind Giselle, couldn’t hold back a laugh, even though she knew it was inappropriate.

“Listen, you brat. You are not Edwin. You are just a one-year-old orphan who fell from the sky with no parents and is living as a dependent in someone else’s house.”

Rita no longer even tried to disguise it. Instead, she held her breath. As the two looked at each other with murderous eyes, Sir Loise silently sweated between them.

“Natalia Rudnik, and what are you?” “When have I ever denied what I am? I’m just giving you a piece of advice from a more experienced leech. Learn your place, little leech, behave.” “Ah, so you do know your place”

How dare you harbor ambitions for Edwin Eccleston’s love? It was obvious he wanted to attack her with that, but the man stopped mid-sentence. His gaze had shifted toward the lake behind Giselle. Perhaps he was afraid that if he pressed her weak point again, she would jump into the water to kill herself.

“To lose is to win.”

He repeated the words Edwin used to say, then resumed his walk. Behind them, Rita let out the air she had been holding.

“June 13th.”

The man, who had been walking in silence until then, suddenly blurted out a meaningless date. When Giselle looked at him confused, he, as if he had been waiting for it, clarified:

“My birthday.”

Anger surged, and Giselle couldn't contain herself.

“Do you have no conscience or intelligence? You ruin my birthday and expect me to remember yours?” “I’m giving you the chance to ruin mine.”

Did he really expect her to believe he was doing it out of remorse? A parasite with no family, no friends, whose only ties were his enemies... perhaps, for him, any recognitionwhether celebration or cursewas better than oblivion.

“I don’t need it. I’ll forget it.”

Upon hearing that she wouldn't remember it, his blue eyesmore turbid than the lake in the rainconfirmed what Giselle already suspected: her conjecture was correct.

In the end, they ate dinner at Giselle's house. As in the Residence, Rita and Sir Loise flanked the couple while they shared a small table, under the watchful gaze of both.

“Natalia, what are you doing tomorrow night?”

Giselle left her glass suspended in the air, not because of the name he used, but because of the brazen act he was committing under the table.

The man slid the tip of his shoe between hers. It was his way of saying that what he really wanted to do with Giselle was not to dine, but to open her legs. She clenched her thighs tightly, warning him:

“What you’re doing now, Sir Loise and Rita can’t see... but Edwin can.”

Only then did the other two notice something was happening under the table and moved closer. Giselle shook her head to stop them.

“If you want to ensure I never see you again, keep going.”

The threat worked: the intrusive movement between her legs suddenly ceased. He looked at her with resentment, but finally withdrew his foot.

“They say love is a chain”

Why does he insist on pretending to be a fool madly in love, with tender and dramatic glances?

“Natalia, you are the kind of woman for whom a man who only lives in the present foregoes today’s pleasure just to see your face tomorrow.”

That “passionate declaration of love” was a calculated insult designed to embarrass her in front of the others. His revenge for having humiliated him earlier, forcing him to obey like a dog. But it didn't end there.

“If even someone like me loses his mind over you why doesn’t the Duke love you?”

He used his own unrequited love as a leash, while hanging hers on the gallows for public execution.

Calmly. With elegance.

If she reacted with overflowing emotions, it would only please him more. Giselle suppressed an internal scream, inhaled deeply, and exhaled before shouting:

“Loddy!”

The dog, who was sniffing in the hallway, ran in with his ears and tongue flying. When she threw him a leftover piece of bread, ‘Lorenz the dog’ wagged his tail enthusiastically. Meanwhile, ‘Lorenz who wasn't even a dog’ sharpened his gaze.

For him, it was a trivial revenge. For her, a miserable patch: forgetting one pain with another.

*

Continue in Part 4!!
